DOMESTIC  PASSENGER  AND  FREIGHT  RAIL 

SECURITY

S.  HRG.  109–462

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

OCTOBER  20,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

28–172 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on October 20, 2005 ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Ben Nelson ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Berrick,  Cathleen  A.,  Director,  Homeland  Security  and  Justice  Issues,  U.S. 
Government Accountability Office ......................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Boardman, Joseph H., Administrator, Federal Railroad Administration ...........
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Crosbie, William L., Senior Vice President, Operations, Amtrak ........................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Hamberger, Edward R., President/CEO, Association of American Railroads ....
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Hawley, Edmund ‘‘Kip’’, Assistant Secretary, Transportation Security Admin-
istration .................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Wytkind, Edward, President, Transportation Trades Department, AFL–CIO ...
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Pryor, Hon. Mark, U.S. Senator from Arkansas, prepared statement ................
Response to Written Questions Submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Cathleen A. Berrick ..........................................................................................
Joseph H. Boardman ........................................................................................
William L. Crosbie ............................................................................................
Edward R. Hamberger .....................................................................................
Edmund ‘‘Kip’’ Hawley .....................................................................................
Edward Wytkind ...............................................................................................
Response  to  Written  Questions  Submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg 

to: 

Joseph H. Boardman ........................................................................................
Edward R. Hamberger .....................................................................................
Edmund ‘‘Kip’’ Hawley .....................................................................................

Page 
1
46
47
41
76
74
1
1

12
13
8
9
59
62
49
51

2
4
65
67

81

81
98
86
82
87
97

100
86
94

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

DOMESTIC  PASSENGER  AND  FREIGHT  RAIL 

SECURITY 

THURSDAY,  OCTOBER  20,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND 
TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SD–
562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Chairman 
of the Committee, presiding. 

Washington DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Good morning. 
Mr. HAWLEY. Good morning, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  welcome  you  here  today  and  I  want  to  thank 
you for your willingness to appear before the Committee to discuss 
the  security  of  our  Nation’s  rail  system.  Alaska,  has  only  one  rail-
road,  as  you  know.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  it’s  really  essential  to  our 
livelihood  and  it  has  an  interesting  history,  which  I  won’t  go  into 
now.  This  is  one  of  a  series  of  hearings  we’re  going  to  hold,  to  try 
and fulfill our oversight responsibilities on TSA, to work to develop 
our understanding of the security systems that are going to be im-
plemented  for  all  modes  of  transportation.  I  hope  that  we  can  get 
other Senators here to explore some of the details that are involved 
here,  in  your  reports.  I  have  gone  through  them  briefly,  but,  I’m 
very interested in pursuing the whole subject. 

We have a report here from GAO that I find very interesting and 
it indicates there remains confusion among the various entities, as 
to who is actually in charge of the initiatives that are necessary to 
improve  rail  security.  So,  I  look  forward  to  your  testimony.  I’m 
going to put my statement in full in the record and will give a simi-
lar opportunity for all the members, to put their statements in the 
record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

I welcome the witnesses who are here today and I thank you for your willingness 
to  appear  before  the  Committee  to  discuss  the  security  of  our  Nation’s  rail  system, 
a  matter  that  is  essential  to  the  preservation  of  interstate  commerce  and  the  U.S. 
economy.  In  my  State  of  Alaska,  freight  and  passenger  rail  lines  are  a  vital  means 
of transportation for resources, as well as tourism. The Alaska Railroad Corporation 
hauls 7 million tons of freight and 500,000 passengers each year, and employs more 
than 700 Alaskans. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

Today’s hearing is one in a series of hearings that the Committee will hold to ful-
fill  its  oversight  responsibilities  over  the  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA)  as  we  work  to  develop  ways  to  further  improve  the  security  of  all  modes  of 
transportation, including our rail systems. 

However,  in  securing  any  mode  of  transportation,  we  must  achieve  a  balance  in 
our  approach  that  ensures  the  greatest  security  possible  while  not  inhibiting  the 
free  flow  of  commerce.  Senator  Inouye  and  I,  along  with  several  of  our  Committee 
colleagues, have attempted to achieve that balance in legislation that we introduced 
that  addresses  the  security  of  all  modes,  including  the  security  of  our  rail  systems. 
Much has been done since September 11th to enhance the security of our Nation’s 
rail  systems,  particularly  by  the  freight  and  passenger  rail  industries,  which  have 
invested substantially to ensure the security of their infrastructure and assets. But 
the  London  bombings  and  the  recent  threats  to  the  New  York  City  subway  system 
underscore the fact that much more remains to be done. 

Despite  TSA  being  designated  the  lead  agency  with  authority  over  rail  security 
nearly  four  years  ago,  the  agency  has  been  criticized  by  the  Government  Account-
ability Office and the rail industry for not seeking industry input in policy decisions, 
and  for  not  acting  quickly  enough  to  assess  risk  and  allocate  resources.  GAO  re-
cently  reported  that  TSA  has  yet  to  finalize  risk  assessments  of  passenger  rail  sys-
tems around the country, or set a time-line for the completion of such assessments. 
GAO indicated that there remains confusion among stakeholders concerning who is 
actually  in  charge  given  that  several  Federal  agencies  have  initiatives  to  improve 
rail security. 

I  welcome  Mr.  Hawley’s  testimony  on  these  topics,  and  I  look  forward  to  a  con-

structive dialogue concerning ways to enhance rail security.

Our  first  witness  today,  is  the  Assistant  Secretary  of  the  Trans-
portation  Security  Administration,  Kip  Hawley.  I  am  pleased  to 
have your statement, Mr. Hawley. 

STATEMENT OF EDMUND ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY, ASSISTANT 

SECRETARY, TRANSPORTATION SECURITY ADMINISTRATION 
Mr. HAWLEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and good morning. I ap-
preciate  my  first  opportunity  to  appear  as  head  of  the  TSA  before 
this  Committee  and  this  morning,  I  will  discuss  our  efforts  to  as-
sure domestic passenger and freight rail security. 

At the outset, I want to acknowledge the team nature of security 
in  today’s  world  and  express  appreciation  for  the  Government  Ac-
countability  Office  and  Cathy  Berrick,  who’s  represented  on  this 
panel and the Department of Transportation today, represented by 
Federal Railroad Administrator, Joe Boardman. 

America’s  passenger  and  freight  transportation  system  is  a  dy-
namic,  interconnected  network.  It  consists  of  overlapping  sub-net-
works  and  multiple  organizations,  with  a  variety  of  governance 
structures  and  a  mix  of  public  and  private  ownership.  In  terms  of 
security,  decentralized  systems  such  as  this  are  more  difficult  to 
‘‘secure,’’  but  they  also  have  advantages.  They  present  more  oper-
ational  uncertainty  to  those  who  would  do  them  harm,  and  they 
are  more  robust  in  the  face  of  catastrophic  failure  of  any  single 
component of the network. 

Despite the good work that has already been done to improve se-
curity and transit, the London bombings and other events through-
out  the  world  have  demonstrated  the  need  for  a  refined  approach 
to transportation security. 

Fundamentally,  our  challenge  is  to  protect  our  transportation 
networks  in  a  constantly  changing  threat  environment.  We  under-
stand better that terrorists will not only look for weaknesses in our 
transportation  system  and  in  security  measures,  but  they  will  also 
adapt to perceived security measures. As a result, it is not possible 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

to precisely ‘‘predict’’, with any degree of certainty, the next attack 
based  on  previous  terrorist  activity.  In  the  face  of  unpredictability 
and  rapid  change  with  respect  to  threats,  our  approach  to  security 
in  every  transportation  sector  must  be  based  on  flexibility  and 
adaptability. 

While  it  is  necessary,  it  is  no  longer  sufficient  to  protect  our-
selves  against  known  or  suspected  terrorists;  we  must  protect  our-
selves against people with no known affiliation to terrorism. 

While it is necessary, it is no longer sufficient to focus on finding 
threat  devices  like  guns,  explosives  and  knives,  we  must  enhance 
our ability to find terrorists before an attack is underway. 

And  while  it  is  necessary,  but  no  longer  sufficient  to  subject 
every passenger to basic security procedures, we must create uncer-
tainty  and  an  element  of  unpredictability  in  security  operations  in 
order to disrupt terrorist planning and attempts. 

To accomplish these objectives, TSA is pursuing a security strat-
egy based on Security Chair Chertoff’s Second Stage Review. There 
are  four  core  operating  principles  applicable  to  TSA.  First,  we  will 
use  analysis  based  on  risk,  vulnerability  and  consequence  to  make 
investment  and  operational  decisions.  Second,  we  will  avoid  giving 
terrorists  an  advantage  based  on  our  predictability.  TSA  will  de-
ploy resources, canine teams, air marshals, or inspectors, for exam-
ple  and  establish  protocols,  standards  and  best  practices,  flexibly 
based  on  risk.  Terrorists  will  not  be  able  to  use  the  predictability 
of our security measures to their advantage in planning or carrying 
out  an  attack.  Third,  we  will  continue  to  intervene  early  based  on 
intelligence,  law  enforcement  information  and  counter-surveillance 
suspicious incident reporting, to focus our security measures on the 
terrorist, as well as the means for carrying out the threat. Effective 
analysis and dissemination of timely information to those who need 
them is a vital component of this effort. 

Finally,  we  will  build  and  take  advantage  of  security  networks. 
We  are  pursuing  a  restructuring  of  TSA  that  will  put  a  renewed 
emphasis on building information sharing networks in every trans-
portation  sector.  Through  these  efforts,  we  work  more  closely  with 
stakeholders  and  put  a  renewed  emphasis  on  sharing  intelligence, 
capacity  and  technology  with  other  law  enforcement,  intelligence 
gathering  and  security  agencies  at  every  level  of  government.  As 
we move forward, we are fortunate to be able to build upon a solid 
foundation  of  work,  not  only  at  the  local  level,  but  nationally  as 
well. This foundation includes products and resources, developed by 
our Federal partners, especially the Department of Transportation, 
with  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  and  the  Federal  Railroad 
Administration,  and  partners  in  industry,  such  as  the  American 
Public  Transportation  Association,  the  Association  of  American 
Railroads  and  its  members,  labor  unions  and  individual  public 
transportation systems. 

This  collective  experience  fortifies  our  knowledge,  expertise  and 
overall strategic approach. We value the critical role that Congress, 
and especially this Committee, plays in the effort. We look forward 
to working with you on the full range of these issues. I’ll be happy 
to answer any questions at the appropriate time. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hawley follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDMUND ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY, ASSISTANT SECRETARY, 

TRANSPORTATION SECURITY ADMINISTRATION 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  am  pleased  to  have  this  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  subject  of  domestic 
passenger and freight rail security. 

At the outset, I acknowledge and appreciate the work of the Government Account-
ability Office (GAO) in its recent report on passenger rail security. The strategic ap-
proach, programs, and initiatives I will discuss today move us well along in address-
ing the GAO’s recommendations. 

As  you  know,  the  September  11  attacks  focused  Congress,  the  Administration, 
and  the  public  on  improving  the  security  of  our  aviation  system.  It  was  an  honor 
to be a part of the team that helped create the Transportation Security Administra-
tion  (TSA)  at  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT),  and  it  is  an  honor  today  to 
have  the  opportunity  to  lead  the  agency  at  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security, 
as we refocus and realign TSA to reflect the changing reality of terrorist threats to 
the  transportation  sector.  Of  necessity,  much  of  our  early  work  at  TSA  focused  on 
the very real and present threats and vulnerabilities in aviation. We were fortunate 
to have partners at DOT and in industries and communities around the Nation who 
immediately  stepped  forward  at  that  time  to  initiate  security  improvements  in  the 
transit  and  rail  sectors.  Today,  we  continue  to  work  with  these  partners  and  build 
upon  their  record  of  success  to  address  the  changing  transportation  threat  environ-
ment. 
Overview of Surface Transportation 

America’s  passenger  and  freight  transportation  system  is  a  dynamic,  inter-
connected  network.  It  consists  of  overlapping  sub-networks  and  multiple  organiza-
tions, with a variety of governance structures and a mix of public and private own-
ership.  In  terms  of  security,  decentralized  systems  such  as  this  are  more  difficult 
to  ‘‘control,’’  but  they  also  have  advantages.  They  present  more  operational  uncer-
tainty  to  those  who  seek  to  do  them  harm,  and  they  are  more  robust  in  the  face 
of catastrophic failure of any single component of their networks. 

Public Transportation. America’s public transportation system is actually com-
posed  of  over  6,000  separate  local  transit  systems.  These  local  systems  range  from 
very  small  bus-only  systems  in  rural  communities,  to  very  large  multi-modal  sys-
tems  in  urban  areas  that  may  combine  bus,  light  rail,  subway,  commuter  rail  and 
ferry  operations.  Transit  systems  are  not  only  locally  operated,  but  they  are  also 
protected largely by State and local law enforcement. 

Americans took 9.4 billion trips using public transportation in 2003. The 30 larg-
est transit systems in the U.S. carry most (almost 80 percent) of the Nation’s transit 
passenger  trips.  There  is  now  some  form  of  rail  transit  (light  rail,  subway,  or  com-
muter  rail)  operated  by  53  different  transit  agencies  located  in  33  cities  and  23 
states.  These  rail  systems  provide  a  combined  11.3  million  passenger  trips  each 
weekday, compared to 1.8 million domestic emplanements per day nationwide. 

Approximately 28 percent of all transit trips and 77 percent of all rail transit trips 
are on heavy rail. There are 14 heavy rail transit systems (also known as subways) 
in the U.S., consisting of more than 2,000 route miles, with over 1,000 stations and 
approximately 10,500 subway cars. The New York City subway system is the largest 
in  the  U.S.,  carrying  about  75  percent  of  the  Nation’s  heavy  rail  passengers,  with 
half  of  the  stations  and  more  than  6,000  scheduled  trains  per  day  carrying  over  3 
million  riders.  In  New  York’s  Penn  Station  alone,  more  than  1,600  people  per 
minute pass through dozens of access points during a typical rush hour. 

Intercity  Bus  Transportation.  Though  not  owned  by  public  entities,  intercity 
bus  service  is  an  important  component  of  America’s  transportation  network.  Inter-
city  bus  service  is  provided  by  over  4,000  private  operators  across  the  country,  90 
percent  of  which  operate  25  or  fewer  buses.  Greyhound  is  the  largest  intercity  bus 
operator, with a fleet of more than 2,400 buses. Public transit buses annually carry 
about 8 times the number of riders as intercity buses; heavy rail (subway) operators 
carry over 3 times as many riders as intercity buses. 

Intercity Passenger Rail. Intercity passenger rail service is provided by two en-
tities:  Amtrak  and  the  Alaska  Railroad  Corporation  (ARRC),  which  is  a  public  cor-
poration  of  the  State  of  Alaska.  The  ARRC  provides  freight  and  passenger  service 
from Whittier, Seward and Anchorage to Fairbanks, Denali National Park and mili-
tary installations. 

Amtrak  carries  approximately  25  million  passengers  per  year  or  an  estimated 
68,000  passengers  per  day,  operating  as  many  as  300  trains  per  day  and  serving 
over 500 stations in 46 States. In many large cities, Amtrak stations are co-located 
with  stations  serving  rail  transit,  intercity  bus,  and  other  modes  of  transportation. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

Amtrak  operates  over  more  than  22,000  route  miles.  It  owns  650  route  miles,  pri-
marily  between  Boston  and  Washington,  D.C.,  and  in  Michigan.  In  other  parts  of 
the country, Amtrak trains use tracks owned by freight railroads. 

Freight  Rail.  U.S.  freight  railroads  operate  over  a  network  spanning  more  than 
140,000 route miles. This system is vital to the economy, linking businesses and en-
suring  products  reach  consumers  in  an  efficient,  safe,  and  cost-effective  manner. 
Still,  recent  events,  such  as  the  accidental  derailment  in  Graniteville,  SC,  that  re-
sulted  in  the  release  of  chlorine  gas,  have  highlighted  the  need  to  focus  additional 
attention on the potential security risks associated with freight rail. Over 64 percent 
of toxic inhalation hazard chemicals are currently transported by rail. In 2003, over 
60,000  tank  cars  of  chlorine  or  anhydrous  ammonia  chemicals  were  shipped,  each 
carrying an average of 90 tons of chlorine or 30,000 gallons of anhydrous ammonia. 
London Lessons Learned 

Al-Qaeda and its affiliated extremist groups and sympathizers demonstrated their 
ability to strike mass transit targets with suicide bombings on buses in Israel, Tur-
key  and  China,  and  bombings  of  subways,  rail  systems,  and  ferries  in  India,  Paki-
stan, Thailand, Chechnya, Russia and the Philippines. The Madrid train attacks in 
2004  and  the  London  subway  and  bus  attacks  on  July  7  and  21  of  this  year  have 
further  reminded  us  that  our  trains,  subways  and  buses  may  be  terrorist  targets. 
Heavy rail transit systems in the U.S., like the London Underground, are particu-
larly high consequence targets in terms of potential loss of life and economic disrup-
tion.  These  systems  carry  large  numbers  of  people  in  a  confined  environment,  offer 
the potential of targeting specific populations at particular destination stations, and 
often  have  stations  located  below  or  adjacent  to  high  profile  government  buildings, 
major  office  complexes,  or  public  icons.  Threats  to  particular  economic  sectors,  like 
government  or  financial  institutions,  may  also  be  carried  out  through  attacks  on 
public transit. 

The London attacks were particularly noteworthy from a security perspective.
• In  a  relatively  short  period  of  time,  unknown  and  apparently  unaffiliated  indi-
viduals/groups  were  able  to  plan  and  execute  the  attacks  with  little  or  no  sur-
veillance or rehearsal activity.
• The  perpetrators  came  through  fare-gates  directly  onto  the  train;  they  did  not 
access  storage  yards,  tunnels  or  bridges.  As  a  result,  London’s  extensive  intru-
sion detection devices and security cameras did not prevent the attacks. Record-
ing capability was helpful, but only after-the-fact in helping to identify suspects.
• The  improvised  explosive  devices  used  by  the  attackers  were  assembled  with 
materials  readily  available  in  local  shops.  The  devices  fit  easily  into  backpacks 
of the type and design commonly carried by students, commuters, and tourists.
• Even with markedly increased public awareness, countermeasures, and law en-
forcement  presence  after  the  first  London  bombings,  the  same  methods  were 
able to be used in the second attack without suspicion or detection.

Immediately following the first London attacks, transit agencies and local officials 
took  action.  Responding  to  a  joint  inquiry  by  TSA  and  DOT’s  Federal  Transit  Ad-
ministration (FTA), the 30 largest transit agencies reported that they:

of administrative and operational personnel;

• Extended  patrol  hours  through  law  enforcement  overtime  and  the  deployment 
• Expanded the use of canine explosive detection patrols; and
• Issued  more  frequent  and  more  detailed  public  awareness  announcements  re-
garding  how  to  report  unattended  bags  and  suspicious  behavior  and  how  to 
evacuate  from  particular  transit  environments  (i.e.,  train  cars,  tunnels,  and 
bridges).

These  actions  built  upon  the  important  security  foundation  that  was  established 
over  the  last  several  years.  In  contrast  to  their  pre-9/11  security  posture,  all  of  the 
largest transit agencies have now: developed and implemented action plans that are 
specific to each Homeland Security Alert System threat level; sent front-line employ-
ees  to  Federally-funded  security  and  emergency  response  training  courses;  insti-
tuted  public  awareness  campaigns,  many  utilizing  Federally-developed  materials; 
developed  and  tested  emergency  response  plans;  and  hardened  numerous  assets  to 
protect against security threats. 
Adapting to a Changing Threat Environment 

Despite  the  work  that  has  already  been  done,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  London  bomb-
ings  and  other  events  throughout  the  world  have  demonstrated  the  need  for  a  new 
strategic  approach  to  transportation  security.  Fundamentally,  our  challenge  is  to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

protect passengers, freight, and our transportation network in a constantly changing 
threat  environment.  We  understand  better  that  terrorists  will  not  only  look  for 
weaknesses  in  our  transportation  system  and  its  security  measures,  but  they  will 
also adapt to perceived security measures. As a result, it is not possible to ‘‘predict’’ 
the next attack based on previous terrorist activity or put into place specific security 
measures to protect against it. In this dynamic environment, history is an unreliable 
guide. 

In the face of unpredictability and rapid change in terms of threats, our approach 
to  security  in  every  transportation  sector  must  be  based  on  flexibility  and  adapt-
ability.

• While  it  is  necessary,  it  is  no  longer  sufficient  to  protect  ourselves  against 
known  or  suspected  terrorists;  we  must  protect  ourselves  against  people  with 
no known affiliation to terrorism.
• While  it  is  necessary,  it  is  no  longer  sufficient  to  focus  on  finding  weapons  and 
common explosives; we must enhance our ability to recognize suspicious behav-
ioral  patterns  and  demeanors  to  identify  people  who  may  have  devised  a  new 
means to attack our transportation systems or passengers.
• While it is necessary, it is no longer sufficient to subject every passenger to the 
same  basic  security  procedures;  we  must  create  uncertainty  and  an  element  of 
randomness in security operations in order to disrupt terrorist planning and at-
tempts.
• While  it  is  necessary,  it  is  no  longer  sufficient  to  focus  solely  on  identifying  the 
actors, like suicide bombers; we must integrate our security measures with local 
law enforcement to identify those who make the bombs and provide support.

Therefore, TSA is pursuing a security strategy based on Secretary Chertoff ’s Sec-
ond  Stage  Review,  the  National  Strategy  for  Transportation  Security,  and  the  fol-
lowing four operating principles: 

First, we will use risk/value analysis to make investment and operational 
decisions. That  means  that  we  will  assess  risks  based  not  only  on  threat  and  vul-
nerability, but on the potential consequences of a particular threat to people, trans-
portation assets, and the economy. Further, we will assess and undertake risk man-
agement  and  risk  mitigation  measures  based  on  their  effect  on  total  transportation 
network  risk.  This  holistic  approach  to  risk  assessment  and  risk  mitigation  may 
lead  us,  for  example,  to  redirect  the  actions  of  our  airport  screeners  to  focus  less 
on  identifying  and  removing  less  threatening  items  from  carry-on  luggage,  so  that 
their time and attention can be spent on identifying potential components of an im-
provised explosive device. 

Second,  we  will  avoid  giving  terrorists  or  potential  terrorists  an  advan-
tage  based  on  our  predictability.  TSA  will  deploy  resources—whether  they  are 
canine teams, screeners, air marshals, or inspectors—and establish protocols flexibly 
based  on  risk,  so  that  terrorists  cannot  use  the  predictability  of  security  measures 
to  their  advantage  in  planning  or  carrying  out  a  threat.  This  may  mean  changing 
or  adding  to  inspection  routines  on  a  daily  or  hourly  basis  to  introduce  uncertainty 
into terrorist planning efforts. 

Third,  we  will  continue  to  intervene  early  based  on  intelligence,  and 
focus  our  security  measures  on  the  terrorist,  as  well  as  the  means  for  car-
rying  out  the  threat.  Enhancing  and  expanding  the  techniques  to  identify  sus-
picious  persons  at  the  transit,  train,  or  bus  station,  or  to  detect  explosive  devices 
is necessary. However, the strongest defense posture detects the terrorist well before 
the  attempt  to  launch  an  attack  has  begun.  A  coordinated  interagency  intelligence 
collection  and  analysis  effort  must  stand  as  the  first  line  of  defense.  Effective  dis-
semination of timely intelligence products to those who need them is a vital compo-
nent of this effort. 

And,  finally,  we  will  build  and  take  advantage  of  security  networks.  As 
you  may  know,  I  am  pursuing  a  restructuring  of  TSA  that  will  put  a  renewed  em-
phasis  on  building  information  sharing  networks  in  every  transportation  sector—
rail,  transit,  maritime,  and  trucking,  as  well  as  aviation.  Not  only  will  we  work 
more closely with stakeholders in these industries, we will put a renewed emphasis 
on  sharing  intelligence,  capacity  and  technology  with  other  law  enforcement,  intel-
ligence  gathering  and  security  agencies  at  every  level  of  government.  We  will  build 
a more robust, distributed network of security systems to protect America. 

As  we  apply  these  operational  principles,  I  have  also  directed  my  staff  to  rededi-
cate  themselves  to  important  customer  service  principles,  as  well.  As  we  move  for-
ward:

• TSA will identify opportunities and engage the private sector in its work to de-

velop and implement security systems and products.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

• We will protect the privacy of Americans by minimizing the amount of personal 
data  we  acquire,  store  and  share,  and  we  will  vigorously  protect  any  data  that 
is collected, stored or transmitted.
• And  TSA  will  remember,  in  all  that  we  do,  our  goal  in  stopping  terrorism  is 
to protect the freedoms of the American people. Therefore, we will work to make 
travel  easier  for  the  law-abiding  public,  while  protecting  the  security  of  the 
transportation network and the people who depend upon it.

A Solid Foundation 

As  we  move  forward  strategically  to  enhance  our  security  efforts  in  the  public 
transportation  and  rail  sectors,  we  are  fortunate  to  be  able  to  build  upon  a  solid 
foundation of work, not only at the local level, but nationally, as well. 

Grants. Substantial Federal assistance has been and will continue to be provided 
to  support  improved  transit  and  rail  security.  TSA  has  assisted  the  DHS  Office  of 
State and Local Government Coordination and Preparation (SLGCP) in the develop-
ment  of  its  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  (TSGP).  To  date,  SLGCP  has  provided 
more than $255 million to State and local transit agencies through this program to 
increase protection through hardening of assets, greater police presence during high 
alerts,  additional  detection  and  surveillance  equipment,  increased  inspections,  and 
expanded  use  of  explosives  detection  canine  teams.  In  April  2005,  DHS  announced 
$141 million in TSGP funding, of which more than $107 million has been dedicated 
to  owners  and  operators  of  rail  systems.  An  additional  $6  million  was  awarded  to 
Amtrak  through  the  Inter-city  and  Passenger  Rail  Security  Program  (IPRSGP)  for 
security  enhancements  to  passenger  rail  operations  in  the  Northeast  Corridor  and 
at  Amtrak’s  hub  in  Chicago.  Additionally,  through  SLGCP’s  State  Homeland  Secu-
rity  Grant  Program  and  Urban  Area  Security  Initiative,  the  Department  has  allo-
cated more than $8.3 billion for general counterterrorism preparedness. 

The  FY  2006  appropriations  bill  includes  an  additional  $2.5  billion  for  this  pur-
pose. The bill also includes a total of $390 million in discretionary grants specifically 
for  surface  transportation  security  programs,  including  $150  million  for  rail  and 
transit security, $175 million for port security, $10 million for intercity bus security, 
and  $5  million  for  the  Highway  Watch  program.  TSA  will  continue  to  work  closely 
with SLGCP on these programs, as well. 

Security  Exercises  and  Training.  TSA  has  held  numerous  security  exercises 
that  bring  together  stakeholders,  Federal,  State,  and  local  first  responders,  and  se-
curity experts to test preparedness and response and identify best practices and les-
sons learned. We are also seeking new and improved ways to exercise and train for 
prevention  methods,  which  will  help  strengthen  a  national  prevention  capability. 
These  efforts  will  develop  and  support  effective  relationships  among  Federal,  State 
and  local  entities  and  the  private  sector,  and  they  significantly  enhance  our  ability 
to anticipate and respond quickly and appropriately to security issues. 

Additionally,  through  an  interagency  agreement  with  the  Federal  Law  Enforce-
ment Training Center (FLETC), TSA has trained over 400 law enforcement officers, 
transit police, and first responders through the Land Transportation Anti-Terrorism 
Training  Program.  TSA  has  also  contracted  with  the  FTA’s  National  Transit  Insti-
tute  to  develop  a  CD-ROM-based  interactive  training  program  for  passenger  and 
freight  rail  employees.  This  product  is  expected  to  be  completed  before  the  end  of 
the  current  fiscal  year.  These  training  programs  emphasize  antiterrorism  planning 
and prevention for land transportation systems. Areas of focus include security plan-
ning, transit system vulnerabilities, contingency planning, recognition and response 
for  threats  involving  explosives  and  weapons  of  mass  destruction,  and  crisis  and 
consequence  management.  Guest  instructors  with  specialized  expertise  supplement 
the FLETC staff, providing the benefit of actual experience through case studies. 

Self-Assessment  Tool.  TSA  has  developed  the  Vulnerability  Identification  Self-
Assessment  Tool  (VISAT),  a  multi-modal  tool  that  public  transportation  agencies 
may voluntarily use to self-assess vulnerabilities within their systems. Specific mod-
ules  focus  on  mass  transit  (heavy  rail/subways),  rail  passenger  stations,  highway 
bridges,  maritime,  and  operations  centers.  Additional  modules  under  development 
will ensure this tool covers the spectrum of modes for which TSA holds lead respon-
sibility for security. In general, the tool focuses on the prevention and the mitigation 
of an array of threat scenarios developed for each mode within the sector. Users rate 
their entity in terms of target attractiveness (from a terrorist’s perspective) and sev-
eral  consequence  categories  that  broadly  describe  health  and  well-being,  economic 
consequence,  and  symbolic  value  of  the  entity.  The  tool  enables  a  user  to  capture 
a  snapshot  of  its  security  system  baseline,  assessing  vulnerabilities  in  the  system 
and assisting in the development of a comprehensive security plan. 

Surface  Transportation  Security  Inspector  Program.  The  Department  of 
Homeland Security Appropriations Act for FY 2005 provided $12 million to TSA for 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

rail security, including $10 million to deploy 100 Federal security compliance inspec-
tors  and  Congress  has  continued  this  funding  in  FY  2006.  TSA  has  made  substan-
tial progress in developing a robust and comprehensive surface transportation secu-
rity  compliance  inspector  program  with  emphasis  on  hiring,  training,  and  logistical 
and  procedural  planning.  A  total  of  99  inspectors  are  now  on  board.  Among  other 
tasks,  the  security  compliance  inspectors  will  identify  gaps  in  security  and  validate 
compliance with TSA’s security directives. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  want  to  assure  you  that  TSA 
is  pursuing  a  robust  strategy  to  support  rail  and  transit  security  that  builds  upon 
the  work  of  other  Department  of  Homeland  Security  agencies,  the  Department  of 
Transportation,  and  our  public  and  private  sector  partners  at  the  State  and  local 
level.  We  value  the  critical  role  the  Congress,  and  especially  this  Committee,  plays 
in this effort. The success of Secretary Chertoff ’s Second Stage Review and the stra-
tegic  approach  I’ve  described  today  depend  upon  retaining  the  flexibility  to  deter-
mine  risk-based  priorities  and  to  adjust  our  tactics  to  respond  to  developing  cir-
cumstances  and  emerging  trends.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  Congress  and 
this Committee on the full range of subjects so critical to protecting America’s trans-
portation infrastructure, its passengers, and the commerce that depends upon it. 

Thank you. I would be pleased to respond to questions.

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Senator  McCain,  do  you 

have an opening statement? 

Senator MCCAIN. Since you’ve already begun, I’d be glad to wait 

until after the witnesses, Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you. Our next witness is the Admin-

istrator of the FRA, Mr. Joseph Boardman. 

STATEMENT OF JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  McCain, 
other Members of the Committee, I am pleased to be here today to 
testify,  on  behalf  of  the  Secretary  of  Transportation,  about  the  se-
curity of our Nation’s passenger and freight railroad network. 

Since  June  1  of  this  year,  it  has  been  my  privilege  to  serve  as 

the Administrator of the Federal Railroad Administration. 

Although  DOT  has  not  yet  prepared  a  views  report  on  Senate 
1052, which precludes me from providing official views on the pro-
visions  of  that  bill,  we’re  certainly  willing  to  work  with  this  Com-
mittee on any legislative ideas that will enhance rail security. 

The  FRA  administers  the  Federal  Railroad  Safety  Laws,  which 
provide  FRA  with  authority  over  every  area  of  railroad  safety.  It 
also  enforces  hazardous  material  transportation  regulations  issued 
by PHMSA or the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Admin-
istration. And although the railroad industry’s overall safety record 
has improved over the last decade and most safety trends are mov-
ing  in  the  right  direction,  significant  train  accidents  continue  to 
occur. 

As a result, in May of 2005, Secretary Mineta announced a Rail-
road  Safety  Action  Plan  and  FRA  has  begun  to  move  forward  on 
all  elements  of  that  action  plan.  FRA  has  a  role  in  transportation 
railroad  security.  To  date,  FRA  personnel  have  reviewed  security 
plans,  and  security  training  records,  and  since  April  of  2004,  FRA 
and  PHMSA  have  also  worked  with  DHS  on  a  coordinated  plan  to 
improve  the  security  of  the  rail  transport  of  hazardous  materials 
classified  as  ‘‘ Toxic  Inhalation  Hazards.’’  In  the  area  of  passenger 
security,  FRA  inspectors  have  conducted  basic  security  reviews  of 
Amtrak and commuter railroads, in work with TSA inspectors after 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

the  July  transit  bombings  in  London,  together,  to  ensure  safety  in 
passenger service. 

FRA  sponsors  and  conducts  research,  development  and  tech-
nology  demonstrations  that  are  related  to  rail  security  through  its 
Office  of  Research  and  Development  such  as  exploring  various 
methods to harden tank cars. 

In  September  2004,  DOT  and  DHS  entered  into  a  Memorandum 
of  Understanding  concerning  their  respective  roles  on  security 
issues.  The  MOU  requires  early  coordination  between  the  parties 
on  the  development  of  regulations  affecting  security  and  will  help 
delineate each department’s specific area of responsibility. 

FRA  works  closely  with  the  managers  of  the  Transportation  Se-
curity  Administration’s  new  Rail  Security  Inspection  Program.  A 
day  to  day  connection  with  that  is  extremely  important  for  the 
event  of  catastrophic  events.  FRA’s  primary  mission  is  helping  to 
ensure the safety of railroad transportation. In some areas such as 
hazardous  material  transportation,  safety  and  security  are  inex-
tricably  intertwined,  which  means  that  FRA  safety  activities  will 
no  doubt  continue  to  have  an  effect  on  security.  In  general,  how-
ever,  FRA’s  role  is  to  support  DHS  and  TSA  in  carrying  out  their 
security  responsibilities  to  the  extent  FRA  can  do  so  within  its 
present authority and with its current resources. 

Thank you and I’m available for questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Boardman follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, ADMINISTRATOR, FEDERAL 

RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION 

Chairman  Stevens,  Ranking  Member  Inouye,  and  other  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee,  I  am  very  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  testify,  on  behalf  of  the  Secretary  of 
Transportation,  about  the  security  of  our  Nation’s  passenger  and  freight  railroad 
network. Since June 1 of this year, it has been my privilege to serve as the Adminis-
trator  of  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  (FRA).  By  delegation  from  the  Sec-
retary, FRA’s primary mission is to promote the safety of the U.S. railroad industry 
and to reduce the number and severity of accidents and incidents arising from rail-
road  operations.  Our  railroad  safety  mission  necessarily  includes  our  involvement 
in  railroad  security  issues.  The  U.S.  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  has 
the  primary  responsibility  for  transportation  security.  FRA  plays  a  supporting  role, 
providing  technical  assistance  and  assisting  DHS  when  possible  with  implementa-
tion  of  its  security  policies,  as  allowed  by  statutory  authority  and  available  re-
sources 

My  testimony  today  will  provide  some  background  on  FRA’s  railroad  safety  pro-

gram and briefly describe the role that FRA plays in railroad security. 
FRA’s Railroad Safety Program 

FRA  administers  the  Federal  railroad  safety  laws,  which  provide  FRA  with  au-
thority  over  ‘‘every  area  of  railroad  safety,’’  49  U.S.C.  20103(a).  The  agency  has 
issued  a  wide  range  of  safety  regulations  covering  such  topics  as:  track;  passenger 
equipment;  locomotives;  freight  cars;  power  brakes;  locomotive  event  recorders;  sig-
nal  and  train  control  systems;  maintenance  of  active  warning  devices  at  highway-
rail grade crossings, accident reporting, alcohol and drug testing, protection of road-
way  workers;  operating  rules  and  practices;  locomotive  engineer  certification;  posi-
tive  train  control;  and  use  of  train  horns  at  grade  crossings.  We  currently  have  ac-
tive  rulemaking  projects  on  a  number  of  important  safety  topics,  including  loco-
motive crashworthiness, noise exposure of railroad employees, and continuous weld-
ed rail. In addition, FRA enforces hazardous materials regulations issued by another 
DOT  agency,  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration 
(PHMSA).  Those  regulations  include  requirements  that  railroads  and  other  haz-
ardous  materials  transporters,  as  well  as  shippers,  have  and  adhere  to  security 
plans. 

FRA  has  an  authorized  inspection  staff  of  about  400  persons  nationwide,  distrib-
uted across its eight regions. (In addition, about 160 inspectors employed by the 30 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

States  that  participate  in  FRA’s  State  participation  program  inspect  for  compliance 
with  FRA’s  standards.)  The  inspectors  are  experts  in  specific  disciplines,  including 
track,  signal  and  train  control,  motive  power  and  equipment,  operating  practices, 
and  hazardous  materials.  In  addition,  we  have  16  grade  crossing  experts  in  the 
field.  Our  inspectors  conduct  thousands  of  inspections  every  year,  investigate  more 
than  100  train  accidents,  investigate  hundreds  of  complaints,  develop  recommenda-
tions for hundreds of enforcement actions, and engage in a range of educational ac-
tivities  on  railroad  safety  issues.  Although  some  inspectors  have  had  basic  famil-
iarization training on security issues, they are not security experts. 

The  railroad  industry’s  overall  safety  record  has  improved  over  the  last  decade, 
and most safety trends are moving in the right direction. However, significant train 
accidents  continue  to  occur,  and  the  train  accident  rate  has  not  shown  substantial 
improvement in recent years. Moreover, recent train accidents have highlighted spe-
cific  issues  that  need  prompt  government  and  industry  attention,  and  the  strong 
growth  of  rail  and  highway  traffic  continues  to  drive  up  exposure  at  highway-rail 
grade  crossings.  FRA  developed  its  Railroad  Safety  Action  Plan  to  address  these 
critical issues, and Secretary Mineta announced the plan in May 2005. 

This Action Plan will:
• Target the most frequent, highest risk causes of accidents; 
• Focus FRA’s oversight and inspection resources; and 
• Accelerate research efforts that have the potential to mitigate the largest risks.
FRA’s  plan  includes  initiatives  in  several  areas:  reducing  human  factor-caused 
train accidents; acting to address the serious problem of fatigue among railroad op-
erating  employees;  improving  track  safety;  enhancing  hazardous  materials  safety 
and emergency preparedness; improving highway-rail grade crossing safety; and bet-
ter focusing FRA’s resources (inspections and enforcement) on areas of greatest safe-
ty concern. One of the primary elements of the Action Plan is FRA’s implementation 
of  its  National  Inspection  Plan,  which  uses  sophisticated  trend  analysis  to  ensure 
that  FRA  is  properly  allocating  its  inspectors  within  the  regions  so  that  they  are 
directing  their  efforts  toward  the  railroads  that  pose  the  highest  risks.  In  addition, 
FRA  has  developed  guidance  for  its  inspectors  in  each  discipline  to  help  them  use 
all  available  data  to  focus  not  only  on  the  railroads  with  the  highest  risks  but  also 
on the particular kinds of noncompliance that involve the most significant hazards. 
FRA  has  begun  to  move  forward  on  all  of  the  elements  of  its  Action  Plan,  and 
has  implemented  its  National  Inspection  Plan  in  the  three  areas  that  account  for 
more  than  75  percent  of  all  train  accidents:  human  factors;  track;  and  equipment. 
FRA’s Role in Railroad Security 

Since the terrorist attacks on September 11, 2001, FRA has been actively engaged 
in the railroad industry’s response to the threat of terrorism. The railroads have de-
veloped their own security plans, and FRA has worked with the railroads, rail labor, 
and  law  enforcement  personnel  to  develop  the  Railway  Alert  Network  for  the  dis-
tribution  of  information  and  intelligence  on  security  issues.  Working  with  the  Fed-
eral  Transit  Administration,  another  DOT  agency,  we  have  participated  in  security 
risk  assessments  on  commuter  railroads.  FRA’s  security  director  works  on  a  daily 
basis  to  facilitate  communications  on  security  issues  between  government  agencies 
and the railroad industry. 

In 2003, PHMSA (then the Research and Special Programs Administration) issued 
a rule requiring transporters and shippers of certain hazardous materials to develop 
and adhere to security plans. PHMSA issued its rule under its authority, delegated 
from  the  Secretary,  to  ‘‘prescribe  regulations  for  the  safe  transportation,  including 
security,  of  hazardous  materials,’’  49  U.S.C.  5103(b)(1).  Under  the  rule,  security 
plans must include an assessment of security risks and appropriate measures to ad-
dress those risks. The plans must, at a minimum, address three specific areas—per-
sonnel security, unauthorized access, and en route security. To assist railroads that 
transport hazardous materials and shippers that offer those materials for transport 
by rail, particularly small and medium-sized companies, to comply with this new re-
quirement,  FRA  field  personnel  have  spent  a  considerable  amount  of  time  in  out-
reach efforts. To date, FRA personnel have reviewed more than 3,600 security plans 
and more than 29,000 employee security training records. 

Since April 2004, FRA and PHMSA have also worked with DHS on a coordinated 
plan  to  improve  the  security  of  the  rail  transport  of  hazardous  materials  classified 
as  toxic  inhalation  hazards  (TIH).  These  include  materials  such  as  chlorine,  which 
is  used  in  water  filtration  plants,  and  anhydrous  ammonia,  which  is  used  exten-
sively  in  agriculture.  DHS’s  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  the 
lead on this project. TSA has led vulnerability assessments of a number of rail cor-
ridors  where  TIH  materials  are  transported.  DOT  and  TSA  published  a  notice  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

request for comments in the Federal Register asking for input on aspects of TIH rail 
shipments, the DOT security program requirement, and the need for additional reg-
ulation, 69 Fed. Reg. 50988 (Aug. 16, 2004). More than 100 comments were received, 
addressing the following issues:

• security plan improvements; 
• shipment identification and hazard communication; 
• temporary storage; 
• tank car integrity; and 
• communication and tracking.
DOT  is  considering  possible  amendments  to  the  PHMSA  security  plan  rule  that 

would enhance the security of the transportation of TIH materials. 

In  the  area  of  passenger  security,  FRA  inspectors  have  conducted  basic  security 
reviews  of  Amtrak  and  commuter  railroad  security  both  after  the  2004  train  bomb-
ings  in  Madrid  and  after  the  July  2005  transit  bombings  in  London.  In  both  cases, 
FRA inspectors were deployed immediately after the bombings to assess the security 
readiness  of  passenger  railroad  facilities  based  on  a  checklist  of  major  security  cri-
teria. In the aftermath of the London bombings, FRA worked closely on these secu-
rity  reviews  with  TSA’s  new  rail  security  inspectors.  TSA  focused  primarily  on 
urban  rapid  transit  lines,  while  FRA  inspectors  concentrated  on  commuter  and 
intercity passenger operations. In some situations, inspectors from the two agencies 
worked jointly. 

FRA  also  supports  research,  development,  and  demonstration  projects  related  to 
rail  security  through  its  Office  of  Research  and  Development  (OR&D),  often  in  co-
operation  with  DHS.  One  completed  project  to  evaluate  tank  car  security  and  two 
current,  follow-up  projects  provide  examples.  The  tank  car  security  evaluation 
project  was  conducted  jointly  by  FRA  OR&D  and  DHS  in  October  2003  at  FRA’s 
Transportation  Technology  Center,  Inc.,  in  Pueblo,  Colorado.  Its  first  purpose  was 
to evaluate the ability of hydrophones inside tank cars to detect breaches and to dis-
tinguish  noise  coming  from  a  breach  of  the  tank  car  from  other  background  noises 
such as those present in the normal tank car operating environment. Its second pur-
pose  was  to  develop  emergency  response  techniques,  tools,  and  procedures  to  plug 
punctures in pressurized tank cars caused by small arms fire or other means. A con-
fidential  report  has  been  completed.  The  acoustic  signatures  of  the  small  arms  fire 
and  other  projectiles  were  recorded  from  both  the  hydrophones  and  accelerometers. 
The  results  of  this  test  proved  the  feasibility  of  developing  algorithms  to  monitor 
tank  cars  while  under  load.  As  a  follow-on  to  this  test,  DHS  and  FRA  funded  an 
effort  to  look  at  the  effects  of  small  arms  fire  on  tank  cars  and  the  use  of  hydro-
phones to sense a ‘‘hit.’’ Development of the algorithm for detecting a hazardous ma-
terial release event continues. 

As  a  result  of  these  tests,  the  Association  of  American  Railroads  (AAR)  and  con-
tractors  have  examined  various  methods  to  ‘‘harden’’  tank  cars.  All  of  the  options 
to  ‘‘armor’’  tank  cars  available  with  today’s  technology  are  either  too  heavy  or  so 
expensive as to be economically impractical. FRA has learned about a new material, 
Dragon Shield, which is currently being used for armor coating military vehicles in 
Iraq.  The  Railway  Supply  Institute,  the  American  Chemistry  Council,  the  Chlorine 
Institute,  and  the  AAR  have  worked  with  DHS  and  FRA  in  putting  together  a  test 
plan  to  determine  the  feasibility  of  using  this  liquid  armor  (Dragon  Shield)  tech-
nology to reduce tank car vulnerability based upon the threat previously identified. 
Testing of the material will start in FY 2006. FRA’s Office of Research and Develop-
ment will continue to partner with DHS on these and other security initiatives. 

In September 2004, DOT and DHS entered into a memorandum of understanding 
(MOU)  concerning  their  respective  roles  on  security  issues.  The  MOU  notes  that 
DHS  has  the  primary  responsibility  for  security  in  all  modes  of  transportation  and 
that  DOT  plays  a  supporting  role,  but  notes  that  both  agencies  have  regulatory  re-
sponsibilities in the area of transportation security. The MOU requires early coordi-
nation between the parties on the development of regulations affecting security. The 
MOU  also  contemplates  the  development  of  separate  annexes  on  specific  task  and 
areas of responsibility. DOT and DHS have executed an annex concerning their joint 
project  on  the  security  of  the  transportation  of  TIH  materials.  FRA  has  also  pre-
pared  a  draft  annex  concerning  rail  security  issues  in  general  and  has  recently 
shared that draft with TSA. We hope to complete that annex soon. 
FRA’s Cooperation with TSA’s New Inspection Force 

The FY 2005 DHS Appropriations Bill Conference Report No. 108–774 earmarked 
$10 million for TSA to deploy up to 100 Federal rail security compliance inspectors. 
The  first  class  of  these  inspectors  completed  training  in  early  June  2005,  and  since 
then  FRA  has  worked  closely  with  the  managers  of  TSA’s  new  inspection  program. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

Through  regular  meetings  and  frequent  contacts,  we  are  developing  working  rela-
tionships at the headquarters and field levels of both agencies. We are trying to en-
sure that the two agencies’ roles are clearly distinguished and do not result in dupli-
cative inspections of the rail industry. As mentioned previously, inspectors from the 
two agencies have already engaged in a successful joint security review of passenger 
operations. 

As  TSA’s  full  complement  of  inspectors  becomes  fully  functional,  FRA  anticipates 
that  there  will  be  less  need  for  FRA  inspectors  to  participate  in  activities  related 
purely  to  security.  FRA’s  safety  mission  is  critical  and  requires  the  constant  atten-
tion  of  its  inspection  force.  Of  course,  if  FRA’s  inspectors  are  needed  to  support 
TSA’s  efforts  for  a  limited  duration  in  a  time  of  an  elevated  security  threat,  FRA 
will make every effort to provide that support. Moreover, in those areas such as haz-
ardous  materials  transportation  where  safety  and  security  are  significantly  inter-
related,  FRA  inspectors  will  continue  to  play  an  active  role  (e.g.,  in  enforcing 
PHMSA’s security plan regulations). 
Conclusion 

FRA’s  primary  mission  is  helping  to  ensure  the  safety  of  railroad  transportation. 
In  some  areas,  such  as  hazardous  materials  transportation,  safety  and  security  are 
inextricably intertwined, which means that FRA’s safety activities will no doubt con-
tinue  to  have  an  effect  on  security.  In  general,  however,  FRA’s  role  is  to  support 
DHS and TSA in carrying out their security responsibilities, to the extent FRA can 
do so within its present authority and with its current resources.

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Ms.  Berrick,  Director  of 

SECURITY  AND 

Homeland Security and Justice at GAO, please? 
STATEMENT  OF  CATHLEEN  A.  BERRICK,  DIRECTOR,
ISSUES,  U.S.

HOMELAND 
GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Ms. BERRICK. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Senator McCain, for 
the  opportunity  to  discuss  passenger  rail  security  in  the  United 
States.  My  testimony  today  focuses  on  actions  DHS  has  taken  to 
assess  the  risk  posed  by  terrorism  to  the  rail  system.  Federal  ac-
tions  taken  to  enhance  passenger  rail  security  and  security  prac-
tices  implemented  by  domestic  and  selected  foreign  passenger  rail 
operators. 

JUSTICE 

DHS,  in  conjunction  with  its  grant-making  authority,  has  com-
pleted  numerous  risk  assessments  of  passenger  rail  systems 
around  the  country  and  has  provided  technical  assistance  and 
training  to  rail  operators.  The  Department  has  also  begun  to  de-
velop  an  overall  framework  to  help  agencies  in  the  private  sector 
develop a consistent approach for analyzing and comparing risks to 
transportation and to other sectors. 

TSA,  as  the  lead  agency  responsible  for  securing  all  modes  of 
transportation, has also begun to conduct risk assessments and es-
tablish a methodology for analyzing and characterizing risks. How-
ever, these efforts have not yet been completed or fully coordinated 
within  the  Federal  Government  and  with  rail  operators.  TSA  has 
also  missed  deadlines  in  issuing  its  Transportation  Sector  Specific 
Plan, which is required by law and it’s to identify and prioritize in-
frastructure protection efforts and key resources. 

Until  these  efforts  are  completed,  it  may  not  be  possible  to  com-
pare  risks  within  the  rail  sector  and  across  different  sectors, 
prioritize them and allocate resources accordingly. 

After  the  9/11  attacks,  the  Department  of  Transportation  took 
several  actions  to  strengthen  rail  security,  including  providing  se-
curity  training  to  rail  operators  and  technical  assistance  in  con-
ducting risk assessments. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

More recently, following the Madrid bombings, TSA issued emer-
gency security directives to rail operators and pilot tested explosive 
detection technology for use in the rail system. However, some Fed-
eral and rail stake holders question the feasability of implementing 
and  complying  with  these  directives,  claiming  that  they  were  not 
always  based  on  industry  best  practices  or  were  unclear.  TSA  also 
had  not  yet  developed  criteria  or  procedures  for  rail  inspectors  to 
use in enforcing compliance with the directives. 

In  response  to  a  prior  recommendation,  DHS  and  DOT  signed  a 
Memorandum  of  Understanding  last  year,  intended  to  improve  co-
ordination among Federal agencies and with rail stakeholders. And 
recently,  in  September  of  2005,  signed  a  transit  security  annex  to 
this  MOU.  We  are  hopeful  that  this  effort  will  increase  coordina-
tion  between  the  two  departments  and  stakeholders  to  create  a 
more unified and effective approach to securing rail. 

We also found that domestic and foreign passenger rail operators 
have  generally  taken  similar  actions  to  secure  their  rail  systems. 
For  example,  most  have  implemented  customer  awareness  pro-
grams,  to  encourage  passengers  to  report  suspicious  activities,  in-
creased  the  number  and  visibility  of  security  personnel  and  up-
graded their security technologies. 

However,  we  also  observe  security  practices  among  certain  for-
eign  rail  operators  or  their  governments  that  are  not  currently 
used or used to the same degree in the United States. These prac-
tices  include  the  random  screening  of  passengers  and  their  bags, 
the  utilization  of  covert  testing  to  help  keep  employees  alert  to  se-
curity  threats,  and  building  security  into  the  design  and  refur-
bishing  of  rail  stations.  We  also  found  that  certain  foreign  govern-
ments maintain a clearinghouse of rail security technologies, which 
is not currently done in the U.S. 

In  conclusion,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  are  encouraged  by  the  steps 
DHS has taken to use elements of a risk management approach to 
guide infrastructure protection decisions for rail and across all sec-
tors.  However,  we  believe  that  enhanced  Federal  leadership  is 
needed to help ensure that actions and investments designed to en-
hance security are properly focused and prioritized. Mr. Chairman, 
this  concludes  my  opening  statement.  I’d  be  happy  to  respond  to 
any questions at the appropriate time. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Berrick follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CATHLEEN A. BERRICK, DIRECTOR, HOMELAND SECURITY 

AND JUSTICE ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  on  passenger  and 
freight  rail  security.  The  London  rail  bombings  that  took  place  in  July—resulting 
in over 50 fatalities and more than 700 injuries—made clear that even when a vari-
ety  of  security  precautions  are  put  in  place,  passenger  rail  systems  that  move  high 
volumes of passengers on a daily basis remain vulnerable to terrorist attack. While 
securing the U.S. passenger rail system is a daunting task—a shared responsibility 
requiring  coordinated  action  on  the  part  of  Federal,  State,  and  local  governments 
and  the  private  sector—it  is  important  nonetheless  to  take  the  necessary  steps  to 
identify and mitigate risks to passenger rail systems. 

As we have reported previously, the sheer number of stakeholders involved in se-
curing  these  systems  can  lead  to  communication  challenges,  duplication  of  effort, 
and  confusion  about  roles  and  responsibilities.  Key  Federal  stakeholders  with  crit-
ical roles to play within the rail sector include the Transportation Security Adminis-
tration (TSA), which is responsible for transportation security overall, and the Office 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

for Domestic Preparedness (ODP), which provides grant funds to rail operators and 
conducts  risk  assessments  for  passenger  rail  agencies,  both  within  the  Department 
of  Homeland  Security  (DHS);  and  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA)  and 
Federal  Railroad  Administration  (FRA),  both  within  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  (DOT).  One  of  the  critical  challenges  facing  these  Federal  agencies,  and  rail 
system  operators  they  oversee  or  support,  is  finding  ways  to  protect  rail  systems 
from  potential  terrorist  attacks  without  compromising  the  accessibility  and  effi-
ciency of rail travel. 

At  the  Federal  level,  another  significant  challenge  to  securing  rail  systems  in-
volves  allocation  of  resources.  The  U.S.  passenger  rail  systems  represent  one  of 
many  modes  of  transportation—along  with  aviation,  maritime,  and  others—com-
peting for limited Federal security resources. Within the passenger rail sector itself, 
there is competition for resources, as Federal, State, and local agencies and rail op-
erators  seek  to  identify  and  invest  in  appropriate  security  measures  to  safeguard 
these  systems  while  also  investing  in  other  capital  and  operational  improvements. 
Moreover,  given  competing  priorities  and  limited  homeland  security  resources,  dif-
ficult  policy  decisions  have  to  be  made  by  Congress  and  the  Executive  Branch  to 
prioritize  security  efforts  and  direct  resources  to  areas  of  greatest  risk  within  the 
passenger rail system, among all transportation modes, and across other nationally 
critical sectors. 

In  this  regard,  to  help  Federal  decision  makers  determine  how  to  best  allocate 
limited resources, we have advocated, the National Commission on Terrorist Attacks 
Upon  the  United  States  (the  9/11  Commission)  has  recommended,  and  the  subse-
quent  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004  requires,  that  a 
risk  management  approach  be  employed  to  guide  security  decision  making. 1 A  risk 
management approach entails a continuous process of managing risks through a se-
ries of actions, including setting strategic goals and objectives, assessing and quanti-
fying  risks,  evaluating  alternative  security  measures,  selecting  which  measures  to 
undertake,  and  implementing  and  monitoring  those  measures.  In  July  2005,  in  an-
nouncing his proposal for the reorganization of DHS, the Secretary of DHS declared 
that  as  a  core  principle  of  the  reorganization,  the  Department  must  base  its  work 
on priorities driven by risk. 

My  testimony  today  focuses  on  the  progress  Federal  agencies  and  domestic  pas-
senger  rail  operators  have  made  in  setting  and  implementing  security  priorities  in 
the  wake  of  September  11  and  terrorist  attacks  on  rail  systems,  and  the  security 
practices  implemented  by  foreign  passenger  rail  operators.  In  particular,  my  testi-
mony highlights three key areas: (1) the actions that DHS and its component agen-
cies  have  taken  to  assess  the  risks  posed  by  terrorism  to  the  U.S.  passenger  rail 
system in the context of prevailing risk management principles; (2) the actions that 
Federal agencies have taken to enhance the security of the U.S. passenger rail sys-
tem; and (3) the security practices that domestic and selected foreign passenger rail 
operators  have  implemented  to  mitigate  risks  and  enhance  security,  and  any  dif-
ferences in these practices. My comments today are based upon our recently issued 
report to Senators Snowe and Boxer of this Committee, the Chairman of the House 
Transportation  and  Infrastructure  Subcommittee  on  Railroads,  and  Representative 
Castle. 2

In summary:
• Within  DHS,  ODP  has  completed  numerous  risk  assessments  of  passenger  rail 
systems  around  the  country,  and  TSA  has  begun  to  conduct  risk  assessments 
as  well  as  establish  a  methodology  for  determining  how  to  analyze  and  charac-
terize  risks  that  have  been  identified.  Until  TSA  completes  these  efforts,  how-
ever, or sets timelines for doing so, the agency will not be able to prioritize pas-
senger  rail  assets  and  help  guide  security  investment  decisions.  At  the  depart-
ment level, DHS has begun developing, but has not yet completed a framework 
to  help  agencies  and  the  private  sector  develop  a  consistent  approach  for  ana-
lyzing  and  comparing  risks  to  transportation  and  other  sectors.  Until  this 
framework  is  finalized  and  shared  with  stakeholders,  it  may  not  be  possible  to 
compare  risks  across  different  sectors,  prioritize  them,  and  allocate  resources 
accordingly.
• In  addition  to  the  ongoing  initiatives  to  enhance  passenger  rail  conducted  by 
the FTA and FRA, in 2004, TSA issued emergency security directives to domes-
tic rail operators after terrorist attacks on the rail system in Madrid and piloted 
a test of explosive detection technology for use in passenger rail systems. How-
ever, Federal and rail industry officials raised questions about the feasibility of 
implementing  and  complying  with  these  directives,  citing  limited  opportunities 
to  collaborate  with  TSA  to  ensure  that  industry  best  practices  were  incor-
porated.  In  September  2004,  DHS  and  DOT  signed  a  memorandum  of  under-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

standing to improve coordination between the two agencies, and are developing 
agreements  to  delineate  specific  security-related  roles  and  responsibilities, 
among  other  things,  for  the  different  modes.  An  agreement  for  transit  security 
was signed in September 2005.

• Domestic and foreign passenger rail operators we contacted have taken a range 
of  actions  to  help  secure  their  systems.  Most,  for  example,  had  implemented 
customer  awareness  programs  to  encourage  passengers  to  remain  vigilant  and 
report suspicious activities, increased the number and visibility of their security 
personnel, increased the use of canine teams to detect explosives, enhanced em-
ployee  training  programs,  upgraded  security  technology,  tightened  access  con-
trols,  and  made  rail  system  design  improvements  to  enhance  security.  We  also 
observed  security  practices  among  certain  foreign  passenger  rail  systems  or 
their governments that are not currently used by the domestic rail operators we 
contacted, or by the U.S. Government, which could be considered for use in the 
United  States.  For  example,  some  foreign  rail  operators  randomly  screen  pas-
sengers or utilize covert testing to help keep employees alert to security threats, 
and some foreign governments maintain centralized clearinghouses on rail secu-
rity  technologies  and  best  practices.  While  introducing  any  of  these  security 
practices into the U.S. rail system may pose political, legal, fiscal, and cultural 
challenges, they may nevertheless warrant further examination.

In our September 2005 report on passenger rail security, we recommended, among 
other things, that to help ensure that the Federal Government has the information 
it  needs  to  prioritize  passenger  rail  assets  based  on  risk,  and  in  order  to  evaluate, 
select,  and  implement  commensurate  measures  to  help  the  Nation’s  passenger  rail 
operators  protect  their  systems  against  acts  of  terrorism,  TSA  should  establish  a 
plan  with  timelines  for  completing  its  methodology  for  conducting  risk  assessments 
and develop security standards that reflect industry best practices and can be meas-
ured  and  enforced,  by  using  the  Federal  rule-making  process.  In  addition,  we  rec-
ommended that the Secretary of DHS, in collaboration with DOT and the passenger 
rail  industry,  determine  the  feasibility,  in  a  risk  management  context,  of  imple-
menting  certain  security  practices  used  by  foreign  rail  operators.  DHS,  DOT,  and 
Amtrak generally agreed with the report’s recommendations. 
Background 
Overview of the Passenger Rail System 

Each weekday, 11.3 million passengers in 35 metropolitan areas and 22 states use 
some  form  of  rail  transit  (commuter,  heavy,  or  light  rail). 3 Commuter  rail  systems 
typically operate on railroad tracks and provide regional service (e.g., between a cen-
tral  city  and  adjacent  suburbs).  Commuter  rail  systems  are  traditionally  associated 
with  older  industrial  cities,  such  as  Boston,  New  York,  Philadelphia,  and  Chicago. 
Heavy  rail  systems—subway  systems  like  New  York  City’s  transit  system  and 
Washington,  D.C.’s  Metro—typically  operate  on  fixed  rail  lines  within  a  metropoli-
tan  area  and  have  the  capacity  for  a  heavy  volume  of  traffic.  Amtrak  operates  the 
Nation’s  primary  intercity  passenger  rail  service  over  a  22,000-mile  network,  pri-
marily  over  leased  freight  railroad  tracks. 4 Amtrak  serves  more  than  500  stations 
(240  of  which  are  staffed)  in  46  states  and  the  District  of  Columbia,  and  it  carried 
more than 25 million passengers in 2004. Figure 1 identifies the geographic location 
of rail transit systems and Amtrak within the United States.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

Passenger Rail Systems Are Inherently Vulnerable to Terrorist Attacks 

According to passenger rail officials and passenger rail experts, certain character-
istics of domestic and foreign passenger rail systems make them inherently vulner-
able  to  terrorist  attacks  and  therefore  difficult  to  secure.  By  design,  passenger  rail 
systems  are  open  (i.e.,  have  multiple  access  points,  hubs  serving  multiple  carriers, 
and,  in  some  cases,  no  barriers)  so  that  they  can  move  large  numbers  of  people 
quickly.  In  contrast,  the  U.S.  commercial  aviation  system  is  housed  in  closed  and 
controlled  locations  with  few  entry  points.  The  openness  of  passenger  rail  systems 
can leave them vulnerable because operator personnel cannot completely monitor or 
control  who  enters  or  leaves  the  systems.  In  addition,  other  characteristics  of  some 
passenger  rail  systems—high  ridership,  expensive  infrastructure,  economic  impor-
tance,  and  location  (e.g.,  large  metropolitan  areas  or  tourist  destinations)—also 
make them attractive targets for terrorists because of the potential for mass casual-
ties and economic damage and disruption. Moreover, some of these same character-
istics  make  passenger  rail  systems  difficult  to  secure.  For  example,  the  numbers  of 
riders  that  pass  through  a  subway  system—especially  during  peak  hours—may 
make the sustained use of some security measures, such as metal detectors, difficult 
because they could result in long lines that could disrupt scheduled service. In addi-
tion,  multiple  access  points  along  extended  routes  could  make  the  cost  of  securing 
each  location  prohibitive.  Balancing  the  potential  economic  impacts  of  security  en-
hancements with the benefits of such measures is a difficult challenge. 
Multiple Stakeholders Share Responsibility for Security Passenger Rail Systems 

Securing  the  Nation’s  passenger  rail  systems  is  a  shared  responsibility  requiring 
coordinated action on the part of Federal, State, and local governments; the private 
sector; and rail passengers who ride these systems. Since the September 11 attacks, 
the role of Federal Government agencies in securing the Nation’s transportation sys-
tems,  including  passenger  rail,  have  continued  to  evolve.  Prior  to  September  11, 
DOT—namely FTA and FRA—was the primary Federal entity involved in passenger 
rail  security  matters.  In  response  to  the  attacks  of  September  11,  Congress  passed 
the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA),  which  created  TSA  within 
DOT  and  defined  its  primary  responsibility  as  ensuring  security  in  all  modes  of 
transportation. 5 The  Act  also  gave  TSA  regulatory  authority  for  security  over  all 
transportation  modes.  ATSA  does  not  specify  TSA’s  roles  and  responsibilities  in  se-
curing the maritime and land transportation modes at the level of detail it does for 
aviation security. Instead, the Act broadly identifies that TSA is responsible for en-
suring  the  security  of  all  modes  of  transportation.  With  the  passage  of  the  Home-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

1
o
a
g
0
2
0
1

17

land  Security  Act  of  2002,  TSA  was  transferred,  along  with  over  20  other  agencies, 
to the Department of Homeland Security. 6 

With the creation of DHS in 2002, one of its components, ODP, became primarily 
responsible  for  overseeing  security  funding  for  passenger  rail  systems. 7 ODP  is  the 
principal  component  of  DHS  responsible  for  preparing  the  United  States  for  acts  of 
terrorism  and  has  primary  responsibility  within  the  executive  branch  for  assisting 
and supporting DHS, in coordination with other directorates and entities outside of 
the Department, in conducting risk analysis and risk management activities of state 
and  local  governments. 8 In  carrying  out  its  mission,  ODP  provides  training,  funds 
for  the  purchase  of  equipment,  support  for  the  planning  and  execution  of  exercises, 
technical  assistance,  and  other  support  to  assist  states,  local  jurisdictions,  and  the 
private sector to prevent, prepare for, and respond to acts of terrorism. Through the 
Urban  Area  Security  Initiative  (UASI)  grant  program,  ODP  has  provided  grants  to 
urban  areas  to  help  enhance  their  overall  security  and  preparedness  level  to  pre-
vent,  respond  to,  and  recover  from  acts  of  terrorism.  The  DHS  Appropriations  Act 
of  2005  appropriated  $150  million  for  rail  transit,  intercity  passenger  rail,  freight 
rail, and transit agency security grants. 9 With this funding, ODP created and is ad-
ministering  two  grant  programs  focused  specifically  on  transportation  security,  the 
Transit  Security  Grant  Program  and  the  Intercity  Passenger  Rail  Security  Grant 
Program. These programs provide financial assistance to address security prepared-
ness  and  enhancements  for  transit  (to  include  commuter,  heavy,  and  light  rail  sys-
tems; intracity bus; and ferry) and intercity rail systems. 

While  TSA  is  the  lead  Federal  agency  for  ensuring  the  security  of  all  transpor-
tation  modes,  FTA  conducts  nonregulatory  safety  and  security  activities,  including 
safety  and  security-related  training,  research,  technical  assistance,  and  demonstra-
tion projects. In addition, FTA promotes safety and security through its grant-mak-
ing authority. FRA has regulatory authority for rail safety over commuter rail oper-
ators  and  Amtrak,  and  employs  over  400  rail  inspectors  that  periodically  monitor 
the implementation of safety and security plans at these systems. 10 

State  and  local  governments,  passenger  rail  operators,  and  private  industry  are 
also important stakeholders in the Nation’s rail security efforts. State and local gov-
ernments  may  own  or  operate  a  significant  portion  of  the  passenger  rail  system. 
Even  when  state  and  local  governments  are  not  owners  and  operators,  they  are  di-
rectly affected by passenger rail systems that run within and through their jurisdic-
tions.  Consequently,  the  responsibility  for  responding  to  emergencies  involving  the 
passenger  rail  infrastructure  often  falls  to  state  and  local  governments.  Passenger 
rail  operators,  which  can  be  public  or  private  entities,  are  responsible  for  admin-
istering  and  managing  passenger  rail  activities  and  services.  Passenger  rail  opera-
tors  can  directly  operate  the  service  provided  or  contract  for  all  or  part  of  the  total 
service.  Although  all  levels  of  government  are  involved  in  passenger  rail  security, 
the  primary  responsibility  for  securing  passenger  rail  systems  rests  with  the  pas-
senger rail operators. 
Assessing  and  Managing  Risks  to  Rail  Infrastructure  Using  a  Risk

Management Approach 

In  recent  years,  we,  along  with  Congress  (most  recently  through  the  Intelligence 
Reform and Terrorism Prevention Act of 2004), 11 the executive branch (e.g., in pres-
idential  directives),  and  the  9/11  Commission  have  required  or  advocated  that  Fed-
eral agencies with homeland security responsibilities utilize a risk management ap-
proach to help ensure that finite national resources are dedicated to assets or activi-
ties  considered  to  have  the  highest  security  priority.  We  have  concluded  that  with-
out a risk management approach, there is limited assurance that programs designed 
to  combat  terrorism  are  properly  prioritized  and  focused.  Thus,  risk  management, 
as  applied  in  the  homeland  security  context,  can  help  to  more  effectively  and  effi-
ciently prepare defenses against acts of terrorism and other threats. 

A  risk  management  approach  entails  a  continuous  process  of  managing  risk 
through  a  series  of  actions,  including  setting  strategic  goals  and  objectives,  per-
forming  risk  assessments,  evaluating  alternative  actions  to  reduce  identified  risks 
by  preventing  or  mitigating  their  impact,  management  selecting  actions  to  under-
take, and implementing and monitoring those actions. Figure 2 depicts a risk man-
agement cycle that is our synthesis of government requirements and prevailing best 
practices previously reported.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

Setting  strategic  goals,  objectives,  and  constraints  is  a  key  first  step  in  imple-
menting  a  risk  management  approach  and  helps  to  ensure  that  management  deci-
sions are focused on achieving a strategic purpose. These decisions should take place 
in  the  context  of  an  agency’s  strategic  plan  that  includes  goals  and  objectives  that 
are clear, concise, and measurable. 

Risk assessment, a critical element of a risk management approach, helps decision 
makers  identify  and  evaluate  potential  risks  so  that  countermeasures  can  be  de-
signed and implemented to prevent or mitigate the effects of the risks. Risk assess-
ment  is  a  qualitative  and/or  quantitative  determination  of  the  likelihood  of  an  ad-
verse  event  occurring  and  the  severity,  or  impact,  of  its  consequences.  Risk  assess-
ment  in  a  homeland  security  application  often  involves  assessing  three  key  ele-
ments—threat, criticality, and vulnerability:

• A  threat  assessment  identifies  and  evaluates  potential  threats  on  the  basis  of 

factors such as capabilities, intentions, and past activities.

• A  criticality  or  consequence  assessment  evaluates  and  prioritizes  assets  and 
functions  in  terms  of  specific  criteria,  such  as  their  importance  to  public  safety 
and  the  economy,  as  a  basis  for  identifying  which  structures  or  processes  are 
relatively more important to protect from attack.

• A vulnerability assessment identifies weaknesses that may be exploited by iden-

tified threats and suggests options to address those weaknesses.

Information  from  these  three  assessments  contributes  to  an  overall  risk  assess-
ment that characterizes risks on a scale such as high, medium, or low and provides 
input  for  evaluating  alternatives  and  management  prioritization  of  security  initia-
tives. 12 The  risk  assessment  element  in  the  overall  risk  management  cycle  may  be 
the largest change from standard management steps and is central to informing the 
remaining steps of the cycle. 

The next step in a risk management approach—alternatives evaluation—considers 
what actions may be needed to address identified risks, the associated costs of tak-
ing these actions, and any resulting benefits. This information is then to be provided 
to  agency  management  to  assist  in  the  selection  of  alternative  actions  best  suited 
to the unique needs of the organization. An additional step in the risk management 
approach  is  the  implementation  and  monitoring  of  actions  taken  to  address  the 
risks, including evaluating the extent to which risk was mitigated by these actions. 
Once the agency has implemented the actions to address risks, it should develop cri-
teria  for  and  continually  monitor  the  performance  of  these  actions  to  ensure  that 
they are effective and also reflect evolving risk. 
Federal Agencies with Risk Management Responsibilities 

A  number  of  Federal  departments  and  agencies  have  risk  management  and  crit-
ical  infrastructure  protection  responsibilities  stemming  from  various  requirements. 
The Homeland Security Act of 2002, which created DHS, directed the Department’s 
Information  Analysis  and  Infrastructure  Protection  (IAIP)  Directorate  to  utilize  a 
risk  management  approach  in  coordinating  the  Nation’s  critical  infrastructure  pro-
tection  efforts.  This  includes  using  risk  assessments  to  set  priorities  for  protective 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

2
o
a
g
0
2
0
1

19

and  support  measures  by  the  Department,  other  Federal  agencies,  State  and  local 
government  agencies  and  authorities,  the  private  sector,  and  other  entities.  Home-
land  Security  Presidential  Directive  7  (HSPD–7)  defines  critical  infrastructure  pro-
tection  responsibilities  for  DHS,  sector-specific  agencies  (those  Federal  agencies 
given  responsibility  for  transportation,  energy,  telecommunications,  and  so  forth), 
and  other  departments  and  agencies.  The  President  instructs  Federal  departments 
and  agencies  to  identify,  prioritize,  and  coordinate  the  protection  of  critical  infra-
structure  to  prevent,  deter,  and  mitigate  the  effects  of  terrorist  attacks.  The  Sec-
retary of DHS is assigned several responsibilities by HSPD–7, including establishing 
uniform  policies,  approaches,  guidelines,  and  methodologies  for  integrating  Federal 
infrastructure  protection  and  risk  management  activities  within  and  across  sectors. 
To  ensure  the  coverage  of  critical  sectors,  HSPD–7  designated  sector-specific  agen-
cies for 17 critical infrastructure sectors. 13 These agencies are responsible for infra-
structure  protection  activities  in  their  assigned  sectors,  including  coordinating  and 
collaborating  with  relevant  Federal  agencies,  state  and  local  governments,  and  the 
private sector to carry out their responsibilities and facilitating the sharing of infor-
mation  about  vulnerabilities,  incidents,  potential  protective  measures,  and  best 
practices. 

Pursuant  to  HSPD–7  and  the  National  Infrastructure  Protection  Plan  (NIPP), 
DHS was designated as the sector-specific agency for the transportation sector, a re-
sponsibility  the  Department  has  delegated  to  TSA. 14 As  the  sector-specific  agency 
for  transportation,  TSA  is  required  to  develop  a  transportation  sector-specific  plan 
(TSSP) for identifying, prioritizing, and protecting critical transportation infrastruc-
ture  and  key  resources  that  will  provide  key  input  to  the  broader  National  Infra-
structure  Protection  Plan  to  be  prepared  by  IAIP.  DHS  issued  an  interim  NIPP  in 
February  2005  that  was  intended  to  serve  as  a  road  map  for  how  DHS  and  stake-
holders—including  other  Federal  agencies,  the  private  sector,  and  state  and  local 
governments—should  use  risk  management  principles  for  determining  how  to 
prioritize  activities  related  to  protecting  critical  infrastructure  and  key  resources 
within and among each of the 17 sectors in an integrated, coordinated fashion. DHS 
expects the next iteration of the NIPP to be issued in November 2005, with the sec-
tor-specific plans, including the TSSP, being incorporated into this plan in February 
2006.  HSPD–7  also  requires  DHS  to  coordinate  with  DOT  on  all  transportation  se-
curity matters. 
DHS  Has  Taken  Steps  to  Assess  Risk  to  Passenger  Rail  Systems,  but  Addi-

tional Work Is Needed to Guide Security Investments 

DHS component agencies have taken various steps to assess the risk posed by ter-
rorism  to  U.S.  passenger  rail  systems.  ODP  has  developed  and  implemented  a  risk 
assessment  methodology  intended  to  help  passenger  rail  operators  and  others  en-
hance their capacity to respond to terrorist incidents and identify and prioritize se-
curity  countermeasures.  As  of  July  2005,  ODP  had  completed  7  risk  assessments 
with rail operators and 12 others were under way. Further, TSA completed a threat 
assessment  for  mass  transit  and  rail  and  has  begun  to  identify  critical  rail  assets, 
but it has not yet completed an overall risk assessment for the passenger rail indus-
try.  DHS  is  developing  guidance  to  help  these  and  other  sector-specific  agencies 
work with stakeholders to identify and analyze risk. 
ODP  Has  Worked  with  Passenger  Rail  Operators  to  Develop  Risk  Assessments  to 

Help Prioritize Rail Security Needs and Investments 

In  2002,  ODP  began  conducting  risk  assessments  of  passenger  rail  operators 
through  its  Mass  Transit  Technical  Assistance  program.  These  assessments  are  in-
tended  to  help  passenger  rail  operators  and  port  authorities  enhance  their  capacity 
and  preparedness  to  respond  to  terrorist  incidents  involving  weapons  of  mass  de-
struction,  and  identify  and  prioritize  security  countermeasures  and  emergency  re-
sponse  capabilities.  ODP’s  approach  to  risk  assessment  is  generally  consistent  with 
the  risk  assessment  component  of  our  risk  management  approach.  The  agency  has 
worked  with  passenger  rail  operators  and  others  to  complete  several  risk  assess-
ments. As of July 2005, ODP had completed 7 risk assessments in collaboration with 
passenger  rail  operators. 15 Twelve  additional  risk  assessments  are  under  way,  and 
an  additional  11  passenger  rail  operators  have  requested  assistance  through  this 
program.  The  results  developed  in  the  threat,  criticality,  vulnerability,  and  impact 
assessments  are  then  used  to  develop  an  overall  risk  assessment  in  order  to  evalu-
ate  the  relative  risk  among  various  assets,  weapons,  and  modes  of  attack.  This  is 
intended  to  give  operators  an  indication  of  which  asset  types  and  threat  scenarios 
carry  the  highest  risk  that,  accordingly,  are  likely  candidates  for  early  risk  mitiga-
tion action. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

According  to  rail  operators  who  have  used  ODP’s  risk  assessment  methodology 
and  commented  about  it  to  DHS  or  us,  the  method  has  been  successful  in  helping 
to  devise  risk  reduction  strategies  to  guide  security-related  investments.  For  exam-
ple,  between  September  2002  and  March  2003,  ODP’s  technical  assistance  team 
worked with the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey (PANYNJ) to conduct 
a risk assessment of all of its assets—its Port Authority Trans-Hudson (PATH) pas-
senger rail system, as well as airports, ports, interstate highway crossings, and com-
mercial  properties. 16 According  to  PANYNJ  officials,  the  authority  was  able  to  de-
velop  and  implement  a  risk  reduction  strategy  that  enabled  it  to  identify  and  set 
priorities  for  improvements  in  security  and  emergency  response  capability  that  are 
being  used  to  guide  security  investments.  According  to  authority  officials,  the  risk 
assessment  that  was  conducted  was  instrumental  in  obtaining  management  ap-
proval for a 5-year, $500 million security capital investment program, as it provided 
a risk-based justification for these investments. 

The six other passenger rail operators that have completed ODP’s risk assessment 
process also stated that they valued the process. Specifically, operators said that the 
assessments  enabled  them  to  prioritize  investments  based  on  risk  and  are  already 
allowing  or  are  expected  to  allow  them  to  effectively  target  and  allocate  resources 
toward security measures that will have the greatest impact on reducing risk across 
their system. 
ODP  Has  Sought  to  Promote  Risk-Based  Decision  Making  Among  Federal  Agencies 

and Rail Operators 

On  the  basis  of  its  own  experience  with  conducting  risk  assessments  in  the  field, 
and  in  keeping  with  its  mission  to  develop  and  implement  a  national  program  to 
enhance the capacity of state and local agencies to respond to incidents of terrorism, 
ODP  has  offered  to  help  other  DHS  components  and  Federal  agencies  to  develop 
risk  assessment  tools,  according  to  ODP  officials.  For  example,  ODP  is  partnering 
with FRA, TSA, the American Association of Railroads (AAR), and others to develop 
a  risk  assessment  tool  for  freight  rail  corridors. 17 In  a  separate  Federal  outreach 
effort,  ODP  worked  with  TSA  to  establish  a  Federal  Risk  Assessment  Working 
Group to promote interagency collaboration and information sharing. In addition, in 
keeping  with  its  mission  to  deliver  technical  assistance  and  training,  ODP  has 
partnered  with  the  American  Public  Transportation  Association  (APTA)  to  inform 
passenger  rail  operators  about  its  risk  assessment  technical  assistance  program. 18 
Since  June  2004,  ODP  has  attended  five  APTA  conferences  or  workshops  where  it 
has set up information booths, made the tool kit available, and conducted seminars 
to educate passenger rail operators about the risk assessment process and its bene-
fits. 

ODP has leveraged its grant-making authority to promote risk-based funding deci-
sions for passenger rail. For example, passenger rail operators must have completed 
a risk assessment to be eligible for financial assistance through the Fiscal Year 2005 
Transit Security Grant Program administered by ODP. To receive these funds, pas-
senger  rail  operators  are  also  required  to  have  a  security  and  emergency  prepared-
ness plan that identifies how the operator intends to respond to security gaps identi-
fied  by  risk  assessments.  This  plan,  along  with  a  regional  transit  security  strategy 
prepared  by  regional  transit  stakeholders,  will  serve  as  the  basis  for  determining 
how the grant funds are to be allocated. 

Risk  assessments  are  also  a  key  driver  of  Federal  funds  distributed  through 
ODP’s  Fiscal  Year  2005  Intercity  Passenger  Rail  Grant  Program.  This  $7.1  million 
program  provides  financial  assistance  to  Amtrak  for  the  protection  of  critical  infra-
structure and emergency preparedness activities along Amtrak’s Northeast Corridor 
and  its  hub  in  Chicago.  Amtrak  is  required  to  conduct  a  risk  assessment  of  these 
areas in collaboration with ODP, in order to receive the grant funds. 19 A recent re-
view  of  Amtrak’s  security  posture  and  programs  conducted  by  the  RAND  Corpora-
tion and funded by FRA in 2004 found that no comprehensive terrorism risk assess-
ment  of  Amtrak  has  been  conducted  that  would  provide  an  empirical  baseline  for 
investment prioritization and decision making for Amtrak’s security policies and in-
vestment  plans.  As  another  condition  for  receiving  the  grant  funds,  Amtrak  is  re-
quired  to  develop  a  security  and  emergency  preparedness  plan  that,  along  with  the 
risk  assessment,  is  to  serve  as  the  basis  for  proposed  allocations  of  grant  funding. 
According to an Amtrak security official, it welcomes the risk assessment effort and 
plans  to  use  the  results  of  the  assessment  to  guide  its  security  plans  and  invest-
ments. According to ODP officials, as of July 2005, the Amtrak risk assessment was 
nearly 50 percent complete. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

TSA Has Begun to Assess Risks to Passenger Rail 

21

In October 2004, TSA completed an overall threat assessment for both mass tran-
sit and passenger and freight rail modes. 20 TSA began conducting a second risk as-
sessment  element—criticality  assessments  of  passenger  rail  stations—in  the  spring 
of 2004, but the effort had not been completed at the time of our review. According 
to  TSA,  a  criticality  assessment  tool  was  developed  that  considers  multiple  factors, 
such as the potential for loss of life or effects on public health; the economic impact 
of  the  loss  of  function  of  the  asset  and  the  cost  of  reconstitution;  and  the  local,  re-
gional,  or  national  symbolic  importance  of  the  asset.  These  factors  were  to  be  used 
to arrive at a criticality score that, in turn, would enable the agency to rank assets 
and facilities based on relative importance, according to TSA officials. 

To date, TSA has assigned criticality scores to nearly 700 passenger rail stations. 
In  May  2005,  TSA  began  conducting  assessments  for  other  passenger  rail  assets 
such  as  bridges  and  tunnels.  TSA  officials  told  us  that  as  of  July  2005,  they  had 
completed 73 criticality assessments for bridge and tunnel assets and expect to con-
duct  approximately  370  additional  assessments  in  these  categories.  Once  TSA  has 
completed  its  criticality  assessment,  a  senior  group  of  transportation  security  ex-
perts will review these scores and subsequently rank and prioritize them. As of July 
2005,  TSA  had  not  established  a  time  frame  for  completing  criticality  assessments 
for  passenger  rail  assets  or  for  ranking  assets,  and  had  not  identified  whether  it 
planned to do so. 

In 2003, TSA officials stated that they planned to work with transportation stake-
holders  to  rank  assets  and  facilities  in  terms  of  their  criticality.  HSPD–7  requires 
sector-specific  agencies  such  as  TSA  to  collaborate  with  all  relevant  stakeholders, 
including  Federal  departments  and  agencies,  state  and  local  governments,  and  oth-
ers.  In  addition,  DHS’s  interim  NIPP  states  that  sector-specific  agencies,  such  as 
TSA, are expected to work with stakeholders—such as rail operators—to determine 
the  most  effective  means  of  obtaining  and  analyzing  information  on  assets.  While 
TSA’s  methodology  for  conducting  criticality  assessments  calls  for  ‘‘facilitated  ses-
sions’’ involving TSA modal specialists, DOT modal specialists, and trade association 
representatives,  these  sessions  with  stakeholders  have  not  been  held.  According  to 
TSA  officials,  their  final  methodology  for  conducting  criticality  assessments  did  not 
include DOT modal specialists and trade associations. With respect to rail operators, 
TSA  officials  explained  that  their  risk  assessment  process  does  not  require  opera-
tors’ involvement. TSA analysts said they have access to a great deal of information 
(such  as  open  source  records,  satellite  imagery,  and  insurance  industry  data)  that 
can  facilitate  the  assessment  process.  However,  when  asked  to  comment  on  TSA’s 
ability  to  identify  critical  assets  in  passenger  rail  systems,  APTA  officials  and  10 
rail  operators  we  interviewed  told  us  it  would  be  difficult  for  TSA  to  complete  this 
task without their direct input and rail system expertise. 

TSA  plans  to  rely  on  asset  criticality  rankings  to  prioritize  which  assets  it  will 
focus  on  in  conducting  vulnerability  assessments.  That  is,  once  an  asset,  such  as  a 
passenger rail station, is deemed to be most critical, then TSA would focus on deter-
mining  the  station’s  vulnerability  to  attacks.  TSA  plans  to  conduct  on-site  vulner-
ability  assessments  for  those  assets  deemed  most  critical.  For  assets  that  are 
deemed to be less critical, TSA has developed a software tool that it has made avail-
able  to  passenger  rail  and  other  transportation  operators  for  them  to  use  on  a  vol-
untary basis to assess the vulnerability of their assets. As of July 2005, the tool had 
not yet been used. According to APTA officials, passenger rail operators may be re-
luctant to provide vulnerability information to TSA without knowing how the agen-
cy  intends  to  use  such  information.  According  to  TSA,  it  is  difficult,  if  not  impos-
sible,  to  project  any  timelines  regarding  completion  of  vulnerability  assessments  in 
the  transportation  sector  because  rail  operators  are  not  required  to  submit  them. 
In this regard, while the rail operators are not required to submit this information, 
as the sector-specific agency for transportation, TSA is required by HSPD–7 to com-
plete  vulnerability  assessments  for  the  transportation  sector.  Figure  3  illustrates 
the  overall  progress  TSA  had  made  in  conducting  risk  assessments  for  passenger 
rail assets as of July 2005.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

We recognize that TSA’s risk assessment effort is still evolving and TSA has had 
other  pressing  priorities,  such  as  meeting  the  legislative  requirements  related  to 
aviation security. However, until all three assessments of rail systems—threat, criti-
cality,  and  vulnerability—have  been  completed  in  sequence,  and  until  TSA  deter-
mines  how  to  use  the  results  of  these  assessments  to  analyze  and  characterize  risk 
(e.g.,  whether  high,  medium,  or  low),  it  may  not  be  possible  to  prioritize  passenger 
rail assets and guide investment decisions about protecting them. 

Finalizing  a  methodology  for  assessing  risk  to  passenger  rail  and  other  transpor-
tation  assets  and  conducting  the  assessments  are  key  steps  needed  to  produce  the 
plans  required  by  HSPD–7  and  the  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention 
Act  of  2004.  DHS  and  TSA  have  missed  both  deadlines  for  producing  these  plans. 
Specifically,  DHS  and  TSA  have  not  yet  produced  the  TSSP  required  by  HSPD–7 
to  be  issued  in  December  of  2004,  though  a  draft  was  prepared  in  November  2004. 
DHS  and  TSA  also  missed  the  April  1,  2005,  deadline  for  completing  the  national 
strategy  for  transportation  security  required  by  the  Intelligence  Reform  and  Ter-
rorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004.  In  an  April  2005  letter  to  Congress  addressing  the 
missed deadline, the DHS Deputy Secretary identified the need to more aggressively 
coordinate  the  development  of  the  strategy  with  other  relevant  planning  work  such 
as  the  TSSP,  to  include  further  collaboration  with  DOT  modal  administrations  and 
DHS components. The Deputy Secretary further stated that DHS expected to finish 
the  strategy  within  2  to  3  months.  However,  as  of  July  31,  2005,  the  strategy  had 
not been completed. In April 2005, senior DHS and TSA officials told us that in ad-
dition to DOT, industry groups such as APTA and AAR would also be more involved 
in  developing  the  TSSP  and  other  strategic  plans.  However,  as  of  July  2005,  TSA 
had not yet engaged these stakeholders in the development of these plans. 

As  TSA,  other  sector-specific  agencies,  and  ODP  move  forward  with  risk  assess-
ment  activities,  DHS  is  concurrently  developing  guidance  intended  to  help  these 
agencies  work  with  their  stakeholders  to  assess  risk.  HSPD–7  requires  DHS  to  es-
tablish  uniform  policies,  approaches,  guidelines,  and  methodologies  for  integrating 
Federal infrastructure protection and risk management activities within and across 
sectors.  To  meet  this  requirement,  DHS  has,  among  other  things,  been  working  for 
nearly  2  years  on  a  risk  assessment  framework  through  IAIP. 21 This  framework  is 
intended  to  help  the  private  sector  and  state  and  local  governments  to  develop  a 
consistent  approach  to  analyzing  risk  and  vulnerability  across  infrastructure  types 
and  across  entire  economic  sectors,  develop  consistent  terminology,  and  foster  con-
sistent results. The framework is also intended to enable a Federal-level assessment 
of risk in general, and comparisons among risks, for purposes of resource allocation 
and  response  planning.  DHS  has  informed  TSA  that  this  framework  will  provide 
overarching  guidance  to  sector-specific  agencies  on  how  various  risk  assessment 
methodologies  may  be  used  to  analyze,  normalize,  and  prioritize  risk  within  and 
among sectors. The interim NIPP states that the ability to rationalize, or normalize, 
results  of  different  risk  assessments  is  an  important  goal  for  determining  risk-re-
lated priorities and guiding investments. One core element of the DHS framework—
defining  concepts,  terminology,  and  metrics  for  assessing  risk—had  not  yet  been 
completed. The completion date for this element—initially due in September 2004—
has been extended twice, with the latest due date in June 2005. However, as of July 
31, 2005, this element has not been completed. 

Because neither this element nor the framework as a whole has been finalized or 
provided to TSA or other sector-specific agencies, it is not clear what impact, if any, 
DHS’s  framework  may  have  on  ongoing  risk  assessments  conducted  by,  and  the 
methodologies  used  by,  TSA,  ODP,  and  others,  and  whether  or  how  DHS  will  be 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

3
o
a
g
0
2
0
1

23

able  to  use  these  results  to  compare  risks  and  prioritize  homeland  security  invest-
ments among sectors. Until DHS finalizes this framework, and until TSA completes 
its  risk  assessment  methodology,  it  may  not  be  possible  to  determine  whether  dif-
ferent  methodologies  used  by  TSA  and  ODP  for  conducting  threat,  criticality,  and 
vulnerability assessments generate disparate qualitative and quantitative results or 
how they can best be compared and analyzed. In addition, TSA and others will have 
difficulty taking into account whether at some point TSA may be unnecessarily du-
plicating  risk  management  activities  already  under  way  at  other  agencies  and 
whether  other  agencies’  risk  assessment  methodologies,  and  the  data  generated  by 
these methodologies, can be leveraged to complete the assessments required for the 
transportation  sector.  In  the  future,  the  implementation  of  DHS’s  department-wide 
proposed reorganization could affect decisions relating to critical infrastructure pro-
tection  as  new  directorates  are  established,  such  as  the  directorates  of  policy  and 
preparedness,  and  other  preparedness  assets  are  consolidated  from  across  the  de-
partment. 
Multiple  Federal  Agencies  Have  Taken  Actions  to  Enhance  Passenger  Rail 

Security 

FTA and FRA were the primary Federal agencies involved in passenger rail secu-
rity matters prior to the creation of TSA. Before and after September 11, these two 
agencies launched a number of initiatives designed to strengthen passenger rail se-
curity. TSA also took steps to strengthen rail security, including issuing emergency 
security  directives  to  rail  operators  and  testing  emerging  rail  security  technologies 
for screening passengers and baggage. Rail industry stakeholders and Federal agen-
cy  officials  raised  questions  about  how  effectively  DHS  had  collaborated  with  them 
on rail security issues. DHS and DOT have signed a memorandum of understanding 
intended to identify ways that collaboration with Federal and industry stakeholders 
might be improved. 
DOT Agencies Led Initial Efforts to Enhance Passenger Rail Security 

Prior to the creation of TSA in November 2001, DOT agencies (i.e., modal admin-
istrations)—notably  FTA  and  FRA—were  primarily  responsible  for  the  security  of 
passenger rail systems. These agencies undertook a number of initiatives to enhance 
the security of passenger rail systems after September 11. FTA, using an $18.7 mil-
lion appropriation by the Department of Defense and Emergency Supplemental Ap-
propriations  Act  of  2002,  launched  a  multipart  transit  security  initiative,  much  of 
which  is  still  in  place.  The  initiative  included  security  readiness  assessments,  tech-
nical  assistance,  grants  for  emergency  response  drills,  and  training.  For  example, 
in 2003, FTA instituted the Transit Watch campaign—a nationwide safety and secu-
rity  awareness  program  designed  to  encourage  the  active  participation  of  transit 
passengers  and  employees  in  maintaining  a  safe  transit  environment.  The  program 
provides  information  and  instructions  to  transit  passengers  and  employees  so  that 
they know what to do and whom to contact in the event of an emergency in a transit 
setting.  FTA  plans  to  continue  this  initiative,  in  partnership  with  TSA  and  ODP, 
and offer additional security awareness materials that address unattended bags and 
emergency  evacuation  procedures  for  transit  agencies.  In  addition,  FTA  has  issued 
guidance,  such  as  its  Top  20  Security  Program  Action  Items  for  Transit  Agencies, 
which  recommends  measures  for  passenger  rail  operators  to  implement  into  their 
security programs to improve both security and emergency preparedness. 

FTA has also used research and development funds to develop guidance for secu-
rity  design  strategies  to  reduce  the  vulnerability  of  transit  systems  to  acts  of  ter-
rorism. In November 2004, FTA provided rail operators with security considerations 
for transportation infrastructure. This guidance provided recommendations intended 
to help operators deter and minimize attacks against their facilities, riders, and em-
ployees by incorporating security features into the design of rail infrastructure. 

FRA  has  also  taken  a  number  of  actions  to  enhance  passenger  rail  security  since 
September  11.  For  example,  it  has  assisted  commuter  railroads  in  developing  secu-
rity  plans,  reviewed  Amtrak’s  security  plans,  and  helped  fund  FTA  security  readi-
ness assessments for commuter railroads. More recently, in the wake of the Madrid 
terrorist bombings, nearly 200 FRA inspectors, in cooperation with DHS, conducted 
multi-day team inspections of each of the 18 commuter railroads and Amtrak to de-
termine  what  additional  security  measures  had  been  put  into  place  to  prevent  a 
similar  occurrence  in  the  United  States.  FRA  also  conducted  research  and  develop-
ment  projects  related  to  passenger  rail  security.  These  projects  included  rail  infra-
structure  security  and  trespasser  monitoring  systems  and  passenger  screening  and 
manifest projects, including explosives detection. 

Although  DOT  modal  administrations  now  play  a  supporting  role  in  transpor-
tation  security  matters  since  the  creation  of  TSA,  they  remain  important  partners 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

in  the  Federal  Government’s  efforts  to  improve  rail  security,  given  their  role  in 
funding  and  regulating  the  safety  of  passenger  rail  systems.  Moreover,  as  TSA 
moves  ahead  with  its  passenger  rail  security  initiatives,  FTA  and  FRA  are  con-
tinuing their passenger rail security efforts. 
TSA  Issued  Mandatory  Security  Directives  to  Rail  Operators  but  Faces  Challenges 

Related to Compliance and Enforcement 

In response to the March 2004 commuter rail attacks in Madrid and Federal intel-
ligence  on  potential  threats  against  U.S.  passenger  rail  systems,  TSA  issued  secu-
rity directives to the passenger rail industry in May 2004. TSA issued these security 
directives  to  establish  a  consistent  baseline  standard  of  protective  measures  for  all 
passenger  rail  operators,  including  Amtrak. 22 The  directives  were  not  related  to, 
and  were  issued  independent  of,  TSA’s  efforts  to  conduct  risk  assessments  to 
prioritize  rail  security  needs.  TSA  considered  the  measures  required  by  the  direc-
tives  to  constitute  mandatory  security  standards  that  were  required  to  be  imple-
mented  within  72  hours  of  issuance  by  all  passenger  rail  operators  nationwide.  In 
an effort to provide some flexibility to the industry, the directives allowed rail opera-
tors to propose alternative measures to TSA in order to meet the required measures. 
Table 1 contains examples of security measures required by these directives. 
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

TABLE 1: EXAMPLES OF MEASURES REQUIRED BY TSA SECURITY DIRECTIVES ISSUED 

TO PASSENGER RAIL OPERATORS AND AMTRAK 

TSA directives require passenger rail operators to:
• designate coordinators to enhance security-related communications with TSA;
• provide  TSA  with  access  to  the  latest  security  assessments  and  security  plans;
• reinforce employee watch programs;
• ask  passengers  and  employees  to  report  unattended  property  or  suspicious  be-
• remove  trash  receptacles  at  stations  determined  by  a  vulnerability  assessment 
to be at significant risk and only to the extent practical, except for clear plastic 
or bomb-resistant containers;

havior;

gage, terminals, and trains;

sources allow;

ations;

• install bomb-resistant trash cans to the extent resources allow;
• utilize  canine  explosive  detection  teams,  if  available,  to  screen  passenger  bag-
• utilize  surveillance  systems  to  monitor  for  suspicious  activity,  to  the  extent  re-
• allow TSA-designated canine teams at any time or place to conduct canine oper-
• conduct  frequent  inspections  of  key  facilities,  stations,  terminals,  or  other  crit-
• inspect  each  passenger  rail  car  for  suspicious  or  unattended  items,  at  regular 
• ensure  that  appropriate  levels  of  policing  and  security  are  provided  that  cor-
• lock  all  doors  that  allow  access  to  train  operators’  cab  or  compartment,  if 
• require  Amtrak  to  request  that  adult  passengers  provide  identification  at  the 

ical assets for persons and items that do not belong;

relate to DHS threat levels and threat advisories;

equipped with locking mechanisms;

periodic intervals;

initial point where tickets are checked. 

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Source: TSA.

Although  TSA  issued  these  directives,  it  is  unclear  how  TSA  developed  the  re-
quired  measures  contained  in  the  directives,  how  TSA  plans  to  monitor  and  ensure 
compliance  with  the  measures,  how  rail  operators  are  to  implement  the  measures, 
and which entities are responsible for their implementation. According to the former 
DHS Undersecretary for Border and Transportation Security, the directives were de-
veloped  based  upon  consultation  with  the  industry  and  a  review  of  best  practices 
in  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  systems  across  the  country  and  were  intended 
to  provide  a  Federal  baseline  standard  for  security.  TSA  officials  stated  to  us  that 
the directives were based upon FTA and APTA best practices for rail security. Spe-
cifically, TSA stated that it consulted a list of the top 20 actions FTA identified that 
rail  operators  can  take  to  strengthen  security,  FTA-recommended  protective  meas-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

ures and activities for transit agencies that may be followed based on current threat 
levels, and an APTA member survey. While some of the directives correlate to infor-
mation contained in the FTA guidance, such as advocating that rail personnel watch 
for  abandoned  parcels,  vehicles,  and  the  like,  the  source  for  many  of  the  directives 
is unclear. For example, the source material TSA consulted does not support the re-
quirement  that  train  cabs  or  compartment  doors  should  be  kept  locked.  Further-
more,  the  sources  do  not  necessarily  reflect  industry  best  practices,  according  to 
FTA  and  APTA  officials.  FTA’s  list  of  recommended  protective  measures  and  the 
practices identified in the APTA survey are not necessarily viewed as industry best 
practices.  For  example,  the  APTA  member  survey  that  TSA  used  reports  rail  secu-
rity practices that are in use by operators but which are not best practices endorsed 
by the group or other industry stakeholders. 

TSA officials have stated that they understood the importance of partnering with 
the  rail  industry  on  security  matters,  and  that  they  would  draw  on  the  expertise 
and  knowledge  of  the  transportation  industry  and  other  DHS  agencies,  as  well  as 
all  stakeholders,  in  developing  security  standards  for  all  modes  of  transportation, 
including  rail.  TSA  officials  held  an  initial  meeting  with  APTA,  AAR,  and  Amtrak 
officials  to  discuss  the  draft  directives  prior  to  their  issuance  and  told  them  that 
they  would  continue  to  be  consulted  prior  to  their  final  issuance.  However,  these 
stakeholders were not given an opportunity to comment on a final draft of the direc-
tives  before  their  release  because,  according  to  TSA,  DHS  determined  that  it  was 
important  to  release  the  directives  as  soon  as  possible  to  address  a  current  threat 
to  passenger  rail.  In  addition,  TSA  stated  that  because  the  directives  needed  to  be 
issued  quickly,  there  was  no  public  comment  as  part  of  the  rule-making  process. 
Shortly  after  the  directives  were  issued,  TSA’s  Deputy  Assistant  Administrator  for 
Maritime and Land Security told rail operators at an APTA conference we attended 
in  June  2004  that  if  TSA  determined  that  there  is  a  need  for  the  directives  to  be-
come  permanent,  they  would  undergo  a  notice-and-comment  period  as  part  of  the 
regulatory process. As of July 2005, TSA had not yet determined whether it intends 
to pursue the rule-making process with a notice and comment period. 

APTA  and  AAR  officials  stated  that  because  they  were  not  consulted  throughout 
the development of the directives, the directives did not, in their view, reflect a com-
plete understanding of the passenger rail environment or necessarily incorporate in-
dustry best practices. For example, APTA, AAR, and some rail operators raised con-
cerns about the feasibility of installing bomb-resistant trash cans in rail stations be-
cause they could direct the force of a bomb blast upward, possibly causing structural 
damage in underground or enclosed stations. DHS’s Office for State and Local Gov-
ernment  Coordination  and  Preparedness  recently  conducted  tests  to  determine  the 
safety and effectiveness of 13 models of commercially available bomb-resistant trash 
receptacles. At the time of our review, the results of these tests were not yet avail-
able. 

Amtrak  and  FRA  officials  raised  concerns  about  some  of  the  directives,  as  well, 
and told us they questioned whether the requirements reflected industry best prac-
tices. For example, before the directives were issued, Amtrak expressed concerns to 
TSA  about  the  feasibility  of  the  requirement  to  check  the  identification  of  all  adult 
passengers boarding its trains because it did not have enough staff to perform these 
checks.  However,  the  final  directive  included  this  requirement,  and  after  they  were 
released,  Amtrak  told  TSA  it  could  not  comply  with  this  requirement  ‘‘without  in-
curring  substantial  additional  costs  and  significant  detrimental  impacts  to  its  oper-
ations and revenues.’’ Amtrak officials told us that since passenger names would not 
be  compared  against  any  criminal  or  terrorist  watch  list  or  database,  the  benefits 
of  requiring  such  identification  checks  were  open  to  debate.  To  resolve  its  concern, 
and as allowed by the directive, Amtrak proposed, and TSA accepted, random iden-
tification checks of passengers as an alternative measure. FRA officials further stat-
ed  that  current  FRA  safety  regulations  requiring  engineer  compartment  doors  be 
kept unlocked to facilitate emergency escapes 23 conflicts with the security directive 
requirement  that  doors  equipped  with  locking  mechanisms  be  kept  locked.  This  re-
quirement  was  not  included  in  the  draft  directives  provided  to  stakeholders.  TSA 
did  call  one  commuter  rail  operator  prior  to  issuing  the  directives  to  discuss  this 
potential  proposed  measure,  and  the  operator  raised  a  concern  about  the  safety  of 
the locked door requirement. TSA nevertheless included this requirement in the di-
rectives. 

With  respect  to  how  the  directives  were  to  be  enforced,  rail  operators  were  re-
quired to allow TSA and DHS to perform inspections, evaluations, or tests based on 
execution  of  the  directives  at  any  time  or  location.  Upon  learning  of  any  instance 
of  noncompliance  with  TSA  security  measures,  rail  operators  were  to  immediately 
initiate  corrective  action.  Monitoring  and  ensuring  compliance  with  the  directives 
has posed challenges for TSA. In the year after the directives were issued, TSA did 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

not  have  dedicated  field  staff  to  conduct  on-site  inspections.  When  the  rail  security 
directives  were  issued,  the  former  DHS  Undersecretary  for  Border  and  Transpor-
tation  Security  stated  that  TSA  planned  to  form  security  partnership  teams  with 
DOT, including FRA rail inspectors, to help ensure that industry stakeholders com-
plied  with  the  directives.  These  teams  were  to  be  established  in  order  to  tap  into 
existing capabilities and avoid duplication of effort across agencies. As of July 2005, 
these  teams  had  not  yet  been  utilized  to  perform  inspections.  TSA  has,  however, 
hired rail compliance inspectors to, among other things, monitor and enforce compli-
ance  with  the  security  directives.  As  of  July  2005,  TSA  had  hired  57  of  up  to  100 
inspector positions authorized by Congress. 24 However, TSA has not yet established 
processes  or  criteria  for  determining  and  enforcing  compliance,  including  deter-
mining  how  rail  inspectors  or  DOT  partnership  teams  will  be  used  in  this  regard. 
Establishing  criteria  for  monitoring  compliance  with  the  directives  may  be  chal-
lenging because the language describing the required measures allows for flexibility 
and does not define parameters. In an effort to acknowledge the variable conditions 
that  existed  in  passenger  rail  environments,  TSA  designed  the  directives  to  allow 
flexibility  in  implementation  through  the  use  of  such  phrases  as  ‘‘to  the  extent  re-
sources allow,’’ ‘‘to the extent practicable,’’ and ‘‘if available.’’ The directives also in-
clude  nonspecific  instructions  that  may  be  difficult  to  measure  or  monitor,  telling 
operators  to,  for  example,  perform  inspections  of  key  facilities  at  ‘‘regular  periodic 
intervals’’  or  to  conduct  ‘‘frequent  inspections’’  of  passenger  rail  cars.  When  the  di-
rectives  were  issued,  TSA  stated  that  it  would  provide  rail  operators  with  perform-
ance-based  guidance  and  examples  of  announcements  and  signs  that  could  be  used 
to  meet  the  requirements  of  the  directives,  including  guidance  on  the  appropriate 
frequency  and  method  for  inspecting  rail  cars  and  facilities.  However,  as  of  July 
2005, this information had not been provided. 

Industry  stakeholders  we  interviewed  raised  questions  about  how  they  were  to 
comply  with  the  measures  contained  in  the  directives  and  which  entities  were  re-
sponsible  for  implementing  the  measures.  According  to  an  AAR  official,  in  June 
2004, AAR officials and rail operators held a conference call with TSA to obtain clar-
ification on these issues. According to AAR officials, in response to an inquiry about 
what would constitute compliance for some of the measures, the then-TSA Assistant 
Administrator  for  Maritime  and  Land  Security  told  participants  that  the  directives 
were  not  intended  to  be  overly  prescriptive  but  were  guidelines,  and  that  operators 
would  have  the  flexibility  to  implement  the  directives  as  they  saw  fit.  The  officials 
also  asked  for  clarification  on  who  was  legally  responsible  for  ensuring  compliance 
for  measures  where  assets,  such  as  rail  stations,  were  owned  by  freight  railroads 
or  private  real  estate  companies.  According  to  AAR  officials,  TSA  told  them  it  was 
the  responsibility  of  the  rail  operators  and  asset  owners  to  work  together  to  deter-
mine  these  responsibilities.  However,  according  to  AAR  and  rail  operators,  given 
that TSA has hired rail inspectors and indicated its intention to enforce compliance 
with the directives, it is critical that TSA clarify what compliance entails for meas-
ures  required  by  the  directives  and  which  entities  are  responsible  for  compliance 
with  measures  when  rail  assets  are  owned  by  one  party  but  operated  by  another—
such as when private companies that own terminals or stations provide services for 
commuter rail operations. 

The  challenges  TSA  has  faced  in  developing  security  directives  as  standards  that 
reflect industry best practices—and that can be measured and enforced—stem from 
the  original  emergency  nature  of  the  directives,  which  were  issued  with  limited 
input  and  review.  TSA  told  rail  industry  stakeholders  when  the  directives  were 
issued 15 months ago that the agency would consider using the Federal rule-making 
process  as  a  means  of  making  the  standards  permanent.  Doing  so  would  require 
TSA  to  hold  a  notice-and-comment  period,  resulting  in  a  public  record  that  reflects 
stakeholders’  input  on  the  applicability  and  feasibility  of  implementing  the  direc-
tives,  along  with  TSA’s  rationale  for  accepting  or  rejecting  this  input.  While  there 
is  no  guarantee  that  this  process  would  produce  more  effective  security  directives, 
it would be more transparent and could help TSA in developing standards that are 
most  appropriate  for  the  industry  and  can  be  measured,  monitored,  and  enforced. 
TSA Has Begun Testing Rail Security Technologies 

In  addition  to  issuing  security  directives,  TSA  also  sought  to  enhance  passenger 
rail security by conducting research on technologies related to screening passengers 
and  checked  baggage  in  the  passenger  rail  environment.  Beginning  in  May  2004, 
TSA conducted a Transit and Rail Inspection Pilot (TRIP) study, in partnership with 
DOT, Amtrak, the Connecticut Department of Transportation, the Maryland Transit 
Administration,  and  the  Washington  Metropolitan  Area  Transit  Authority 
(WMATA). TRIP was a $1.5 million, three-phase effort to test the feasibility of using 
existing  and  emerging  technologies  to  screen  passengers,  carry-on  items,  checked 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

baggage,  cargo,  and  parcels  for  explosives.  Figure  4  summarizes  TRIP’s  three-
phased approach.

27

According  to  TSA,  all  three  phases  of  the  TRIP  program  were  completed  by  July 
2004.  However,  TSA  has  not  yet  issued  a  planned  report  analyzing  whether  the 
technologies  could  be  used  effectively  to  screen  rail  passengers  and  their  baggage. 
According  to  TSA  officials,  a  report  on  results  and  lessons  learned  from  TRIP  is 
under  review  by  DHS.  TSA  officials  told  us  that  based  upon  preliminary  analyses, 
the screening technologies and processes tested would be very difficult to implement 
on  more  heavily  used  passenger  rail  systems  because  these  systems  carry  high  vol-
umes of passengers and have multiple points of entry. However, TSA officials stated 
to  us  that  the  screening  processes  used  in  TRIP  may  be  useful  on  certain  long-dis-
tance  intercity  train  routes,  which  make  fewer  stops.  Further,  officials  stated  that 
screening  could  be  used  either  randomly  or  for  all  passengers  during  certain  high-
risk  events  or  in  areas  where  a  particular  terrorist  threat  is  known  to  exist.  For 
example,  screening  technology  similar  to  that  used  in  TRIP  was  used  by  TSA  to 
screen certain passengers and belongings in Boston and New York during the Demo-
cratic and Republican national conventions, respectively, in 2004. 

APTA  officials  and  the  28  passenger  rail  operators  we  interviewed—all  who  are 
not  directly  involved  in  the  pilot—agreed  with  TSA’s  preliminary  assessment.  They 
told  us  they  believed  that  the  TRIP  screening  procedures  could  not  work  in  most 
passenger rail systems, given the number of passengers using these systems and the 
open  nature  (e.g.,  multiple  entry  points)  of  the  systems.  For  example,  as  one  oper-
ator  noted,  over  1,600  people  pass  through  dozens  of  access  points  in  New  York’s 
Penn  Station  per  minute  during  a  typical  rush  hour,  making  screening  of  all  pas-
sengers  very  challenging,  if  not  impossible.  Passenger  rail  operators  were  also  con-
cerned  that  screening  delays  could  result  in  passengers  opting  to  use  other  modes 
of  transportation.  APTA  officials  and  some  rail  operators  we  interviewed  said  that 
had  they  been  consulted  by  TSA,  they  would  have  recommended  alternative  tech-
nologies  to  explore  and  indicated  that  they  hoped  to  be  consulted  on  security  tech-
nology  pilot  programs  in  the  future.  FRA  officials  further  stated  that  TSA  could 
have  benefited  from  earlier  and  more  frequent  collaboration  with  them  during  the 
TRIP  pilot  than  occurred,  and  could  have  tapped  their  expertise  to  analyze  TRIP 
results and develop the final report. TSA research and development officials told us 
that  the  agency  has  begun  to  consider  and  test  security  technologies  other  than 
those  used  in  TRIP,  which  may  be  more  applicable  to  the  passenger  rail  environ-
ment.  For  example,  TSA’s  and  DHS’s  Science  and  Technology  Directorate  are  cur-
rently  evaluating  infrared  cameras  and  electronic  metal  detectors,  among  other 
things. 
DHS  and  DOT  Are  Taking  Steps  to  Improve  Coordination  and  Collaboration  With 

Federal Agencies and Industry Stakeholders 

In  response  to  a  previous  recommendation  we  made  in  a  June  2003  report  on 
transportation  security,  DHS  and  DOT  signed  a  memorandum  of  understanding 
(MOU) to develop procedures by which the two departments could improve their co-
operation  and  coordination  for  promoting  the  safe,  secure,  and  efficient  movement 
of  people  and  goods  throughout  the  transportation  system.  The  MOU  defines  broad 
areas of responsibility for each department. For example, it states that DHS, in con-
sultation  with  DOT  and  affected  stakeholders,  will  identify,  prioritize,  and  coordi-
nate the protection of critical infrastructure. The MOU between DHS and DOT rep-
resents  an  overall  framework  for  cooperation  that  is  to  be  supplemented  by  addi-
tional signed agreements, or annexes, between the departments. These annexes are 
to  delineate  the  specific  security-related  roles,  responsibilities,  resources,  and  com-
mitments  for  mass  transit,  rail,  research  and  development,  and  other  matters.  The 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

4
o
a
g
0
2
0
1

28

annex for mass transit security was signed in September 2005. 25 According to DHS 
and DOT officials, this annex is intended to ensure that the programs and protocols 
for incorporating stakeholder feedback and making enhancements to security meas-
ures  are  coordinated.  For  example,  the  annex  requires  that  DHS  and  DOT  consult 
on such matters as regulations and security directives that affect security and iden-
tifies points of contact for coordinating this consultation. 

In  addition  to  their  work  on  the  MOU  and  related  annexes,  DHS  and  TSA  have 
taken  other  steps  in  an  attempt  to  improve  collaboration  with  DOT  and  industry 
stakeholders. In April 2005, DHS officials stated that better collaboration with DOT 
and industry stakeholders was needed to develop strategic security plans associated 
with various homeland security presidential directives and statutory mandates, such 
as  the  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004,  which  required 
DHS  to  develop  a  national  strategy  for  transportation  security  in  conjunction  with 
DOT.  Responding  to  the  need  for  better  collaboration,  DHS  established  a  senior-
level steering committee in conjunction with DOT to coordinate development of this 
national  strategy.  In  addition,  senior  DHS  and  TSA  officials  stated  that  industry 
groups  will  also  be  involved  in  developing  the  national  strategy  for  transportation 
security  and  other  strategic  plans.  Moreover,  according  to  TSA’s  assistant  adminis-
trator for intermodal programs, TSA intends to work with APTA and other industry 
stakeholders in developing security standards for the passenger rail industry. 26
U.S. and Foreign Rail Operators Have Taken Similar Actions to Secure Rail 
Systems,  and  Opportunities  for  Additional  Domestic  Security  Actions 
May Exist 

U.S.  passenger  rail  operators  have  taken  numerous  actions  to  secure  their  rail 
systems  since  the  terrorist  attacks  of  September  11  in  the  United  States,  and  the 
March  11,  2004,  attacks  in  Madrid.  These  actions  included  both  improvements  to 
system  operations  and  capital  enhancements  to  a  system’s  facilities,  such  as  track, 
buildings, and train cars. All of the U.S. passenger rail operators we contacted have 
implemented some types of security measures—such as increased numbers and visi-
bility of security personnel and customer awareness programs—that were generally 
consistent  with  those  we  observed  in  select  countries  in  Europe  and  Asia.  We  also 
identified  three  rail  security  practices—covert  testing,  random  screening  of  pas-
sengers and their baggage, and centralized research and testing—utilized by foreign 
operators or their governments that are not currently utilized by domestic rail oper-
ators or the U.S. government. 27
Actions Taken by U.S. and Foreign Passenger Rail Operators to Strengthen Security 

Reflect Security Assessments, Budgetary Constraints, and Other Factors 

All 32 of the U.S. rail operators we interviewed or visited reported taking specific 
actions  to  improve  the  security  and  safety  of  their  rail  systems  by,  among  other 
things,  investing  in  new  security  equipment,  utilizing  more  law  enforcement  per-
sonnel,  and  establishing  public  awareness  campaigns.  Passenger  rail  operators  we 
spoke  with  cited  the  1995  sarin  gas  attacks  on  the  Tokyo  subway  system  and  the 
September  11  terrorist  attacks  as  catalysts  for  their  security  actions.  After  the  at-
tacks,  many  passenger  rail  operators  used  FTA’s  security  readiness  assessments  of 
heavy  and  passenger  rail  systems  as  a  guide  to  determine  how  to  prioritize  their 
security efforts, as well as their own understanding of their system’s vulnerabilities, 
to determine what actions to take to enhance security. Similarly, as previously men-
tioned,  the  rail  systems  that  underwent  ODP  risk  assessments  are  currently  using 
or  plan  to  use  these  assessments  to  guide  their  security  actions.  In  addition,  20  of 
the  32  U.S.  operators  we  contacted  or  visited  had  conducted  some  type  of  security 
assessment  internally  or  through  a  contractor,  separate  from  the  federally  funded 
assessments.  For  example,  some  assessments  evaluated  vulnerabilities  of  physical 
assets,  such  as  tunnels  and  bridges,  throughout  the  passenger  rail  system.  Pas-
senger rail operators stated that security-related spending by rail operators was also 
based, in part, on budgetary considerations, as well as other practices used by other 
rail operators that were identified through direct contact or during industry associa-
tion  meetings. 28 Passenger  rail  operators  frequently  made  capital  investments  to 
improve security, and these investments often are not part of Federal funding pack-
ages  for  new  construction  unless  they  are  part  of  new  facilities  being  constructed. 
According to APTA, 54 percent of transit agencies are facing increasing deficits, and 
no operator covers expenses with fare revenue; thus, balancing operational and cap-
ital improvements with security-related investments has been an ongoing challenge 
for  these  operators.  Several  foreign  rail  operators  we  interviewed  also  stated  that 
funding  for  security  enhancements  was  limited  in  light  of  other  funding  priorities 
within  the  rail  system,  such  as  personnel  costs  and  infrastructure  and  equipment 
maintenance. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

Foreign rail operators we visited also told us that risk assessments played an im-
portant  role  in  guiding  security-related  spending  for  rail.  For  example,  one  foreign 
rail  operator  with  a  daily  ridership  of  2.3  million  passengers  used  a  risk  manage-
ment  methodology  to  assess  risks,  threats,  and  vulnerabilities  to  rail  in  order  to 
guide  security  spending.  The  methodology  is  part  of  the  rail  operator’s  corporate 
focus  on  overall  safety  and  security  and  is  intended  to  help  protect  the  operator’s 
various rail systems against, among other things, terrorist attacks, as well as other 
forms of corporate loss, such as service disruption and loss of business viability. 
U.S. and Foreign Rail Operators Employ Similar Security Practices 

Both  U.S.  and  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  we  contacted  have  implemented 
similar  improvements  to  enhance  the  security  of  their  systems. 29 A  summary  of 
these efforts follows. 

Customer awareness: Customer awareness programs we observed used signage 
and  announcements  to  encourage  riders  to  alert  train  staff  if  they  observed  sus-
picious  packages,  persons,  or  behavior.  Of  the  32  domestic  rail  operators  we  inter-
viewed, 30 had implemented a customer awareness program or made enhancements 
to  an  existing  program.  Foreign  rail  operators  we  visited  also  attempt  to  enhance 
customer awareness. For example, 11 of the 13 operators we interviewed had imple-
mented a customer awareness program. Similar to programs of U.S. operators, these 
programs  used  signage,  announcements,  and  brochures  to  inform  passengers  and 
employees  about  the  need  to  remain  vigilant  and  report  any  suspicious  activities. 
Only one of the European passenger rail operators that we interviewed has not im-
plemented  a  customer  security  awareness  program,  citing  the  fear  or  panic  that  it 
might cause among the public. 

Increased  number  and  visibility  of  security  personnel:  Of  the  32  U.S.  rail 
operators  we  interviewed,  23  had  increased  the  number  of  security  personnel  they 
utilized  since  September  11  to  provide  security  throughout  their  system  or  had 
taken steps to increase the visibility of their security personnel. In addition to add-
ing  security  personnel,  many  operators  stated  that  increasing  the  visibility  of  secu-
rity  was  as  important  as  increasing  the  number  of  personnel.  For  example,  several 
U.S. and foreign rail operators we spoke with had instituted policies such as requir-
ing  their  security  staff,  in  brightly  colored  vests,  to  patrol  trains  or  stations  more 
frequently,  so  they  are  more  visible  to  customers  and  potential  terrorists  or  crimi-
nals. These policies make it easier for customers to contact security personnel in the 
event  of  an  emergency,  or  if  they  have  spotted  a  suspicious  item  or  person.  At  for-
eign sites we visited, 10 of the 13 operators had increased the number of their secu-
rity  officers  throughout  their  systems  in  recent  years  because  of  the  perceived  in-
crease in risk of a terrorist attack. 

Increased use of canine teams: Of the 32 U.S. passenger rail operators we con-
tacted, 21 had begun to use canine units, which include both dogs and human han-
dlers,  to  patrol  their  facilities  or  trains  or  had  increased  their  existing  utilization 
of such teams. Often, these units are used to detect the presence of explosives, and 
may  be  called  in  when  a  suspicious  package  is  detected.  Some  operators  that  did 
not  maintain  their  own  canine  units  stated  that  it  was  prohibitively  expensive  to 
do  so  and  that  they  could  call  in  local  police  canine  units  if  necessary.  In  foreign 
countries  we  visited,  passenger  rail  operators’  use  of  canines  varied.  In  some  Asian 
countries, canines were not culturally accepted by the public and thus were not used 
for  rail  security  purposes.  As  in  the  United  States,  and  in  contrast  to  Asia,  most 
European  passenger  rail  operators  used  canines  for  explosive  detection  or  as  deter-
rents. 

Employee  training:  All  of  the  domestic  and  foreign  rail  operators  we  inter-
viewed had provided some type of security training to their staff, either through in-
house  personnel  or  an  external  provider.  In  many  cases,  this  training  consisted  of 
ways  to  identify  suspicious  items  and  persons  and  how  to  respond  to  events  once 
they occur. For example, the London Underground and the British Transport Police 
developed  the  ‘‘HOT’’  method  for  its  employees  to  identify  suspicious  items  in  the 
rail  system.  In  the  HOT  method,  employees  are  trained  to  look  for  packages  or 
items  that  are  Hidden,  Obviously  suspicious,  and  not  Typical  of  the  environment. 
Items that do not meet these criteria would likely receive a lower security response 
than an item meeting all of the criteria. However, if items meet all of these criteria, 
employees are to notify station managers, who would call in the authorities and po-
tentially  shut  down  the  station  or  take  other  action.  According  to  London  Under-
ground  officials,  the  HOT  method  has  significantly  reduced  the  number  of  system 
disruptions caused when a suspicious item was identified. Several passenger rail op-
erators  in  the  United  States  and  abroad  have  trained  their  employees  in  the  HOT 
method.  Several  domestic  operators  had  also  trained  their  employees  in  how  to  re-
spond to terrorist attacks and provided them with wallet-size cards highlighting ac-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

30

tions they should take in response to various forms of attack. It is important to note 
that  training  such  as  the  HOT  method  is  not  designed  to  prevent  acts  of  terrorism 
like  the  July  2005  London  attacks,  where  suicide  bombers  killed  themselves  rather 
than leaving bombs behind. 

Passenger  and  baggage  screening  practices:  Some  domestic  and  foreign  rail 
operators  have  trained  employees  to  recognize  suspicious  behavior  as  a  means  of 
screening  passengers.  Eight  U.S.  passenger  rail  operators  we  contacted  were  uti-
lizing  some  form  of  behavioral  screening.  For  example,  the  Massachusetts  Bay 
Transportation  Authority  (MBTA),  which  operates  Boston’s  T  system,  has  utilized 
a behavioral screening system to identify passengers exhibiting suspicious behavior. 
The  Massachusetts  State  Police  train  all  MBTA  personnel  to  be  on  the  lookout  for 
behavior  that  may  indicate  someone  has  criminal  intent,  and  to  approach  and 
search  such  persons  and  their  baggage  when  appropriate.  Massachusetts  State  Po-
lice officers have been training rail operators on this behavior profiling system, and 
WMATA  and  New  Jersey  Transit  were  among  the  first  additional  operators  to  im-
plement the system. According to MBTA personnel, several other operators have ex-
pressed  interest  in  this  system.  Abroad,  we  found  that  4  of  13  operators  we  inter-
viewed  had  implemented  forms  of  behavioral  screening  similar  to  MBTA’s  system. 
All of the domestic and foreign rail operators we contacted have ruled out an air-
port-style screening system for daily use in heavy traffic, where each passenger and 
the  passenger’s  baggage  are  screened  by  a  magnetometer  or  X-ray  machine,  based 
on  cost,  staffing,  and  customer  convenience  factors,  among  others.  For  example,  al-
though  the  Spanish  National  Railway  screens  passenger  baggage  using  an  X-ray 
machine  on  certain  long-distance  trains  that  it  believes  could  be  at  risk,  all  of  the 
operators  we  contacted  stated  that  the  cost,  staffing  requirements,  delay  of  service, 
and  inconvenience  to  passengers  would  make  such  a  system  unworkable  in  highly 
trafficked,  inherently  open  systems  like  U.S.  and  foreign  passenger  rail  operations. 
In addition, one Asian rail official stated that his organization was developing a con-
tingency  plan  for  implementing  an  airport-style  screening  system,  but  that  such  a 
system would be used only in the event of intelligence information indicating suicide 
bomb  attacks  were  imminent,  or  if  several  attacks  had  already  occurred  during  a 
short  period  of  time.  According  to  this  official,  the  plan  was  in  the  initial  stages  of 
development,  and  the  organization  did  not  know  how  quickly  such  a  system  could 
be implemented. 

Upgrading  technology:  Many  rail  operators  we  interviewed  had  embarked  on 
programs  designed  to  upgrade  their  existing  security  technology.  For  example,  we 
found that 29 of the 32 U.S. operators had implemented a form of CCTV to monitor 
their stations, yards, or trains. While these cameras cannot be monitored closely at 
all  times,  because  of  the  large  number  of  staff  they  said  this  would  require,  many 
rail  operators  felt  the  cameras  acted  as  a  deterrent,  assisted  security  personnel  in 
determining  how  to  respond  to  incidents  that  have  already  occurred,  and  could  be 
monitored  if  an  operator  has  received  information  that  an  incident  may  occur  at  a 
certain  time  or  place  in  their  system.  One  rail  operator,  New  Jersey  Transit,  had 
installed ‘‘smart’’ cameras, which were programmed to alert security personnel when 
suspicious  activity  occurred,  such  as  if  a  passenger  left  a  bag  in  a  certain  location 
or  if  a  boat  were  to  dock  under  a  bridge.  According  to  the  New  Jersey  Transit  offi-
cials, this technology was relatively inexpensive and not difficult to implement. Sev-
eral  other  operators  stated  they  were  interested  in  exploring  this  technology. 
Abroad,  all  13  of  the  foreign  rail  operators  we  visited  had  CCTV  systems  in  place. 
As  in  the  United  States,  foreign  rail  operators  use  these  cameras  primarily  as  a 
crime  deterrent  and  to  respond  to  incidents  after  they  occur,  because  they  do  not 
have enough staff to continuously monitor all of these cameras. 

In  addition,  18  of  the  32  U.S.  rail  operators  we  interviewed  had  installed  new 
emergency  phones  or  enhanced  the  visibility  of  the  intercom  systems  they  already 
had.  Passengers  can  use  these  systems  to  contact  train  operators  or  security  per-
sonnel  to  report  suspicious  activity,  crimes  in  progress,  or  other  problems.  Further-
more, while most rail operators we spoke with had not installed chemical or biologi-
cal  agent  detection  equipment  because  of  the  costs  involved,  a  few  operators  had 
this  equipment  or  were  exploring  purchasing  it.  For  example,  WMATA,  in  Wash-
ington, D.C., has installed these sensors in some of its stations, thanks to a program 
jointly  sponsored  by  DOT  and  the  Department  of  Energy  that  provided  this  equip-
ment  to  WMATA  because  of  the  high  perceived  likelihood  of  an  attack  in  Wash-
ington, D.C. Also, at least three other domestic rail operators we spoke with are ex-
ploring the possibility of partnering with Federal agencies to install such equipment 
in their facilities on an experimental basis. 

Also,  as  in  the  United  States,  a  few  foreign  operators  had  implemented  chemical 
or  biological  detection  devices  at  these  rail  stations,  but  their  use  was  not  wide-
spread. Two of the 13 foreign operators we interviewed had implemented these sen-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

31

sors,  and  both  were  doing  so  on  an  experimental  basis.  In  addition,  police  officers 
from  the  British  Transport  Police—responsible  for  policing  the  rail  system  in  the 
United Kingdom—were equipped with pagers to detect chemical, biological, or radio-
logical  elements  in  the  air,  allowing  them  to  respond  quickly  in  case  of  a  terrorist 
attack using one of these methods. The British Transit Police also has three vehicles 
carrying  devices  to  determine  if  unattended  baggage  contains  explosives—these  ve-
hicles patrol the system 24 hours per day. 

Access control: Tightening access procedures at key facilities or rights-of-way is 
another  way  many  rail  operators  have  attempted  to  enhance  security.  A  majority 
of  domestic  and  selected  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  had  invested  in  enhanced 
systems  to  control  unauthorized  access  at  employee  facilities  and  stations.  Specifi-
cally, 23 of the 32 U.S. operators had installed a form of access control at key facili-
ties  and  stations.  This  often  involved  installing  a  system  where  employees  had  to 
swipe an access card to gain access to control rooms, repair facilities, and other key 
locations.  All  13  foreign  operators  had  implemented  some  form  of  access  control  to 
their  critical  facilities  or  rights-of-way.  These  measures  varied  from  simple  alarms 
on  doors  at  electrical  substations  on  one  subway  system  we  visited  to  infrared  sen-
sors monitoring every inch of right-of-way along the track on three of the high-speed 
interurban rail systems. 

Rail  system  design  and  configuration:  In  an  effort  to  reduce  vulnerabilities 
to  terrorist  attack  and  increase  overall  security,  passenger  rail  operators  in  the 
United  States  and  abroad  have  been,  or  are  now  beginning  to,  incorporate  security 
features  into  the  design  of  new  and  existing  rail  infrastructure,  primarily  rail  sta-
tions.  For  example,  of  the  32  domestic  rail  operators  we  contacted,  22  of  them  had 
removed  their  conventional  trash  bins  entirely,  or  replaced  them  with  transparent 
or bomb-resistant trash bins, as TSA instructed in its May 2004 security directives. 
Foreign  rail  operators  had  taken  steps  to  remove  traditional  trash  bins  from  their 
systems.  Of  the  13  operators  we  visited,  8  had  either  removed  their  trash  bins  en-
tirely or replaced them with blast-resistant cans or transparent receptacles. 

Many foreign rail operators are also incorporating aspects of security into the de-
sign  of  their  rail  infrastructure.  Of  the  13  operators  we  visited,  11  have  attempted 
to  design  new  facilities  with  security  in  mind  and  have  attempted  to  retrofit  older 
facilities  to  incorporate  security-related  modifications.  For  example,  one  foreign  op-
erator  we  visited  is  retrofitting  its  train  cars  with  windows  that  passengers  could 
open  in  the  event  of  a  chemical  attack.  In  addition,  the  London  Underground,  one 
of  the  oldest  rail  systems  in  the  world,  incorporates  security  into  the  design  of  all 
its new stations as well as when existing stations are modified. We observed several 
security features in the design of Underground stations, such as using vending ma-
chines  that  have  no  holes  that  someone  could  use  to  hide  a  bomb,  and  sloped  tops 
to  reduce  the  likelihood  that  a  bomb  can  be  placed  on  top  of  the  machine.  In  addi-
tion,  stations  are  designed  to  provide  staff  with  clear  lines  of  sight  to  all  areas  of 
the  station,  such  as  underneath  benches  or  ticket  machines,  and  station  designers 
try to eliminate or restrict access to any recessed areas where a bomb could be hid-
den. 

In  one  London  station,  we  observed  the  use  of  netting  throughout  the  station  to 
help  prevent  objects,  such  as  bombs,  from  being  placed  in  a  recessed  area,  such  as 
beneath  a  stairwell  or  escalator.  In  this  station  and  other  stations  we  visited,  Un-
derground  officials  have  installed  ‘‘help  posts’’  at  which  customers  can  call  for  help 
if an incident occurs. When these posts are activated, CCTV cameras display a video 
image  of  the  help  post  and  surrounding  area  to  staff  at  a  central  command  center. 
This allows the staff to directly observe the situation and respond appropriately. See 
figure 5 for a photograph of a help post.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

32

Underground officials stated that the incorporation of security features in station 
design  is  an  effective  measure  in  deterring  some  terrorists  from  attacking  the  sys-
tem. For example, officials told us that CCTV video recorded the efforts by Irish Re-
publican  Army  terrorists  attempting  to  place  an  explosive  device  inside  a  station—
and  when  they  could  not  find  a  suitable  location  to  hide  the  device,  they  placed  it 
outside in a trash can instead, thereby mitigating the impact of the explosion. 

In  the  United  States,  several  passenger  rail  operators  stated  that  they  were  tak-
ing  security  into  account  when  designing  new  facilities  or  remodeling  older  ones. 
Twenty-two of 32 rail operators we interviewed told us that they were incorporating 
security  into  the  design  of  new  or  existing  rail  infrastructure.  For  example,  New 
York  City  Transit  and  PATH  officials  told  us  they  are  incorporating  security  into 
the  design  of  its  new  stations,  including  the  redesigned  Fulton  Street  station  and 
the World Trade Center Hub that were damaged or destroyed during the September 
11  attacks.  In  addition,  in  June  2005,  FTA  issued  guidelines  for  use  by  the  transit 
industry  encouraging  the  incorporation  of  particular  security  features  into  the  de-
sign of transit infrastructure. These guidelines include, for example, increasing visi-
bility  for  onboard  staff,  reducing  the  areas  where  someone  could  hide  an  explosive 
device on a transit vehicle, and enhancing emergency exits in transit stations. 

Figure  6  shows  a  diagram  of  several  security  measures  that  we  observed  in  pas-
senger  rail  stations  both  in  the  United  States  and  abroad.  It  should  be  noted  that 
this represents an amalgam of stations we visited, not any particular station.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

5
o
a
g
0
2
0
1

33

Amtrak Faces Challenges Specific to Intercity Passenger Rail in Securing Its System 
In securing its extensive system, Amtrak faces its own set of security-related chal-
lenges, some of which are different from those facing a commuter rail or transit op-
erator.  First,  Amtrak  operates  over  thousands  of  miles,  often  far  from  large  popu-
lation  centers.  This  makes  its  route  system  much  more  difficult  to  patrol  and  mon-
itor than one contained in a particular metropolitan region, and it causes delays in 
responding  to  incidents  when  they  occur  in  remote  areas.  Also,  outside  the  North-
east  Corridor,  Amtrak  operates  almost  exclusively  on  tracks  owned  by  freight  rail 
companies.  Amtrak  also  utilizes  stations  owned  by  freight  rail  companies,  transit 
and  commuter  rail  authorities,  private  corporations,  and  municipal  governments. 
This  means  that  Amtrak  often  cannot  unilaterally  make  security  improvements  to 
others’  rights-of-way  or  station  facilities  and  that  it  is  reliant  on  the  staff  of  other 
organizations to patrol their facilities and respond to incidents that may occur. Fur-
thermore,  with  over  500  stations,  only  half  of  which  are  staffed,  screening  even  a 
small  portion  of  the  passengers  and  baggage  boarding  Amtrak  trains  is  difficult. 
Last,  Amtrak’s  financial  condition  has  never  been  strong—Amtrak  has  been  on  the 
edge of bankruptcy several times. 

Amid  the  ongoing  challenges  of  securing  its  coast-to-coast  railway,  Amtrak  has 
taken  some  actions  to  enhance  security  throughout  its  intercity  passenger  rail  sys-
tem.  For  example,  Amtrak  has  initiated  a  passenger  awareness  campaign,  similar 
to those described elsewhere in this report. Also, Amtrak has begun enforcing exist-
ing  restrictions  on  carry-on  luggage  that  limit  passengers  to  two  carry-on  bags,  not 
exceeding 50 pounds. All bags also must have identification tags on them. Further-
more,  Amtrak  has  begun  requiring  passengers  to  show  positive  identification  after 
boarding trains when asked by staff to ensure that tickets have not been transferred 
or  stolen,  although  Amtrak  officials  acknowledge  their  onboard  staffs  only  sporadi-
cally  enforce  this  requirement  because  of  the  numerous  tasks  these  staff  members 
must  perform  before  a  train  departs.  However,  in  November  2004,  Amtrak  imple-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

6
o
a
g
0
2
0
1

34

mented the Tactical Intensive Patrols (TIPS) program, under which its security staff 
flood  selected  platforms  to  ensure  Amtrak  baggage  and  identification  requirements 
are  met  by  passengers  boarding  trains.  In  addition,  Amtrak  increased  the  number 
of  canine  units  patrolling  its  system,  most  of  which  are  located  in  the  Northeast 
Corridor,  looking  for  explosives  or  narcotics  and  assigned  some  of  its  police  to  ride 
trains  in  the  Northeast  Corridor.  Also,  Amtrak  has  instituted  a  policy  of  randomly 
inspecting  checked  luggage  on  its  trains.  Finally,  Amtrak  is  making  improvements 
to  the  emergency  exits  in  certain  tunnels  to  make  evacuating  trains  in  the  tunnels 
easier in the event of a crash or terrorist attack. 

To  ensure  that  security  measures  are  applied  consistently  throughout  Amtrak’s 
system,  Amtrak  has  established  a  series  of  Security  Coordinating  Committees, 
which  include  representatives  of  all  Amtrak  departments.  These  committees  are  to 
review  and  establish  security  policies,  in  coordination  with  Amtrak’s  police  depart-
ment,  and  have  worked  to  develop  countermeasures  to  specific  threats.  According 
to  Amtrak,  in  the  aftermath  of  the  July  2005  London  bombings,  these  committees 
met  with  Amtrak  police  and  security  staff  to  ensure  additional  security  measures 
were implemented. Also in the wake of the London attacks, Amtrak began working 
with the police forces of several large east coast cities, allowing them to patrol Am-
trak  stations  to  provide  extra  security.  In  addition,  all  Amtrak  employees  now  re-
ceive  a  ‘‘Daily  Security  Awareness  Tip’’  and  are  receiving  computer-based  security 
training. Amtrak police officers are also now receiving specialized counter-terrorism 
training. 

While  Amtrak  has  taken  the  actions  outlined  above,  it  is  difficult  to  determine 
if  these  actions  appropriately  or  sufficiently  addressed  pressing  security  needs.  As 
discussed earlier, Amtrak has not performed a comprehensive terrorism risk assess-
ment that would provide an empirical baseline for investment prioritization and de-
cision making for Amtrak’s security policies and investment plans. However, as part 
of the 2005 Intercity Passenger Rail Grant Program, Amtrak is required to produce 
a  security  and  emergency  preparedness  plan,  which  is  to  include  a  risk  assessment 
that Amtrak currently expects to finish by December 31, 2005. Upon completing this 
plan,  Amtrak  management  should  have  a  more  informed  basis  regarding  which  se-
curity enhancements should receive the highest priority for implementation. 
Three  Foreign  Rail  Security  Practices  Are  Not  Currently  Used  in  the  United  States 
While many of the security practices we observed in foreign rail systems are simi-
lar  to  those  U.S.  passenger  rail  operators  are  implementing,  we  encountered  three 
practices in other countries that were not currently in use among the domestic pas-
senger rail operators we contacted as of June 2005, nor were they performed by the 
U.S. Government. These practices are discussed below. 

Covert testing: Two  of  the  13  foreign  rail  systems  we  visited  utilize  covert  test-
ing  to  keep  employees  alert  about  their  security  responsibilities.  Covert  testing  in-
volves  security  staff  staging  unannounced  events  to  test  the  response  of  railroad 
staff to incidents such as suspicious packages or setting off alarms. In one European 
system,  this  covert  testing  involves  security  staff  placing  suspicious  items  through-
out  their  system  to  see  how  long  it  takes  operating  staff  to  respond  to  the  item. 
Similarly,  one  Asian  rail  operator’s  security  staff  will  break  security  seals  on  fire 
extinguishers and open alarmed emergency doors randomly to see how long it takes 
staff  to  respond.  Officials  of  these  operators  stated  that  these  tests  are  carried  out 
on  a  daily  basis  and  are  beneficial  because  their  staff  know  they  could  be  tested  at 
any moment, and they, therefore, are more likely to be vigilant with respect to secu-
rity. 

Random  screening:  Of  the  13  foreign  operators  we  interviewed,  2  have  some 
form  of  random  screening  of  passengers  and  their  baggage  in  place.  In  the  systems 
where this is in place, security personnel can approach passengers either in stations 
or on the trains and ask them to submit their persons or their baggage to a search. 
Passengers declining to cooperate must leave the system. For example, in Singapore, 
rail agency officials rotate the stations where they conduct random searches so that 
the  searches  are  carried  out  at  a  different  station  each  day.  Prior  to  the  July  2005 
London  bombings,  no  passenger  rail  operators  in  the  United  States  were  practicing 
a form of random passenger or baggage screening on a continuing daily basis. How-
ever,  during  the  Democratic  National  Convention  in  2004,  MBTA  instituted  a  sys-
tem  of  random  screening  of  passengers,  where  every  11th  passenger  at  certain  sta-
tions  and  times  of  the  day  was  asked  to  provide  his  or  her  bags  to  be  screened. 
Those  who  refused  were  not  allowed  to  ride  the  system.  MBTA  officials  recognized 
that  it  is  impossible  to  implement  such  a  system  comprehensively  throughout  the 
rail network without massive amounts of additional staff, and that even doing ran-
dom  screening  on  a  regular  basis  would  be  a  drain  on  resources.  However,  officials 
stated that such a system is workable during special events and times of heightened 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

35

security  but  would  have  to  be  designed  very  carefully  to  ensure  that  passengers’ 
civil  liberties  were  not  violated.  After  the  July  2005  London  bombings,  four  pas-
senger  rail  operators—PATH,  New  York  Metropolitan  Transportation  Authority, 
New  Jersey  Transit,  and  Utah  Transit  Authority  in  Salt  Lake  City—implemented 
limited forms of random bag screening in their system. In addition, APTA, FTA, and 
the  National  Academy  of  Science’s  Transportation  Research  Board  are  currently 
conducting  a  study  on  the  benefits  and  challenges  that  passenger  rail  operators 
would  face  in  implementing  a  randomized  passenger  screening  system.  The  study 
is  examining  such  issues  as  the  legal  basis  for  conducting  passenger  screening  or 
search,  the  precedence  for  such  measures  in  the  transportation  environment,  the 
human resources required, and the financial implications and cost considerations in-
volved. 

National  government  maintains  clearinghouse  on  technologies  and  best 
practices:  According  to  passenger  rail  operators  in  five  countries  we  visited,  their 
national  governments  have  centralized  the  process  for  performing  research  and  de-
veloping  passenger  rail  security  technologies  and  maintaining  a  clearinghouse  on 
these  technologies  and  security  best  practices.  According  to  these  officials,  this  al-
lows rail operators to have one central source for information on the merits of a par-
ticular passenger rail security technology, such as chemical sensors, CCTVs, and in-
trusion  detection  devices.  Some  U.S.  rail  operators  we  interviewed  expressed  inter-
est  in  there  being  a  more  active  centralized  Federal  research  and  development  au-
thority  in  the  United  States  to  evaluate  and  certify  passenger  rail  security  tech-
nologies and make that information available to rail operators. Although TSA is the 
primary  Federal  agency  responsible  for  conducting  transportation  security  research 
and development, and has conducted the TRIP as previously mentioned, most of the 
agency’s research and development efforts to date have focused on aviation security 
technologies. As a result, domestic rail operators told us that they rely on consulta-
tions  with  industry  trade  associations,  such  as  APTA,  to  learn  about  best  practices 
for passenger rail security technologies and related investments. Several rail opera-
tors  stated  that  they  were  often  unsure  of  where  to  turn  when  seeking  information 
on security-related products, such as CCTV cameras or intrusion detection systems. 
Currently, many operators said they informally ask other rail operators about their 
experiences  with  a  certain  technology,  perform  their  own  research  via  the  Internet 
or trade publications, or perform their own testing. 

No  Federal  agency  has  compiled  or  disseminated  best  practices  to  rail  operators 
to  aid  in  this  process.  We  have  previously  reported  that  stakeholders  have  stated 
that  the  Federal  Government  should  play  a  greater  role  in  testing  transportation 
security  technology  and  making  this  information  available  to  industry  stake-
holders. 30 TSA and DOT agree that making the results of research testing available 
to  industry  stakeholders  could  be  a  valuable  use  of  Federal  resources  by  reducing 
the  need  for  multiple  rail  operators  to  perform  the  same  research  and  development 
efforts, but they have not taken action to address this. 31

Implementing these three practices—covert testing, random screening, and a gov-
ernment-sponsored clearinghouse for technologies and best practices—in the United 
States  could  pose  political,  legal,  fiscal,  and  cultural  challenges  because  of  the  dif-
ferences  between  the  United  States  and  these  foreign  nations.  For  instance,  many 
foreign  nations  have  dealt  with  terrorist  attacks  on  their  public  transportation  sys-
tems  for  decades,  compared  with  the  United  States,  where  rail  transportation  has 
not been specifically targeted during terrorist attacks. According to foreign rail oper-
ators, these experiences have resulted in greater acceptance of certain security prac-
tices,  such  as  random  searches,  which  the  U.S.  public  may  view  as  a  violation  of 
their civil liberties or which may discourage them from using public transportation. 
The impact of security measures on passengers is an important consideration for do-
mestic  rail  transit  operators,  since  most  passengers  could  choose  another  means  of 
transportation, such as a personal automobile. As such, security measures that limit 
accessibility,  cause  delays,  increase  fares,  or  otherwise  cause  inconvenience  could 
push  people  away  from  transit  and  into  their  cars.  In  contrast,  the  citizens  of  the 
European  and  Asian  countries  we  visited  are  more  dependent  on  public  transpor-
tation  than  most  U.S.  residents  and  therefore,  according  to  the  rail  operators  we 
spoke with, may be more willing to accept more intrusive security measures, simply 
because  they  have  no  other  choice  for  getting  from  place  to  place.  Nevertheless,  in 
order  to  identify  innovative  security  measures  that  could  help  further  mitigate  ter-
rorism-related  risk  to  rail  assets—especially  as  part  of  a  broader  risk  management 
approach  discussed  earlier—it  is  important  to  at  least  consider  assessing  the  feasi-
bility  and  costs  and  benefits  of  implementing  the  three  rail  security  practices  we 
identified  in  foreign  countries  in  the  United  States.  Officials  from  DHS,  DOT,  pas-
senger rail industry associations, and rail systems we interviewed told us that oper-
ators  would  benefit  from  such  an  evaluation.  Furthermore,  the  passenger  rail  asso-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

36

ciation officials told us that such an evaluation should include practices used by for-
eign rail operators that integrate security into infrastructure design. 

Differences in the business models and financial status of some foreign rail opera-
tors  could  also  affect  the  feasibility  of  adopting  certain  security  practices  in  the 
United  States.  Several  foreign  countries  we  visited  have  privatized  their  passenger 
rail  operations.  Although  most  of  the  foreign  rail  operators  we  visited—even  the 
privatized systems—rely on their governments for some type of financial assistance, 
two  foreign  rail  operators  generated  significant  revenue  and  profits  in  other  busi-
ness endeavors, which they said allowed them to invest heavily in security measures 
for  their  rail  systems.  In  particular,  the  Paris  Metro  system  is  operated  by  the 
RATP Corporation (Re´gie Autonome des Transports Parisiens), which also contracts 
with  other  cities  in  France  and  throughout  the  world  to  provide  consulting  and 
project  management  services.  RATP ’s  ability  to  make  a  profit,  according  to  its  offi-
cials,  through  its  consulting  services  allows  the  agency  to  supplement  government 
funding  in  order  to  support  expensive  security  measures  for  the  Paris  mass  transit 
system.  For  example,  RATP  recently  installed  a  computer-assisted  security  control 
system  that  uses  CCTV,  radio,  and  global  positioning  technology  that  it  says  has 
significantly  reduced  the  amount  of  time  it  takes  for  security  or  emergency  per-
sonnel  to  respond  to  an  incident  or  emergency,  such  as  a  terrorist  attack.  Because 
of RATP ’s available funding for security, the corporation also purchased an identical 
system for the Metropolitan Paris Police, so the RATP and the police system would 
be  compatible.  In  contrast,  domestic  rail  operators  do  not  generate  a  profit  and 
therefore  are  dependent  on  financial  assistance  from  the  Federal,  State,  and  local 
levels  of  government  to  maintain  and  enhance  services,  including  funding  security 
improvements. 

Another  important  difference  between  domestic  and  foreign  rail  operators  is  the 
structure  of  their  police  forces.  In  particular,  England,  France,  Belgium,  and  Spain 
all have national police forces patrolling rail systems in these countries. The use of 
a national police force is a reflection that these foreign countries often have one na-
tionalized rail system, rather than over 30 rail transit systems owned and operated 
by  numerous  state  and  local  governments,  as  is  the  case  in  the  United  States.  For 
example,  in  France,  the  French  National  Railway  operates  all  intercity  passenger 
rail  services  in  the  country  and  utilizes  the  French  Railway  police  to  provide  secu-
rity.  According  to  foreign  rail  operators,  the  use  of  one  national  rail  police  force  al-
lows  for  consistent  policing  and  security  measures  throughout  the  country.  In  the 
United  States,  in  contrast,  there  is  not  a  national  police  force  for  the  rail  transit 
systems. 32 Rather,  some  transit  agencies  maintain  individual  police  forces,  while 
others rely on their city or county police forces for security. 
Conclusions 

In  conclusion,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  are  encouraged  by  the  steps  DHS  components 
have  taken  to  use  elements  of  a  risk  management  approach  to  guide  critical  infra-
structure  protection  decisions  for  the  passenger  rail  industry.  However,  enhanced 
Federal  leadership  is  needed  to  help  ensure  that  actions  and  investments  designed 
to  enhance  security  are  properly  focused  and  prioritized,  so  that  finite  resources 
may  be  allocated  appropriately  to  help  protect  all  modes  of  transportation  and  se-
cure  other  national  critical  infrastructure  sectors.  Leadership  on  this  issue  should 
reflect the shared responsibilities required to coordinate actions on the part of Fed-
eral, State, and local governments; the private sector; and rail passengers who ride 
these systems. 

Specifically,  both  DHS  and  TSA  could  take  additional  steps  to  help  ensure  that 
the risk management efforts under way clearly and effectively identify priority areas 
for  security-related  investments  in  rail  and  other  sectors.  We  recognize  that  TSA 
has  had  many  aviation  security-related  responsibilities  and  has  implemented  many 
security  initiatives  to  meet  legislative  requirements.  Notwithstanding,  TSA  has  not 
yet completed its methodology for determining how the results of threat, criticality, 
and  vulnerability  assessments  will  be  used  to  identify  and  prioritize  risks  to  pas-
senger  rail  and  other  transportation  sectors.  In  order  to  complete  and  apply  its 
methodology  as  part  of  the  forthcoming  transportation  sector-specific  plan,  TSA 
needs  to  more  consistently  involve  industry  stakeholders  in  the  overall  risk  assess-
ment process and collaborate with them on collecting and analyzing information on 
critical infrastructure and key resources in the passenger rail industry. Without con-
sistent and substantive stakeholder input, TSA may not be able to fully capture crit-
ical  information  on  rail  assets—information  that  is  needed  to  properly  assess  risk. 
In addition, as part of the process to complete its risk assessment methodology, TSA 
needs to consider whether other proven approaches, such as ODP’s risk assessment 
methodology,  could  be  leveraged  for  rail  and  other  transportation  modes,  such  as 
aviation. Until the overall risk to the entire transportation sector is identified, TSA 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

37

will  not  be  able  to  fully  benefit  from  the  outcome  of  risk  management  analysis—
including  determining  where  and  how  to  target  the  Nation’s  limited  resources  to 
achieve the greatest security gains. 

Once risk assessments for the passenger rail industry have been completed, it will 
be critical to be able to compare assessment results across all transportation modes 
as  well  as  other  critical  sectors  and  make  informed,  risk-based  investment  trade-
offs. The framework that DHS is developing to help ensure that risks to all sectors 
can  be  analyzed  and  compared  in  a  consistent  way  needs  to  be  completed  and 
shared with TSA and other sector-specific agencies. The delay in completing the ele-
ment of the framework that defines concepts, terminology, and metrics for assessing 
risk  limits  DHS’s  ability  to  compare  risk  across  sectors  as  sector-specific  agencies 
are  concurrently  conducting  risk  assessment  activities  without  this  guidance.  Until 
this framework is complete, it will not be possible for information from different sec-
tors  to  be  reconciled  to  allow  for  a  meaningful  comparison  of  risk—a  goal  outlined 
in DHS’s interim NIPP. 

Apart  from  its  efforts  to  formally  identify  risks,  TSA  has  taken  steps  to  enhance 
the security of the overall passenger rail system. The issuance of security directives 
in  the  wake  of  the  Madrid  bombings  was  a  well-intentioned  effort  to  take  swift  ac-
tion  in  response  to  a  current  threat.  However,  because  these  directives  were  issued 
under emergency circumstances, with limited input and review by rail industry and 
Federal stakeholders—and no public comment period—they may not provide the in-
dustry  with  baseline  security  standards  based  on  industry  best  practices.  Nor  is  it 
clear  how  these  directives  are  to  be  measured  and  enforced.  Consequently,  neither 
the  Federal  Government  nor  rail  operators  can  be  sure  they  are  requiring  and  im-
plementing security practices proven to help prevent or mitigate disasters. Collabo-
rating with rail industry stakeholders to develop security standards is an important 
starting point for strengthening the security of passenger rail systems. 

While  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  face  similar  challenges  to  securing  their 
systems  and  have  generally  implemented  similar  security  practices  as  U.S.  rail  op-
erators,  there  are  some  practices  that  are  utilized  abroad  that  U.S.  rail  operators 
or  the  Federal  Government  have  not  studied  in  terms  of  the  feasibility,  costs,  and 
benefits.  For  example,  an  information  clearinghouse  for  new  passenger  rail  tech-
nologies  that  are  available  and  have  been  tested  might  allow  rail  operators  to  effi-
ciently  implement  technologies  that  had  already  received  approval.  In  addition, 
while  FTA  plans  to  require  rail  operators  to  consider  its  security  infrastructure  de-
sign guidelines when renovating or constructing rail systems or facilities, opportuni-
ties may still exist to further research and evaluate ways of integrating security into 
design,  as  some  foreign  rail  operators  have  done.  Another  rail  security  practice—
covert  testing  of  rail  security  procedures—is  being  used  in  two  foreign  rail  systems 
we  visited  and  is  considered  by  them  as  an  effective  means  of  keeping  rail  employ-
ees  alert  to  their  surroundings  and  potential  security  threats.  And  finally,  random 
searches of passengers and baggage are being used by two foreign rail operators and 
this  practice  has  recently  been  adopted  by  four  domestic  rail  operators  in  the  wake 
of the London attacks. 

Introducing  these  security  practices  into  the  United  States  may  involve  cultural, 
financial,  and  political  challenges,  owing  to  differences  between  the  United  States 
and foreign nations. Nonetheless, as part of the overall risk management approach, 
there  may  be  compelling  reasons  for  exploring  the  feasibility,  costs,  and  benefits  of 
implementing any of these practices in the United States. Doing so could enable the 
United  States  to  leverage  the  experiences  and  knowledge  of  foreign  passenger  rail 
operators  and  help  identify  additional  innovative  measures  to  secure  rail  systems 
against terrorist attack in this country. 

In our recently issued report on passenger rail security, we recommended, among 
other things, that to help ensure that the Federal Government has the information 
it  needs  to  prioritize  passenger  rail  assets  based  on  risk,  and  in  order  to  evaluate, 
select,  and  implement  commensurate  measures  to  help  the  Nation’s  passenger  rail 
operators  protect  their  systems  against  acts  of  terrorism,  TSA  should  establish  a 
plan  with  timelines  for  completing  its  methodology  for  conducting  risk  assessments 
and develop security standards that reflect industry best practices and can be meas-
ured  and  enforced,  by  using  the  Federal  rule-making  process.  In  addition,  we  rec-
ommended that the Secretary of DHS, in collaboration with DOT and the passenger 
rail  industry,  determine  the  feasibility,  in  a  risk  management  context,  of  imple-
menting  certain  security  practices  used  by  foreign  rail  operators.  DHS,  DOT,  and 
Amtrak generally agreed with the report’s recommendations. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any 

questions that you or other Members of the Committee may have at this time. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

ENDNOTES 

38

1 Pub. L. No. 108–458, 118 Stat. 3638. 
2 GAO, Passenger Rail Security: Enhanced Federal Leadership Needed to Prioritize 

and Guide Security Efforts, GAO–05–851 (Washington, D.C.: Sept. 9, 2005). 

3 The  American  Public  Transportation  Association  compiled  this  Fiscal  Year  2003 
ridership  data  from  FTA’s  National  Transit  Database.  These  are  the  most  current 
data available. Rail transit systems in the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico are 
included in these statistics. 

4 The  Alaska  Railroad  Corporation  also  operates  intercity  passenger  rail  service. 
5 Pub. L. No. 107–71, 115 Stat. 597 (2001). 
6 Pub. L. No. 107–296, 116 Stat. 2135 (2002). 
7 The Department of Justice established ODP in 1998 within the Office of Justice 
Programs.  ODP  was  subsequently  transferred  to  DHS’s  Directorate  of  Border  and 
Transportation  Security  upon  DHS’s  creation  in  March  2003  (Homeland  Security 
Act of 2002, section 403(5), 6 U.S.C. 203(5)). In March 2004, the Secretary of Home-
land Security consolidated ODP with the Office of State and Local Government Co-
ordination to form the Office of State and Local Government Coordination and Pre-
paredness  (SLGCP).  SLGCP,  which  reports  directly  to  the  DHS  Secretary,  was  cre-
ated to provide a ‘‘one-stop shop’’ for the numerous Federal preparedness initiatives 
applicable to state and local governments. 

8 At the time of our review, DHS was undertaking a department-wide reorganiza-
tion  that  will  affect  both  the  structure  and  the  functions  of  DHS  directorates  and 
component agencies. 

9 Pub. L. No. 108–334, 118 Stat. 1298 (2004). 
10 FRA administers and enforces the Federal laws and related regulations that are 
designed  to  promote  safety  on  railroads,  such  as  track  maintenance,  inspection 
standards, equipment standards, and operating practices. FRA exercises jurisdiction 
over all areas of railroad safety under 49 U.S.C. 20103. 

11 Pub. L. No. 108–458, 118 Stat. 3638. 
12 GAO,  Transportation  Security:  Systematic  Planning  Needed  to  Optimize  Re-
sources,  GAO–05–357T  (Washington,  D.C.:  Feb.  15,  2005);  Homeland  Security:  A 
Risk Management Approach Can Guide Preparedness Efforts, GAO–02–208T (Wash-
ington, D.C.: Oct. 31, 2001); and Combating Terrorism: Threat and Risk Assessments 
Can  Help  Prioritize  and  Target  Program  Investments,  GAO/NSIAD–98–74  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: April 9, 1998). 

13 Sector-specific agencies have been designated for the following sectors: transpor-
tation;  agriculture  and  food;  public  health  and  health  care;  drinking  water  and 
wastewater treatment; energy; banking and finance; national monuments and icons; 
defense  industrial  base;  information  technology;  telecommunications;  chemical; 
emergency  services;  postal  and  package  shipping;  dams;  government  facilities;  com-
mercial facilities; and nuclear reactors, materials, and waste. 

14 The transportation sector includes mass transit; aviation; maritime; ground/sur-

face; and rail and pipeline systems. 

15 ODP has completed risk assessments with the Port Authority of New York and 
New  Jersey,  New  Jersey  Transit,  Massachusetts  Bay  Transportation  Authority, 
Washington  Metropolitan  Area  Transit  Authority,  Southeastern  Pennsylvania 
Transportation  Authority,  Tri-County  Metropolitan  Transportation  District  of  Or-
egon, and the Delaware River Port Authority. 

16 PANYNJ  is  a  bi-state  public  agency  that  manages  and  maintains  bridges,  tun-
nels,  bus  terminals,  airports,  the  PATH  passenger  rail  system,  and  seaports  in  the 
greater  New  York/New  Jersey  metropolitan  area.  PANYNJ  was  also  the  property 
owner  and  operator  of  the  World  Trade  Center  site  and  the  PATH  passenger  rail 
station  underneath  the  site  that  was  destroyed  by  the  September  11  terrorist  at-
tacks. At the request of PANYNJ, ODP’s technical assistance team worked with au-
thority  personnel  to  conduct  the  first  risk  assessment  using  ODP’s  model.  This  col-
laborative effort provided the means for ODP to test and refine its methodology and 
develop the tool kit now in use. 

17 The Association of American Railroads is an association representing the inter-
ests  of  the  rail  industry,  focused  mostly  at  the  Federal  level.  Its  members  are  pri-
marily  freight  rail  operators  in  the  United  States,  Canada,  and  Mexico.  However, 
it also represents some passenger rail interests, including Amtrak. 

18 The American Public Transportation Association is a nonprofit trade association 
representing  over  1,500  public  and  private  member  organizations,  including  transit 
systems  and  commuter  rail  operators;  planning,  design,  construction,  and  finance 
firms; product and service providers; academic institutions; transit associations; and 
state departments of transportation. 

19 Up  to  30  percent  of  the  available  funds  will  be  available  to  assist  Amtrak  in 
meeting its most pressing security needs in the Northeast Corridor and Chicago (as 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

39

identified  through  previously  conducted  site-specific  assessments)  prior  to  comple-
tion  of  the  risk  assessment.  However,  the  remainder  of  the  grant  funds  will  not  be 
released until Amtrak has completed the risk assessment and also submitted a secu-
rity and emergency preparedness plan. Amtrak is also required to demonstrate that 
its  planning  process  and  allocations  of  funds  are  fully  coordinated  with  regional 
planning  efforts  in  the  National  Capitol  Region,  Philadelphia,  New  York,  Boston, 
and  Chicago.  Amtrak  is  using  approximately  $700,000  of  the  grant  funds  for  the 
ODP risk assessment. 

20 The  results  of  TSA’s  passenger  and  freight  rail  threat  assessments  contain  in-
formation  that  is  security  sensitive  or  classified  and  therefore  cannot  be  disclosed 
in this testimony. 

21 DHS  refers  to  this  framework  as  a  Risk  Analysis  and  Management  for  Critical 

Asset Protection. 

22 According to TSA, in issuing the passenger rail and mass transit security direc-
tives,  TSA  exercised  its  authorities  under  49  U.S.C.  114.  We  are  currently  exam-
ining  whether  TSA  met  all  relevant  legal  requirements  in  the  promulgation  of  the 
directives. 

23 49 CFR 238.235. 
24 These  positions  were  funded  through  the  DHS  Appropriations  Act  of  2005  and 
its accompanying conference report, which provided TSA with $12 million in funding 
for rail security activities. 

25 Congress  required  that  an  annex  to  the  MOU  be  signed  that  would,  among 
other things, define and clarify the respective transit security roles and responsibil-
ities of each department. Pub. L. 109–59, § 3028 (2005). 

26 APTA is a standards development organization recognized by DOT that has set 

standards for commuter rail, mass transit, and bus safety and operations. 

27 At  the  time  we  completed  our  work  in  June  2005,  these  three  practices  were 
not  utilized.  However,  as  discussed  later  in  this  report,  some  rail  operators  began 
using  random  screening  in  the  aftermath  of  the  July  bomb  attacks  on  the  London 
subway system. 

28 As we have previously reported, since the mid-1990s, Federal funding for tran-
sit  and  commuter  rail  operators  has  generally  been  limited  to  assistance  with  cap-
ital  projects  involving  building  new  transit  service,  extensions  of  existing  lines,  or 
rehabilitation of existing transit infrastructure, such as tracks, rolling stock, or sta-
tions. See GAO–03–263. 

29 Actions  taken  by  Amtrak  to  enhance  security  are  discussed  later  in  this  testi-

30 GAO–03–843. 
31 See GAO–03–843. 
32 Unlike  domestic  rail  transit  agencies,  Amtrak  maintains  a  342-member  police 

force for its national network.

mony. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Senator  McCain,  do  you 

have an opening statement or questions? 

Senator MCCAIN. I follow you, Mr. Chairman. After you, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. All right, let me just put it this way to all of you. 
We sought to assure that we would have jurisdiction over TSA, rail 
security  and  other  aspects  in  this  Committee  because  of  the  exist-
ence of the authorities that Mr. Boardman has just mentioned con-
cerning FRA and existing systems prior to the reorganizations that 
brought  about  TSA.  But  it  appears  that  we  are  still  going  along 
two  roads.  You  talk  about  coordination,  but  what  about  consolida-
tion?  It  seems  to  me  that  this  is  going  to  be  extremely  confusing 
to  everybody  in  the  railroad  industry  if  we  don’t  find  one  way  to 
deal  with  this.  Now,  the  solution  of  the  9/11  Commission  was  to 
just wipe out FRA as far as security is concerned and our solution 
was to try and bring it together so that we’d have a comprehensive 
system  for  improving  rail  security  but  not  have  duplicated  func-
tions that require coordination. 

Now, how are we going to get it together? And Mr. Hawley, not-
withstanding  what  Ms.  Berrick  said—I  thought  that  was  kind  of 
complimentary that you are trying to work on risk assessment but 
you  haven’t  accomplished  anything  yet.  When  can  we  expect  that 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

40

risk assessment and when can we expect a plan to put together the 
system  so  that  there’s  one  coherent  system  for  safety  on  our  rail-
roads? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. On the risk management approach, we use 
that  today.  I  think  what  we  are  referring  to  there,  are  specific 
major  models  that  are  very  complex  that  are  useful  but  are  not 
really the operational drivers in terms of a flexible risk and a flexi-
ble  network.  So  we  use  absolutely  the  risk-based  approach  on  a 
daily basis on operational matters as well as we devote our invest-
ment resources. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  If  you  are  doing  that  every  day  what’s  Mr. 

Boardman doing? He says they’re in charge. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  Mr.  Boardman  is  in  charge  of  safety  and  we 
have a very good working relationship that I think, that the report 
that Ms. Berrick referred to is highly instructive, highly useful, and 
as  I  was  preparing  for  my  confirmation  before  this  Committee,  I 
had the opportunity to review it and the comments there about sin-
gle  point  of  contact,  being  connected,  one  voice  from  the  Federal 
Government  to  the  industry  or  the  transit  community  is  one  that 
we whole-heartedly adopt. And, in fact, Secretary Chertoff recently 
approved  a  reorganization  of  the  entire  agency  to  enable  us  to 
speak with one voice to these communities. 

The CHAIRMAN. What agency? Your agency? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  sir,  TSA.  And  to  plug  into  FRA  on  a  daily 
basis and build institutional connections among us so it doesn’t de-
pend  on  a  good  relationship  among  administrators,  but  the  actual 
work  process  of  the  two  agencies  take  advantage,  certainly  from 
our  point  of  view,  of  the  expertise  that  the  FRA  has  and  expect 
that the good working relationship that we’ve had to this point will 
continue  to  evolve  to  be  even  better  coordinated  and  reflected  in 
the work process. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Boardman, what do you say? 
Mr. BOARDMAN. I think that, Mr. Chairman, I do think FRA and 
TSA,  especially  since  Mr.  Hawley  has  come  onboard,  have  been 
able  to  work  in  a  very  hand-in-glove  fashion,  especially  with  their 
inspectors  out  in  the  field  today.  I  think  there  is  a  difference  be-
tween  safety  and  security  in  a  couple  of  ways.  Safety  in  terms  of 
thinking  about  it,  it’s  really  being  certain  that  adverse  effects  will 
not  be  caused  by  some  agent  under  defined  conditions.  In  other 
words,  when  the  FRA  puts  its  standards  and  its  activity  together 
there  are  some  risks,  and  terrorism  against  the  passenger  train  is 
beyond the conditions that FRA really considered when it set those 
standards in the past. One of the difficulties, I think, with security 
has  been  that  it’s  not  only  being  free  from  danger  and  injury,  it’s 
also  being  free  from  anxiety  and  fear.  And,  I  think  that  there  is  a 
need  for  us  to  work  together  as  a  Federal  Government  to  find  a 
way to find those conditions, those adverse effects that we can’t es-
tablish in terms of a process or effective conditions that, as I think 
Mr.  Hawley  talked  about,  that  keep  terrorists  off  balance  in  terms 
of  how  we  look  at  this  thing  for  the  future.  I  think  that  we  have 
an  important  role  in  the  FRA  in  security  because  we  benefit  secu-
rity  because  we  don’t  differentiate  what  that  agent  is  that  causes 
a catastrophic event. It could be a broken rail from a joint fracture, 
it  could  be  vandals,  it  could  be  something  more  sinister,  but  there 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

41

are  those  risks  that  are  beyond  that  and  we  want  to  work  with 
DHS to resolve that. 

The CHAIRMAN. John? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Along  the  lines  of 
what  the  Chairman  was  just  asking,  tell  me  Mr.  Hawley  and  Mr. 
Boardman, who is in charge? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  For  security,  TSA  is  in  charge  and  for  safety  it’s 
FRA.  It  is  very  similar  with  FAA  and  TSA.  So,  it’s  a  similar  pat-
tern that we have throughout the transportation sector. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Ms.  Berrick,  does  that  seem  workable  to  you? 
Ms.  BERRICK.  I  think  it  is  today.  About  a  year  ago  we  did  some 
work  and  talked  to  rail  operators.  They  felt  that  the  role  between 
FRA  and  TSA  wasn’t  always  very  clear  to  them.  One  of  the  rec-
ommendations  we  made  coming  out  of  that  work  was  that  the  De-
partment  of  Transportation  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Se-
curity  establish  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding,  clearly  delin-
eating roles and responsibilities and they did that about a year ago. 
And  recently,  last  month  they  signed  a  Transit  Security  Annex  to 
that  MOU  which  I  think  further  delineates  roles  and  responsibil-
ities. 

So  I  think  they’ve  gone  a  long  way  and  are  being  more  clear  on 

who’s responsible for rail security. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Well,  apparently,  it’s  not  clear  to  the  Associa-
tion  of  American  Railroads  because  they  submit  testimony  that 
they  will  present  that  says  TSA  and  FRA  should  clarify  which 
agency  has  ultimate  responsibility  for  which  aspects  of  rail  safety 
and  security.  Today,  the  allocation  of  responsibilities  is  not  always 
clear, so the people that they are serving are not that clear, at least 
according to Mr. Hamberger’s testimony. 

Ms.  Berrick,  are  we  devoting  sufficient  funds  to  rail  security 
today?  My  information  is,  this  year’s  Homeland  Security  Appro-
priations bill appropriated $150 million for intercity passenger rail 
transportation,  freight  rail  and  transit  security  grants.  Senator 
Lieberman,  recently  noted  that  while  the  government  has  spent 
about $15 billion in aviation securities since September 11th, about 
$300  million  has  been  spent  on  mass  transit  security.  Does  this 
seem  a  little  unequal  particularly  in  light  of  the  Madrid  attacks 
and other threats to rail security both in America and overseas? 

Ms. BERRICK. I think if you look at TSA’s budget which is about 
$3.9 billion and within TSA, in addition to the $150 million at the 
DHS level, within TSA there is $8 million that’s devoted to higher 
additional  rail  inspectors  this  year.  So  I  think,  if  you  just  look  at 
the  budget,  that  certainly  raises  questions  about  whether  or  not 
that’s an appropriate amount. I don’t think that anybody can really 
answer the question right now, What is the appropriate amount to 
devote to rail security? Just because the risk assessment——

Senator  MCCAIN.  I’m  not  asking  for  an  appropriate  amount,  I’m 

asking if whether we are spending enough? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Yes,  I  would  say  that  you  can’t  answer  that  ques-
tion  right  now.  I  don’t  know  the  answer  because  DHS  hasn’t  com-
pleted  these  risk  assessment  efforts  to 
identify  where  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

42

vulnerabilities are that need to be fixed. And I think, until they do 
that  in  any  systematic  way,  it  really  can’t  be  estimated  what  they 
need. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Well,  in  all  due  respect,  Mr.  Hawley,  the  year 

is 2005 and we still haven’t made an assessment yet? 

Mr. HAWLEY. No, sir, we have and it gets to the question of pro-
tecting infrastructure which is different. Which is a solid definable 
place  geographically  with  defining  a  flexible  transportation  net-
work  where  in  the  New  York  City  Transit  System  alone,  I’m  sure 
if  you  know  this,  four  and  a  half  million  passengers  a  day  going 
in and out of 400 and some——

Senator  MCCAIN.  And  it  still  remains  a  question  of  the  security 

of the tunnels as well. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  it’s  almost  certainly  a  piece  of  that  but  we 
have  taken  the  whole  network  of  transportation  and  all  the  modes 
because it is an open system. It is vulnerable and as you know, the 
targeting  can  be  flexible  and  adaptive.  So,  if  we  were  publishing  a 
list  of  the  top  100  things  in  priority  that  we’re  allocating  our  re-
sources  to,  that  is  too  simple  a  guide  to  give  to  somebody  else  and 
I  think  we  go  back  to  the  person  connecting  the  dots  on  CBP,  and 
ICE,  and  FBI  to  find  the  person,  before  the  attack  is  in  progress 
against a particular transit system or aviation target. 

Senator MCCAIN. What are your priorities without comprising se-

curity? 

priority. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Sure, it is absolutely to do what is possible to iden-
tify  the  terrorist  in  advance  which  can  be  done  and  how  you  do 
that specifically is with connecting the information systems that we 
have  within  DHS,  the  Customs  and  Border  Protection  as  well  as 
us and ICE and FBI and the reporting we get from industries, sus-
picious incidents. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  I  need  to  rephrase  my  question,  without  com-
promising  security,  what  are  your  highest  priorities  for  defending? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  For  the,  essentially  aviation  would  be  the  highest 

Senator MCCAIN. As far as rail security is concerned. 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  For  rail  security  it  gets  to  first,  establishing  that 
unlike  aviation  which  is  operated  by  the  Federal  Government,  rail 
is operated by either transit systems or railroads and to first estab-
lish what they are doing. Then, if what they are doing makes sense 
and then are they doing what they say they are doing? All of those 
things have——

Senator  MCCAIN.  I’m  still  asking  what  your  priorities  are.  Is  it 
the  tunnels,  is  it  New  York  City,  is  it  New  Mexico?  I’m  asking 
which areas need to be addressed first. You have to prioritize. I re-
member  right  after  2001,  one  of  the  highest  priorities  that  was 
given to this Committee were the tunnels that connect on the east-
ern corridors. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. 
Senator MCCAIN. So. 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  We  are  very  focused  on  tunnels  in  New  York  and 
elsewhere  and  look  at  things  that  would  be  effective  against  tun-
nels wherever they are but clearly, the New York City area is very 
visible  as  is  the  D.C.  Metro  area  in  the  northeast  corridor  there. 
There are priorities within that but the——

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

43

Senator  MCCAIN.  I’m  sorry  to  interrupt,  Mr.  Hawley.  But,  it’s 
hard  for  us  to  recommend  authorization  and  appropriations  in  a 
prioritized  fashion  since  clearly,  we  can’t  fund  everything  until  we 
get your priorities. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. 
Senator MCCAIN. Do you see my point? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  yes,  sir,  and  the  way  the  President’s  budget 
is  put  together,  puts  a  lot  of,  now  the  decisionmaking  at  the  state 
and  local  level  where  they  can  make  the  operation  tradeoffs  as 
to——

Senator  MCCAIN.  And  that  assumes  then  that  they  don’t  want 
any  Federal  money.  I’m  saying  is,  if  it’s  Federal  dollars  we  have 
to know what the Federal priority is. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. 
Senator MCCAIN. If they, if local authorities want to set their pri-
orities  and  fund  them,  that’s  fine  with  us.  OK?  I’m  still  having 
trouble  getting  your  priorities  which  would  then  help  us,  as  we  go 
through the authorizing and appropriating process. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Sure,  OK,  information,  communication,  training, 

drilling, preparedness——

Senator MCCAIN. I’m talking about areas that need specific prior-
ities. I understand that education and training and communication 
are  very  important.  That’s  why  we  are  about  to  have  a  big  fight 
over allocation of spectrum. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  sir,  so  you  want  the  geography  or  the  part  of 

the train system or——

Senator  MCCAIN.  Is  it  New  York  tunnels?  Is  it  the  West  Coast 
rail network? Is it the Union Station here? I just think we need to 
know  some  priorities  if  we  are  going  to  earmark  specific  funds  for 
specific purposes. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  We’re  just  going  to  give  you  a  whole  bunch  of 
money  and  say  spend  it  however  you  want,  then  it  doesn’t  matter. 
But I don’t think we are going to do that. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  No,  sir.  But  the  flexibility  and  adaptability  of  the 
resources  we  have  is  critical.  So,  for  instance,  we  have  resources 
like canine teams, that we have on a mobile basis so that in a situ-
ation where——

Senator MCCAIN. Is that your highest priority? 
Mr. HAWLEY. It’s not my highest priority. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Well,  that’s  what  I  keep  asking,  Mr.  Hawley. 
Mr. HAWLEY. OK, it is, it’s the flexible resources to be able to——
Senator MCCAIN. All right, Mr. Hawley then I will submit on the 
floor an amendment for flexible resources. I’m sorry that you aren’t 
more  forthcoming.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  know  there  are  other  wit-
nesses. You are very unforthcoming, Mr. Hawley and I am very dis-
appointed. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  let  me  follow  on  to  what  Senator  McCain 
has  discussed,  we  also  oversee  airline  transportation  and  airline 
transportation has been funded as far as security concepts are con-
cerned primarily by increased taxes on passengers. I have not seen 
any  recommendation  from  anyone  that  the  people  who  use  rail 
transportation  should  pay  a  portion  of  the  cost  of  providing  their 
own  security.  Have  you  examined  this?  Any  one  of  you  examine 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

44

why it is that we can’t ask the rail passenger to pay as the airline 
passenger  pays  for  at  least  part  of  the  security  we  are  trying  to 
provide? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  it’s  done.  That’s  where  the  money  comes  out 
of  the  local  level  and  part  of  the  fare  box  goes  to  programs  from 
the local level that affect security. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Have  you  recommended  any  increase  in  cost  to 

the passengers for rail security? 

Mr. HAWLEY. No, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Have you, Mr. Boardman? 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  No,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  wouldn’t  recommend  that. 
The CHAIRMAN. Why? 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Most  transit  systems  in  operation  today  don’t 
cover  their  operating  costs.  Most  of  them  in  rural  areas  cover  as 
much as maybe 30 or 40 percent of their costs. When you’re in New 
York  City  itself,  you  might  be  as  high  as  70  percent  of  its  costs. 
So today——

The CHAIRMAN. That’s looking at it the wrong way. Do you know 

what gasoline costs today post-9/11? 

Mr. BOARDMAN. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. The people who are driving cars, the people who 
are  flying  are  all  paying  increased  costs.  Why  is  it  that  railroad 
passengers are such preferred characters that they can’t pay a por-
tion  of  these  costs?  Everyone  seems  to  be  turning  to  the  Federal 
Government for the total support of the security system for rail. 

Mr. BOARDMAN. I understand sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Why? 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  I  think  that  all  transit  systems  today  receive 

Federal assistance and they do that because they lose money. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  almost  every  airline  in  the  country  is  in 
bankruptcy  now  and  has  been  since  9/11  because  of  the  increased 
costs  put  on  airlines  themselves  in  addition  to  the  increased  cost 
to  the  passengers.  But,  we  haven’t  seen  any  increased  burden  put 
on  the  passengers  for  rail  transportation.  Ms.  Berrick,  have  you 
looked at that? 

Ms. BERRICK. Well, we did look at who pays for rail security and 
found  that  it  is  really  shared  between  the  Federal  Government, 
State and locals who own a lot of the transit and then also the pri-
vate sector. The American public——

The  CHAIRMAN.  Wait,  back  up.  The  allocation  to  them  is  still 
based  upon  pre-9/11  fares,  isn’t  it?  Have  you  seen  any  increase  in 
the cost of rail transportation? 

Ms. BERRICK. We didn’t look at the actual fares and the increases 

The CHAIRMAN. Why not? 
Ms.  BERRICK.  The  objective  of  our  study  was  to  see  what  was 
being done first of all within the U.S. to secure passenger rail and 
whether  or  not  there  were  any  practices  in  foreign  countries  that 
we  could  apply  here  to  secure  the  rail  system.  We  also  looked  in 
a general sense of what’s been spent on rail security on the Federal 
level,  not  a  whole  lot  of  money  last  year,  about  $150  million  in 
grants.  The  American  Public  Transportation  Association  estimated 
that  since  9/11  the  private  sector,  the  private  rail  operators,  spent 

over time. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

45

about  $1.7  billion  on  security.  So  I  think  the  rail  operators  them-
selves through fees are devoting a lot to security. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  It  seems  like  just  a  simple  matter  of  economics 
to me that with the increase in price of gasoline people who would 
otherwise  drive  from  here  to  New  York  are  going  to  go  by  train. 
Right? There’s not been any increase in cost to go by train. So you 
have  to  plan  for  increased  burdens  on  the  rail  transportation  sys-
tem  because  the  increased  cost  of  alternative  means  of  transpor-
tation,  both  air  and  auto  or  bus  has  increased  substantially.  Rail 
has  not.  And  yet  we  are  hearing  we  have  to  have  more  money  to 
protect those people who are riding the rails. 

Ms. BERRICK. I think what the highest priority should be, in my 
opinion, for the Department is to complete their risk assessment ef-
forts.  It’s  right,  TSA  has  started  these  efforts.  They  haven’t  yet 
completed them. The Department level, they also have risk assess-
ments. They need to be coordinated to determine, first of all, what’s 
the requirement——

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  would  accept  your  concept  of  risk  assessment. 
I think we all do. That should be the number one priority. But, the 
question  of  who’s  going  to  pay  for  the  changes  that  are  necessary 
ought to be primary too, shouldn’t it? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  I  think  it  should  and  I  think  the  first  step  is  the 
risk  assessment  to  determine  how  much  do  we  actually  need  and 
where we need to focus our money. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  meanwhile  you  are  just  attracting  more 
and  more  people  to  the  rail  transportation  system,  aren’t  you?  If 
airline  costs  are  going  up  and  transportation  by  bus  or  by  auto-
mobile  is  going  up,  isn’t  it  natural  that  people  are  going  to  go 
where prices are not going up? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  That’s  possible  and  we  did  not  study  the  pricing. 
The CHAIRMAN. Would you study that just to see if I’m right? 
Ms.  BERRICK.  OK,  we’ll  look  at  that  and  get  back  with  you. 

Thank you. 

Senator MCCAIN. Mr. Chairman, could I just make one addition? 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Mr.  Hawley,  I  understand  you  have  a  very 
tough  job  and  I  don’t  mean  to  be  too  hard  on  you  but  we  really 
need  to  have  a  sense  of  your  priorities.  If  that  has  to  be  done  in 
a  classified  fashion  so  that  the  Members  of  this  Committee  can 
know  what  you  want,  I’d  be  glad  to  understand  that  aspect  of  na-
tional  security,  but  I  think  it  would  help  us,  because  we  are  going 
to  engage  in  some  prioritization  ourselves,  and  I  think  it  is  impor-
tant for us that you provide that information. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes sir. 
Senator MCCAIN. I thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I join in that request. I’d also like to know if you 
can  tell  us,  I  admire  the  way  New  York  City  handled  the  crisis 
after the London catastrophe in rails but they really started a sys-
tem  of  really  improving  inspection,  for  anyone  who  went  onboard 
those subways or their trains. But, I also understand that there is 
an  increased  allocation  to  pay  for  that  service  and  I  wonder  why? 
I come from a state where 90 percent of travel is by plane and our 
people  are  paying—although  we  are  a  very  small  state,  our  people 
are paying a substantial increase in costs every month it seems. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

46

The  people  that  are  using  these  massive  transportation  systems 
down  here,  they  are  not  paying  any  increased  costs  for  security  at 
all and I think that’s not only unfair but it’s not wise. That means 
that unless, as Senator McCain says, we outline some more money 
to allocate to these systems, they are not going to get the securities 
required  to  maintain  the  securities  necessary  for  that  mode  of 
transportation. Senator Boxer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER,

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator  BOXER.  Thank  you.  I  am  so  sorry  that  I  was  late,  I  was 
at a meeting about Hurricane Katrina aftermath relief, I am really 
sorry.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much  for  holding  this  hear-
ing. 

A new GAO report, which Senator Snowe and I requested, shows 
that  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  has  not  ade-
quately  secured  America’s  passenger  railways  and  it’s  not  for  lack 
of  warning.  We’ve  seen  what’s  happened  in  Madrid,  we  saw  what 
happened  in  London,  we  know  because  we’ve  had  access  to  docu-
ments  that  show  that  the  trains  are  definitely  on  the  al-Qaeda 
lists.  So,  it  seems  to  me,  Mr.  Chairman,  we’ve  ignored  warning 
after  warning  and  I  say  ‘‘we’’,  I  don’t  really  mean  this  Committee, 
Mr.  Chairman.  I’d  like  to  show  you  a  chart  that  I  made  up  here 
if I could. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  just  wanted  to  share  with  you  a  chart  because 
I think that this Committee under Senator McCain’s leadership be-
fore  has  acted  on  this  issue  a  couple  of  times  and  I  just  wanted  to 
note it. In 2001, the Commerce Committee approved the Rail Secu-
rity Act of 2001. No action was taken by the full Senate, and then 
in  2004  the  Commerce  Committee  approved  the  Rail  Security  Act 
of  2004.  The  full  Senate  approved  that  Rail  Security  Act  but  then 
the  House  didn’t  act.  So,  I  think  this  Committee  has  tried  very 
hard  to  do  something  but  we  haven’t  had  the  entire  Congress 
going. 

So,  I  think  what  we  need  to  do  is  get  on  with  it.  I  want  to  talk 
about  my  state  which  has  the  second-highest  Amtrak  ridership  in 
the  country  and  I  see  Senator  Lautenberg  here,  but  people  don’t 
recognize  that  California  has  a  very  large  Amtrak  ridership.  Al-
most nine million passenger trips began or ended in California dur-
ing 2004. Amtrak operates an average of 70 intercity and 200 com-
muter trains per day in California. So, when people think Amtrak, 
they  think  East  Coast,  they’ve  got  to  say  West  Coast  because  we 
are the second largest ridership. 

In  addition,  the  freight  rail  system  is  extremely  important  for 
goods  movement  throughout  the  country.  California  ports  receive 
over 40 percent of all the goods that are shipped into the U.S.; the 
ports of L.A. and Long Beach comprise the largest port complex in 
the U.S. and they are crucial for our Nation’s economy. 

Now,  here’s  what  happens,  Mr.  Chairman.  The  goods  arrive  and 
then  they  are  taken  by  train  throughout  the  country,  and  once 
these trains emerge through the Alameda Corridor, which is in the 
Los  Angeles  area,  they  often  cross  a  road  where  there  is  no  grade 
separation. So, grade separation is another critical issue because if 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

47

there  were  to  be  a  terrorist  attack  and  those  grades  are  blocked, 
we cannot get the emergency vehicles through. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  once  again  thank  you  for  having  this  hear-
ing.  I  understand  it  was  pretty  contentious  before  I  got  here  but 
I  just  want  to  say  we  expect  more  from  this  Administration;  we 
have  to.  It’s  not  that  we  are  being  argumentative.  It’s  that  we’ve 
been  warned.  How  many  times  do  we  have  to  be  warned?  We’ve 
seen  al-Qaeda  documents,  we  saw  what  happened  in  Madrid,  we 
saw  what  happened  in  London,  we  saw  what  happened  recently 
and  rumors  spread  in  New  York  and  there’s  lots  more  we  can  do. 
We can’t 100 percent protect anything, any asset. But we can sure-
ly  do  better.  GAO  makes  that  point  and  I’m  just  hopeful  that  you 
will  read  that  report  and  you  will  move  to  finally  secure  our  Na-
tion’s rail system because we’ve been warned and how many times 
could we get away with this? Not too many more times. Thank you. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Chairman, may I? 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Boxer, are you finished? 
Senator BOXER. I’m finished with my statement. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thanks. Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, thanks, Mr. Chairman, and thanks to 
you  and  Senator  McCain,  we’re  moving  legislation,  trying  ardu-
ously  to  move  legislation.  We  look  back  and  I  don’t  want  to  be  re-
petitive  if  things  have  been  said  before  that  have  taken  care  of 
some  of  the  issues.  But  when  we  look  forward  at  the  vulnerability 
that  we  have  as  a  result  of  possible  hazardous  cargo  being  trans-
ported  or  materials  being  carried  and  not  really  facing  up  to  the 
reality of what we’ve got to do to protect ourselves. Particularly ob-
vious  is  the  railroad  track  that  sits  right  here  at  the  Capitol.  We 
in New Jersey are so dependent on transit and passenger rail serv-
ice  and  I’m  just  wondering  why  it  is  that  when  we’ve  seen  these 
incidents pass before in London, Madrid? Why is it that we are still 
waiting  here  for  a  plan  by  our  government  to  do  something  about 
it, to make the investment that is necessary? 

What  we  saw  in  Graniteville,  South  Carolina,  hazmat  releases 
can  have  the  same  effect  as  a  weapon  of  mass  destruction.  Now 
what’s  TSA  doing  to  track  the  thousands  of  hazmat  rail  cars  each 
day? Secretary Hawley, does the Administration believe that active 
monitoring of the movement of these cars in necessary? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes  sir,  and  that  is  done  in  the  current  setup  by 
the companies themselves and in the circumstance where we would 
require access to the specific location of individual trains or cars or 
shipments, that is something we can get from them. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How do we monitor the quality of their se-
curity?  Years  ago  the  screening  at  aviation  destinations  was  done 
by  airlines  and  we  found  that  they  were  quite  inadequate.  So,  the 
government  stepped  in  and  said,  ‘‘OK,  private  sectors  had  its  end, 
they  haven’t  done  a  good  job.  We  are  going  to  come  in  here  and 
we’re  going  to  do  it.’’  What’s  the  difference,  Mr.  Hawley,  between 
that situation and the current need? 

Mr. HAWLEY. In regards to freight rail? As regard to freight rail, 
the consequences of a safety problem or a terrorist act against—in-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

48

volving  hazardous  material  can  be  the  financial  death  penalty  for 
a freight railroad and so they are highly motivated for a lot of rea-
sons  to  do  what  is  necessary  to  prevent  that  happening  and  what 
we  do  to  monitor  that,  we  do  the  trust/verify  approach  to  have  se-
curity  reviews  to  understand  what  it  is  they  do  and  then  verify  in 
fact, that they are doing it. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, if we looked at Texarkana, the train 
derailment there is an example, it’s quite recent, about a week ago. 
Hundreds  of  homes  were  evacuated  after  seven  empty  train  cars 
and  a  tanker  containing  propylene,  derailed  in  a  switch  yard,  ex-
ploding in a ball of fire. Initially, the police thought that the chem-
ical involved was vinyl acetate which releases poisonous fumes and 
officers  went  door  to  door  urging  thousands  of  people  in  a  two  by 
five mile area to move to the north side of town and I think it once 
again,  does  say  we’ve  got  to  make  certain  if  we  are  going  to  rely 
entirely on the private sector that things are done in a fashion that 
protects the people in the areas. 

So,  I  think  that  is  something  that  has  to  be  looked  at  and  I 
would  appreciate  getting  some  data  about  what  it  is  precisely  that 
the government does to check to see if these things are done. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  anxious  to  hear  the  next  panel  and  I’m  fin-

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you.  Senator  Boxer,  you  have  an  addi-

ished with mine. 

tional question? 

Senator  BOXER.  I  just  have  one  question  to  ask  to  Mr.  Hawley 
and  Mr.  Boardman,  whoever  feels  comfortable  doing  it.  One  of  the 
ways  that  I  am  told  back  home  we  can  really  help  the  situation  is 
to  have  enough  canine  patrols  because  they’re  pretty  effective. 
What do you think the needs are in terms of dollars to provide for 
canine patrols? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  ma’am,  I  believe  that  the  canine  patrol  is  an 
excellent  flexible  and  adaptive  security  measure  that  can  be  used 
in  a  transit  environment,  aviation  environment,  and  we  recently 
did a test with the inter-city bus environment. So, that is an impor-
tant  aspect  of  our  program.  We’ve  recently  increased  from  the  340 
range  up  to—we’re  now  going  to  be  close  to  about  450  dog  teams 
and we, in addition——

Senator BOXER. How many dogs in a team? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Three. 
Senator BOXER. And we have 450 operational now, teams? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  420  now.  We  have  added  through  a  program 
that people are in training now, 30 additional dogs or 10 teams for 
specifically transit including four in California. 

Senator BOXER. Are these all for Amtrak? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  These  are  for  transit  agencies  and  for  Amtrak,  we 
are  working  with  Amtrak  to  make  it  operationally  smooth  for  us 
to  deploy  dog  teams  from  either  other  locations  or  from  airports, 
other cities. 

Senator BOXER. Do you know what Amtrak says it needs for dog 

Mr. HAWLEY. I don’t know the dollar number, no. 
Senator BOXER. OK, well they need $156 million additional to se-
cure  their  largest  stations,  so  I  would  appreciate  if  you  would  talk 
with them so that you know what it is that they need because they 

teams? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

49

are  telling  us.  They  should  be  telling  you  or  you  should  be  asking 
them. 

Mr. HAWLEY. We do have conversations about it at all levels. 
Senator BOXER. OK. Well, Mr. Chairman, I just think—I just say 
that Amtrak is saying and they will tell us, they need $156 million 
in additional funds to secure the largest stations with canine teams 
and I’m just saying $156 million, given the tragedies that could be-
fall  us,  it’s  a  small  investment.  Every  time  a  car  comes  in  here, 
Senators  or  otherwise,  they  bring  out  a  canine  team  and  it  seems 
that  the  officers  feel  very  confident  and  comfortable  with  that  and 
it seems with all the high tech equipment we have, as you say Mr. 
Hawley, using canine teams works for a relatively small amount of 
money.  So,  I’m  done  with  my  questions  but  I  hope  that  you’ll  get 
with the Amtrak people. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Chairman, my colleague elicits a ques-
tion for me, if you don’t mind, about the same subject. Mr. Hawley, 
the Secretary of Transportation or his designee sits on the Amtrak 
Board.  In  April,  the  Board  approved  Amtrak’s  funding  request  for 
its  security  and  needs  up  to  $254  million  a  year.  If  this  funding 
was  needed  to  help  secure  Amtrak  and  the  25  million  people  who 
ride it annually, why didn’t the President ask for that in the budg-
et? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  TSA,  I’ll  speak  for  TSA,  has  the  multi-modal  re-
sponsibility and as such, we view—I view and our team views that 
Amtrak  is  very  much  within  the  zone  that  we  worry  about  and 
without  regard  to  whether  we  have  specific  Amtrak  programs  that 
we  use  programs  we  have  for  other  modes  including  Federal  Air 
Marshals to be available for opportunities that may be required for 
Amtrak. As well, as we mentioned the canine teams and even more 
broadly than that is the whole area of information sharing and in-
telligence sharing that I think, as far as TSA is concerned, Amtrak 
is  very,  very  high  on  the  priority  list  on  an  operational  level  and 
we work on that on a very intensive basis. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator,  we  are  going  to  have  to 

move on. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, OK. 
The CHAIRMAN. I wish you the best, I would ask that you provide 
us  with  a  list  of  the  cost  of  passengers  on  the  major  rail  systems 
which  you  are  talking  about,  what  Amtrak  and  other  passenger 
systems  throughout  the  country  on  a  basis  of—let’s  go  back  about 
4 years and bring it forward. To what extent have any of those peo-
ple  been  asked  to  pay  any  portion  of  increased  cost  to  safety  and 
security.  Thank  you  all  very  much  but  we  will  have  to  turn  to  the 
next witness list. 

Ms. BERRICK. Thank you. 
Mr. HAWLEY. Thank you. 
STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

ASSOCIATION OF AMERICAN RAILROADS 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  here  to  dis-
cuss  freight  railroad  security  with  the  Committee.  The  safety  and 
security  of  hazardous  materials  transportation,  of  course,  is  of  the 
utmost  concern  to  the  Nation’s  industry  and  perhaps  to  this  Com-
mittee as well so, let me move right into that issue. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

50

As  common  carriers,  let  me  emphasize  that  railroads  are  re-
quired by Federal law to move hazardous material and we move it 
in  the  safest,  most  efficient  way  possible.  In  fact,  we  have  a  very 
good safety record notwithstanding the fact that accidents do occur. 
In  2003,  we  moved  1.7  million  carloads  of  hazardous  materials—
99.998  percent  of  those  shipments  arrived  at  destination  without 
any release from an accident along the way. 

Railroads  are  sensitive  to  the  concerns  of  those  who  live  along 
rail  lines  and  we  take  very  seriously  our  obligation  to  move  haz-
ardous materials safely and securely. We assist communities in de-
veloping  and  evaluating  emergency  response  plans  and  help  train 
more  than  20,000  emergency  responders  each  year.  We  provide 
local  emergency  responders  with  a  list  of  the  most  dangerous 
chemicals  likely  to  be  moved  through  their  communities  and  work 
with  the  chemical  manufacturers,  shippers  and  tank  car  suppliers 
to improve operating procedures and tank car safety. 

As  you  are  aware,  Washington  D.C.  has  enacted  legislation  to 
ban  hazmat  shipments  over  certain  routes.  Other  cities,  Baltimore 
and  others,  are  considering  such  bans.  Legislation  has  been  pro-
posed in Congress to force rerouting of hazardous materials. We be-
lieve  that  is  the  wrong  approach  to  take.  Local  transit  bans  would 
not  eliminate  the  risk  inherent  in  moving  hazmat,  instead  they 
would shift the risk from one jurisdiction to another. Rerouting can 
actually  reduce  safety  because  it  involves  increased  mileage,  addi-
tional  yard  handling  and  dwell  time,  and  may  involve  use  of  lines 
that for a variety of reasons, are less suited to hazardous materials 
movement.  Banning  certain  hazmat  movements  by  rail  over  speci-
fied routes would put the government in a position of assigning the 
risk of hazmat-related incidents and then shifting hazardous mate-
rial transport from one location to another. 

An  alternative  approach  which  railroads  support,  is  to  increase 
efforts aimed at finding and utilizing safer substitutes for the most 
toxic  hazardous  materials.  These  constitute  a  fraction  of  the  haz-
ardous  materials  moved  by  rail  but,  are  responsible  for  approxi-
mately half of the overall cost of railroad insurance rates. The rail-
road  industry  is  acutely  aware  of  the  magnitude  of  this  challenge 
and that is why we reacted swiftly to the events of September 11th, 
hiring  outside  experts  to  work  with  us  to  develop  a  comprehensive 
security plan. 

The  plan  includes  an  inventory  of  critical  assets  and  has  as  its 
foundation  a  risk-based  analysis  of  potential  vulnerabilities.  It  in-
cludes  a  variety  of  countermeasures  that  are  keyed  to  specific 
threat  levels.  The  security  processes  and  analysis  detailed  in  the 
plan  are  periodically  evaluated  for  effectiveness  and  modified  as 
appropriate. 

Because  the  U.S.  rail  network  is  vast,  more  that  140,000  route 
miles  and  open,  our  plan  relies  very  heavily  on  access  to  intel-
ligence information and we are in constant communication with in-
telligence  and  security  personnel.  I’ve  testified  here  in  the  past 
about  our  plan  so,  I  will  not  repeat  anything  further  here.  Let  me 
just  move  quickly  to  what  we  believe  should  be  included  in  any 
new rail security legislation. 

We  believe  it  is  appropriate  for  the  AAR  Security  Plan  to  serve 
as  the  basis  for  a  government  rail  security  plan  because  we  have 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

51

already  identified  the  most  important  rail  assets  and  the  biggest 
threats  to  those  assets.  Any  new  legislation  should  also  include 
adequate  funding  to  implement  anti-terrorism  programs  including 
funds  to  safeguard  tunnels  used  by  Amtrak  and  commuter  rail-
roads  in  the  Northeast.  We  believe  that  funds  should  be  appro-
priated  to  research  and  deploy  rail  security  technologies  including 
automated security inspections, infrastructure integrity monitoring, 
communication-based  training  control  systems  and  reductions  in 
tank car vulnerability. 

Railroad  police  officers  should  be  authorized  to  exercise  law  en-
forcement powers on any railroad, not just their own. To date, rail-
roads  have  underwritten  the  cost  of  security  measures  to  benefit 
the  general  public  and  national  defense.  But,  protective  measures 
required  at  the  highest  alert  levels  cannot  be  sustained  by  rail-
roads alone. The industry security plan calls for use of the National 
Guard  and  local  police  to  augment  protection  of  critical  infrastruc-
ture.  States  should  be  reimbursed  by  the  Federal  Government  in 
those  instances.  Congress  should  also  extend  the  Terrorism  Risk 
Insurance  Act  to  provide  stability  and  certainty.  Freight  railroads 
are  proud  of  the  efforts  we  have  taken  to  keep  our  Nation’s  vital 
rail  transportation  link  open  and  secure  since  the  terrorist  attacks 
of  September  11.  We  will  continue  to  work  with  this  Committee, 
others in Congress, the various Federal agencies and relevant par-
ties to further enhance the safety and security of the Nation’s rail-
roads. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hamberger follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT/CEO, ASSOCIATION OF 

AMERICAN RAILROADS 

On behalf of the members of the Association of American Railroads (AAR), thank 
you  for  the  opportunity  to  meet  with  you  today  to  discuss  railroad  security.  AAR 
members  account  for  the  vast  majority  of  rail  mileage,  employees,  and  revenue  in 
Canada, Mexico, and the United States. 

Our  Nation’s  freight  railroad  industry,  which  has  developed  a  comprehensive  ap-
proach  to  protecting  our  rail  network  against  terrorist  threats,  is  keenly  aware  of 
the  tension  between  the  need  for  transportation  efficiency  and  the  assurance  that 
our  transportation  systems  are  adequately  protected  from  terrorist  and  other 
threats.  We  urge  Congress  to  strike  a  proper  balance  between  protecting  our  coun-
try’s  transportation  assets  and  its  citizens,  and  providing  for  the  free  flow  of  goods 
and  promoting  our  international  competitiveness.  As  Secretary  Mineta  has  re-
marked, ‘‘What we don’t want is for our checkpoints to become chokepoints. 

Below I will discuss the many ways that U.S. freight railroads have addressed se-
curity in the post 9/11 era and how security efforts can be improved. I will also dis-
cuss  pending  proposals  regarding  railroad  security  from  the  perspective  of  freight 
railroads. 
The Immediate Aftermath of September 11

The  rail  industry  reacted  swiftly  to  the  events  of  September  11,  2001.  In  the  im-
mediate  aftermath  of  the  attacks,  railroads  tightened  security  and  intensified  in-
spections  across  their  systems.  Major  railroads—which  maintain  their  own  police 
forces to help ensure the security of employees, property, and freight—put into place 
more than 50 permanent security-related countermeasures. 

In late September 2001, the AAR Board of Directors established a Railroad Secu-
rity Task Force. The task force had the full participation of AAR members, including 
our  Canadian  and  Mexican  members  and  the  American  Short  Line  and  Regional 
Railroad Association. The overarching goals of this task force were (1) to ensure the 
safety of rail employees and the communities in which railroads operate; (2) to pro-
tect the viability of national and regional economic activity; and (3) to make certain 
that  railroads  can  continue  to  play  their  vital  role  in  support  of  our  Nation’s  mili-
tary. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

52

Over  the  next  several  months,  the  task  force  conducted  a  comprehensive  risk 
analysis  of  the  freight  railroad  industry.  Using  CIA  and  national  intelligence  com-
munity ‘‘best practices,’’ five critical action teams (consisting of more than 150 expe-
rienced  railroad,  customer,  and  intelligence  personnel)  examined  and  prioritized 
railroad assets, vulnerabilities, and threats. The critical action teams were:

1. Information Technology and Communications: This team examined the secu-
rity  of  railroad  communications,  control  systems,  and  information  systems,  in-
cluding  an  evaluation  of  procedures  regarding  system  redundancy,  data  con-
fidentiality, emergency incident handling, and reconstitution of service.
2. Physical Infrastructure: This team assessed the physical security of essential 
bridges,  buildings,  dispatch  centers,  tunnels,  storage  facilities,  and  other  struc-
tures,  and  created  a  database  of  critical  assets.  The  team  also  addressed  cross-
border and port ‘‘gateway’’ physical security issues.
3. Operational Security: This team documented the ‘‘life cycle of a train and de-
termined ways to minimize exposure to unplanned occurrences while trains are 
in operation. It also addressed fuel supply.
4.  Hazardous  Materials:  This  team  examined  the  transport  of  hazardous  mate-
rials by rail, with emphasis on materials that pose the greatest potential safety 
risk, such as poisonous gases.
5.  Military  Liaison:  This  team  worked  with  the  Department  of  Defense  and  its 
Military  Traffic  Management  Command  (MTMC)  to  determine  immediate  and 
ongoing  military  traffic  needs.  The  MTMC,  which  has  since  been  renamed  the 
‘‘Surface  Deployment  and  Distribution  Command,  has  designated  30,000  miles 
of  rail  corridors  known  as  the  Strategic  Rail  Corridor  Network  (STRACNET)—
as essential to national defense.

In  addition  to  the  above  activities,  freight  railroads  cooperated  fully  with  a  sepa-
rate  team  that  covered  passenger  railroad  security  and  involved  the  Federal  Rail-
road Administration (FRA), commuter railroads, and Amtrak. 
The Terrorism Risk Analysis and Security Management Plan 

The  end  result  of  the  work  of  the  critical  action  teams  was  the  development  of 
a  Terrorism  Risk  Analysis  and  Security  Management  Plan  ( ‘‘Plan’’ ),  a  comprehen-
sive, priority-based blueprint of actions designed to enhance the security of our Na-
tion’s  freight  rail  network  and  its  ability  to  support  our  economy,  national  defense, 
and public health. 

The  AAR  Board  of  Directors  adopted  the  Plan  on  December  6,  2001,  and  it  re-
mains  in  effect  today.  The  security  processes  and  analyses  detailed  in  the  Plan,  in-
cluding  actions  and  countermeasures,  are  periodically  evaluated  for  effectiveness 
and  modified  as  appropriate—to  ensure  maximum  efficiencies  from  advances  in  se-
curity technology and procedures. 

The  Plan  defines  four  security  alert  levels  and  details  the  actions  to  be  taken  at 

each level as the terrorist threat increases. 

Alert  Level  1  is  ‘‘New  Normal  Day-to-Day  Operations’’  and  exists  when  a  general 
threat  of  possible  terrorist  activity  exists  but  warrants  only  a  routine  security  pos-
ture.  Actions  in  effect  at  this  level  include  conducting  security  training  and  aware-
ness  activities;  restricting  certain  information  to  a  need-to-know  basis;  restricting 
the ability of unauthenticated persons to trace certain sensitive materials; and peri-
odically testing that security systems are operating as intended. 

Alert Level 2 is ‘‘Heightened Security Awareness.’’ It applies when there is a gen-
eral non-specific threat of possible terrorist activity involving railroad personnel and 
facilities.  Additional  actions  in  effect  at  this  level  include  security  and  awareness 
briefings  as  part  of  daily  job  briefings;  conducting  content  inspections  of  cars  and 
containers  for  cause;  conducting  spot  content  inspections  of  motor  vehicles  on  rail-
road property; and increasing security at designated facilities. 

Alert  Level  3  means  there  is  ‘‘a  credible  threat  of  an  attack  on  the  United  States 
or  railroad  industry.’’  A  decision  to  declare  Level  3  will  be  evaluated  in  light  of  the 
specificity  of  threat  against  railroad  personnel  and  facilities.  Examples  of  Level  3 
actions  include  further  restricting  physical  access  and  increasing  security  vigilance 
at  control  centers,  communications  hubs,  and  other  designated  facilities,  and  re-
questing National Guard security for critical assets. 

Alert Level 4 applies when a confirmed threat against the rail industry exists, an 
attack against a railroad has occurred, an attack in the United States causing mass 
casualties  has  occurred,  or  other  imminent  actions  create  grave  concerns  about  the 
safety  of  rail  operations.  Security  actions  taken  at  this  level  include  stopping  non-
mission-essential  contract  services  with  access  to  critical  facilities  and  systems;  in-
creasing vigilance and scrutiny of railcars and equipment during mechanical inspec-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

53

tions to look for unusual items; and continuous guard presence at designated facili-
ties and structures. 

Alert  Levels  3  and  4  can  be  declared  industry-wide  for  a  short  period  of  time  or 
can be declared in a particular geographic or operational area (e.g., the Midwest or 
hazardous materials) where or when intelligence has identified that terrorist action 
against a specific location or operation is imminent. 
The Railway Alert Network and ST–ISAC 

To help ensure that the parties involved have access to pertinent intelligence and 
other  information,  the  rail  industry  is  in  constant  communication  with  intelligence 
and  security  personnel  at  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  and 
elsewhere  in  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS),  the  Department  of  De-
fense, the Department of Transportation (DOT), the FBI’s National Joint Terrorism 
Task Force (NJTTF), state and local law enforcement, and others. A railroad police 
officer  and  knowledgeable  railroad  analysts  work  literally  side-by-side  with  govern-
ment  intelligence  analysts  at  NJTTF  and  within  DHS  to  help  evaluate  intelligence 
at the Top Secret level. 

The heart of this communication system is the Railway Alert Network (RAN). The 
major  purpose  of  the  RAN  is  to  monitor  the  level  of  threat  to  the  rail  industry  and 
to alert the industry if it changes. The hub of the RAN is AAR’s Operations Center, 
which  operates  at  the  Secret  level  and  is  staffed  with  mobile  communications 
around  the  clock  at  Alert  Level  2  and  is  physically  staffed  at  Alert  Levels  3  and 
4. 

The  RAN  is  linked  to  the  Surface  Transportation  Information  Sharing  and  Anal-
ysis Center (ST–ISAC). The ST–ISAC, which was created by the AAR at the request 
of  the  U.S.  DOT,  provides  a  robust  capability  for  collecting,  analyzing,  and  distrib-
uting security information from worldwide resources to protect vital physical assets 
and information technology systems. AAR-member freight railroads and Amtrak are 
members  of  the  ST–ISAC.  Cleared  at  the  Top  Secret  level,  the  ST–ISAC  also  oper-
ates 24-hours-a-day, 7-days-a-week. 

In  addition,  approximately  75  transit  and  commuter  rail  authorities  (through 
APTA,  the  American  Public  Transit  Association)  have  been  members  of  the  ST–
ISAC.  However,  Federal  funding  for  ST–ISAC  membership  for  public  transit  agen-
cies was discontinued by DHS. APTA recently asked TSA to consider restoring those 
funds. AAR supports APTA’s request and, at the same time, asks that TSA also con-
sider  providing  funds  necessary  to  expand  the  reach  of  the  ST–ISAC  to  all  freight 
and commuter railroads that are not members of AAR. 

As all of these efforts make clear, the rail industry strongly concurs with the July 
2004 Final Report of the National Commission on Terrorist Attacks Upon the United 
States which called for ‘‘a different way of organizing government’’ that emphasizes 
a  unity  of  effort  as  reflected  in  the  phrase  ‘‘one  fight,  one  team.’’  The  Commission 
called  for  ‘‘unifying  the  many  participants  in  the  counterterrorism  effort  and  their 
knowledge  in  a  network-based  information  sharing  system  that  transcends  tradi-
tional government boundaries.’’ Toward this end, we are working cooperatively with 
TSA leadership on operational and policy issues that will further enhance rail secu-
rity. 

Obviously,  rail  security  efforts  depend  a  great  deal  on  the  efforts  of  railroads’ 
dedicated  and  highly  professional  employees—including  engineers  and  conductors 
aboard  trains,  maintenance  of  way  crews  and  inspectors  working  along  the  tracks, 
railroad  police  officers,  and  others.  They  are  the  ‘‘eyes  and  ears’’  in  the  industry’s 
security effort, and we should all be grateful for their vigilance and care. 

In recognition of the thoroughness of the railroad security plan and the dedication 
with  which  it  has  been  put  into  effect,  in  June  2003  the  Association  of  American 
Railroads  was  named  a  recipient  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Defense’s  James  S. 
Cogswell Award for Industrial Security. The Cogswell Award is the most prestigious 
award  in  the  industrial  security  field.  Of  nearly  11,000  cleared  contractors,  only  15 
were selected to receive the award in 2003. The railroad industry is also one of the 
few  private  sector  industries  to  receive  an  ‘‘A’’  for  its  security  efforts  in  an  inde-
pendent analysis by The Washington Post. 

Notwithstanding  all  of  these  rail  industry  efforts,  there  can  be  no  100  percent 
guarantee  against  terrorist  assaults.  If  such  an  assault  involving  freight  railroads 
occurs, railroads have established programs and procedures that can and will be in-
voked  that  are  designed  to  respond  to,  mitigate,  and  minimize  the  impact  of  such 
incidents. The programs and procedures include the establishment of emergency re-
sponse  plans  for  hazardous  materials  incidents,  business  continuity  plans,  and  the 
training of rail employees and public emergency response personnel. 

As  previously  mentioned,  the  freight  rail  industry  works  cooperatively  with  the 
Federal  Government  in  efforts  to  enhance  security.  However,  there  are  some  areas 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

54

where  better  coordination  is  needed.  These  improvements  should  focus  on  unifying 
government  policy  regarding  freight  rail  security  and  more  effectively  coordinating 
the  many  governmental  projects  that  affect  rail  security.  In  addition,  the  current 
system  of  dissemination  of  counter-terrorism  information  could  be  improved.  The 
railroads’ security plan is risk-based—the industry cannot protect everything all the 
time. Therefore, the government must provide timely and actionable threat informa-
tion to enable efficient and effective deployment of limited resources. 
Hazardous Materials Movements by Rail 

Approximately  1.7  million  carloads  of  hazardous  materials  (hazmat)  are  trans-
ported  by  rail  throughout  the  United  States  each  year—meaning  that  thousands  of 
hazmat carloads are in transit by rail every day—and 99.998 percent of these ship-
ments  reach  their  destination  without  a  release  caused  by  an  accident.  Moreover, 
railroads  have  reduced  overall  hazmat  accident  rates  by  90  percent  since  1980  and 
by 49 percent since 1990. 

In  2003  (the  most  recent  year  available),  hazardous  materials  of  all  types  ac-
counted for 4.9 percent of total U.S. freight rail carloads, 5.4 percent of tonnage, and 
6.3  percent  of  ton-miles.  Tank  cars  transport  approximately  68  percent  of  rail 
hazmat, 28 percent travel on intermodal flat cars, and the remainder moves in cov-
ered  hoppers,  gondolas,  and  other  car  types.  The  most  potentially  hazardous  mate-
rials,  termed  toxic  inhalation  hazards  (TIH),  are  a  subset  of  these  and  nearly  all 
are transported in tank cars. 

No  one  disputes  that  efforts  should  be  made  to  increase  hazmat  safety  and  secu-
rity where practical. Railroads understand this better than anyone: because of their 
common  carrier  obligation,  railroads  are  required  by  law  to  transport  these  ship-
ments,  even  though  this  transportation  involves  extraordinary  risks  for  the  indus-
try.  This  is  one  reason  why  railroads  support  the  extension  of  the  Terrorism  Risk 
Insurance  Act  (TRIA)  before  it  expires  at  the  end  of  2005.  Even  with  TRIA,  insur-
ance  has  become  more  expensive  and  difficult  for  railroads  to  obtain,  and  it  is  not 
possible  to  fully  insure  against  a  truly  catastrophic  incident.  Even  though  TIH  ac-
counts for a fraction of rail carloads, it contributes approximately 50 percent to the 
overall cost of railroad insurance rates. Insurance rates for AAR members have dou-
bled this year alone. For these reasons, the transport of certain hazardous materials 
has  the  potential  to  be  a  ‘‘bet  the  business’’  activity  for  railroads.  This  leads  to  our 
recommendation  that  Congress  should  consider  limiting  railroads’  liability  for  car-
rying out this public service, perhaps modeled after the Price-Anderson Act. 

Freight railroads are constantly working to ensure the continued safety of hazmat 

transport.

• The industry operates under its comprehensive Terrorism Risk Analysis and Se-

curity Management Plan, as described earlier.

• Railroads assist communities in developing and evaluating emergency response 
plans; through their own efforts and the Transportation Community Awareness 
and  Emergency  Response  Program  (TRANSCAER)  provide  training  for  more 
than 20,000 emergency responders per year; and support Operation Respond, a 
nonprofit  institute  that  develops  technological  tools  and  training  for  emergency 
response professionals.

• Trains containing specific amounts of the most hazardous materials are subject 
to special speed limits, passing restrictions, and inspections. Railroads increase 
track inspections, training, and installations of wheel defect detectors on routes 
over which these trains operate.

• Railroads work closely with chemical manufacturers in the Chemical Transpor-
tation Emergency Center (Chemtrec), a 24/7 resource that coordinates and com-
municates  a  broad  range  of  critical  information  that  may  be  needed  by  emer-
gency responders in mitigating a hazardous material related incident.

• Upon  request,  railroads  provide  local  emergency  response  agencies  with,  at  a 
minimum,  a  list  of  the  top  25  hazardous  materials  transported  through  their 
communities.  The  list  assists  local  emergency  responders  in  prioritizing  their 
emergency response plans to what is most likely to be transported through their 
areas.

• Railroads  participate  in  a  variety  of  R&D  efforts  to  enhance  tank  car  and 
hazmat safety. For example, railroads, tank car builders, and car owners jointly 
fund  the  Tank  Car  Safety  Research  and  Test  Project  (Project),  which  carefully 
analyzes accidents involving tank cars and continually updates a comprehensive 
database  on  the  precise  nature  of  damage  to  tank  cars.  Analysis  of  these  data 
improves  safety  by  improving  researchers’  ability  to  identify  the  causes  of  tank 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

55

car  releases  and  help  prevent  future  occurrences.  The  database  is  often  cited 
by the DOT as a role model for other modes of transportation.
In addition to data gathering and analysis, the Project is engaged in numerous 
ongoing research efforts, including developing better steels for tank cars; meas-
uring  the  railroad  operating  environment  to  refine  tank  car  design  require-
ments;  investigating  the  forces  generated  in  accidents  to  better  understand 
ways to further improve tank car damage resistance; determining the effects of 
thermal  protection  degradation  of  rail  tank  cars  in  service;  and  providing  vali-
dation  and  input  data  for  a  model  used  to  evaluate  the  effects  of  fire  on  tank 
cars.
• Beyond  the  Project,  the  rail  industry  and  rail  suppliers  are  constantly  inves-
tigating  other  ways  to  enhance  tank  car  safety.  For  example,  the  AAR’s  Tank 
Car  Committee  (a  group  of  technical  representatives  from  railroads,  shippers, 
and  tank  car  builders/lessors  that  works  closely  with  the  FRA  to,  among  other 
things, establish detailed tank car design standards and review individual tank 
car  design  drawings)  recently  supported  a  proposed  new  design  for  a  chlorine 
tank  car  that  would  reduce  the  risk  of  a  rupture  while  also  reducing  the  num-
ber  of  shipments.  Railroads  are  also  working  to  determine  what  standards 
should apply to the next generation of tank cars that handle TIH.
• Freight railroads support the tank car vulnerability studies contained in the re-
cently-passed  SAFETEA–LU  legislation  and  the  requirement  that  the  FRA  ini-
tiate a rulemaking on tank car design, and we urge the FRA to meet the dead-
lines for these important projects.
• Railroads  are  working  with  TSA  and  independently  to  identify  opportunities  to 
• Railroads comply with DOT rule HM–232.
Despite  rail  efforts  to  ensure  the  safety  of  hazmat  transport,  a  number  of  local 
and Federal proposals have been offered that would restrict rail movements of haz-
ardous materials in one way or another. One such proposal would give state or local 
authorities  the  ability  to  ban  the  movement  of  hazmat  through  their  jurisdictions. 
Another proposal would order railroads to provide local authorities advance notifica-
tion  of  hazmat  movements  through  their  jurisdictions.  Still  another  proposal  man-
dates  that  hazmat  routing  decisions  must  be  made  by  the  Federal  Government, 
rather than by railroads themselves. 

reduce exposure to terrorism in high threat rail corridors and terminals.

The  stated  rationale  for  these  types  of  proposals  is  often  ‘‘protection’’  against  ter-
rorist  attack  (especially  in  perceived  ‘‘high  threat’’  areas)  or  a  desire  to  be  able  to 
react  more  quickly  to  hazmat-related  incidents,  should  they  occur.  The  proposals 
may  be  well  intended,  but  the  end  result  of  their  enactment  would  likely  be  an  in-
crease in exposure to hazmat release and reduced safety and security. 
Banning Hazmat Movements by Rail 

Banning hazmat movements in particular jurisdictions would not eliminate risks, 
but instead would simply shift them from one place to another. In shifting that risk, 
it  could  foreclose  transportation  routes  that  are  optimal  in  terms  of  overall  safety, 
security, and efficiency. For example, the rail network is not similar to the highway 
network  where  there  are  myriad  alternate  routes.  In  the  rail  industry,  rerouting 
could add hundreds of miles and several days to a hazmat shipment, and those ad-
ditional  miles  and  days  could  be  on  rail  infrastructure  that  is  less  suitable  (for  a 
variety of reasons) to handling hazmat. (In fact, CSX has determined that rerouting 
hazmat  traffic  away  from  Washington,  D.C.,  as  proposed  by  the  D.C.  City  Council, 
would result in some 2 million additional car-miles per year the hazmat would have 
to travel.) Emergency responders along alternate routes may lack requisite expertise 
in  handling  the  most  dangerous  commodities.  Additional  switching  and  handling  of 
cars  carrying  hazmat  could  be  needed,  as  could  additional  dwell  time  in  yards.  As 
the  Department  of  Justice  and  the  DHS  noted  in  a  joint  brief  opposing  the  D.C. 
hazmat  ban,  the  increase  in  the  total  miles  over  which  hazmat  travels  and  the  in-
crease  in  total  time  the  materials  are  in  transit  would  ‘‘increase  their  exposure  to 
possible  terrorist  action,’’  and  therefore  potentially  reduce  safety  and  security.  The 
U.S.  DOT  also  submitted  a  statement  recognizing  that  banning  hazmat  shipments 
through certain areas reduces both safety and security. Moreover, the costs to man-
ufacturers and consumers of products that incorporate hazardous materials in their 
production  would  rise  commensurate  with  the  additional  costs  to  transport  these 
commodities. 

If  hazmat  transport  were  restricted  in  one  jurisdiction  (either  by  Federal  or  local 
action),  other  jurisdictions  would  undoubtedly  want  to  follow  suit.  In  fact,  that  is 
already  happening.  In  the  wake  of  action  (so  far  unsuccessful)  by  the  D.C.  City 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

56

Council  to  ban  hazmat  movements  through  Washington,  similar  efforts  are  being 
discussed  in  Atlanta,  Baltimore,  Boston,  Cleveland,  Chicago,  Philadelphia,  Pitts-
burgh,  and  probably  other  cities  too,  as  well  as  the  entire  State  of  California.  Ban-
ning hazmat shipments in even one city would be problematic; banning them in cit-
ies throughout the country would cause immense confusion and economic disruption 
nationwide—and would virtually shut down hazmat shipments by rail in this coun-
try. 

Moreover,  banning  hazmat  movements  by  rail  would  likely  lead  to  many  more 
movements  by  truck,  but  there  is  a  much  greater  chance  of  release  due  to  an  acci-
dent when hazmat is carried by truck than when it is carried by rail. Railroads and 
trucks  generate  roughly  equal  hazmat  ton-mileage,  but  trucks  have  16  times  more 
hazmat releases than railroads. 

An  integrated,  effective  national  rail  network  requires  uniform  standards  that 
apply nationwide. This uniformity, and the clarity and efficiency it brings, would be 
lost if different localities and routes were subject to widely different rules and stand-
ards  or  if  local  and/or  state  governments  could  dictate  what  types  of  freight  could 
pass through their jurisdictions. The problem is especially acute for railroads, whose 
network  characteristics  and  limited  routing  options  mean  that  disruptions  in  one 
area  can  have  profound  impacts  hundreds  or  even  thousands  of  miles  away.  These 
disruptions negatively affect all rail traffic, not just hazmat traffic.

Banning  certain  hazmat  movements  by  rail  over  specified  routes  would  put  the 
government  in  the  position  of  assigning  the  risk  of  hazmat-related  incidents,  and 
then shifting hazmat transport from locations with higher assigned risk to locations 
with  lower  assigned  risks.  An  alternative  approach,  which  railroads  support,  is  to 
increase  efforts  aimed  at  finding  and  utilizing  safer  substitutes  for  TIH  hazardous 
shipments. 
Hazmat Prenotification 

Hazmat pre-notification to local authorities is problematic for several reasons and 

may not accomplish the goals of those seeking it. 

First,  the  rail  industry  already  notifies  communities,  upon  request,  of  the  top  25 

hazardous commodities likely to be transported through their area. 

Second, at any one time, thousands of carloads of hazardous materials are moving 
by rail throughout the country, constantly leaving one jurisdiction and entering an-
other. The vast majority of these carloads do not—and due to the nature of rail op-
erations,  cannot  be  made  to—follow  a  rigid,  predetermined  schedule.  The  sheer 
quantity and transitory nature of these movements would make a workable pre-no-
tification system extremely difficult and costly to implement, for railroads and local 
officials  alike.  That’s  why  the  Fire  Chief  of  Rialto,  California,  commented,  ‘‘You’d 
have  to  have  an  army  of  people  to  stay  current  on  what’s  coming  through.  I  think 
it  wouldn’t  be  almost  overwhelming.  It  would  be  overwhelming.’’  The  greater  the 
number of persons to be notified, the greater the difficulty and cost would be. 

Third,  by  definition,  prenotification  would  vastly  increase  the  accessibility  of 
hazmat  location  information.  Making  this  information  far  more  accessible  than  it 
currently is could actually increase vulnerability to terrorist attack, not decrease it, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
1
b
m
a
h

57

because  it  would  magnify  the  possibility  that  the  information  could  fall  into  the 
wrong hands. 

Fourth,  railroads  provide  comprehensive  training  for  hazmat  emergency  respond-
ers in many of the communities they serve, and they already have well-established, 
effective  procedures  in  place  to  assist  local  authorities  in  the  event  of  hazmat  inci-
dents.  In  fact,  through  the  Transportation  Community  Awareness  and  Emergency 
Response Program, railroads help train more than 20,000 local emergency respond-
ers per year. 

Finally,  since  railroads  already  make  communities  aware  of  what  types  of  haz-
ardous  materials  are  likely  to  be  transported  through  their  area  and  since  they  al-
ready  provide  24/7  assistance  for  emergency  responders  (many  of  whom  railroads 
have  trained),  it  is  not  at  all  clear  that  information  obtained  by  local  authorities 
through  a  prenotification  system  would  actually  improve  their  ability  to  respond  to 
hazmat incidents in any meaningful way. 
Railroad Security Legislation 

A number of proposals have been offered in the Senate and House of Representa-
tives  regarding  railroad  security.  Freight  railroads  are  always  ready  and  willing  to 
discuss how security can be enhanced more effectively. To that end, we support the 
following provisions of rail security legislation:

• A comprehensive security plan should be developed that includes the identifica-
tion  of  the  most  important  rail  assets  and  the  identification  of  the  biggest 
threats to those assets. In developing this plan, the government should use the 
AAR’s Security Plan as the basis. Certain provisions of S. 1052, the ‘‘Transpor-
tation  Security  Improvement  Act  of  2005’’  and  S.  1379,  the  ‘‘Rail  Security  Act 
of 2005,’’ are consistent with this approach.

• Adequate  funding  to  implement  antiterrorism  programs  for  passenger  and 
freight railroads should be appropriated, including funding to safeguard tunnels 
used by Amtrak and commuter railroads in the Northeast. S. 1052 and S. 1379 
each  authorize  more  than  $1  billion  for  grants  for  these  purposes.  Freight  rail-
roads  should  be  able  to  apply  for  the  grants  directly  rather  than  have  to  go 
through the states.

• Funds should also be granted to research and deploy rail security technologies, 
including  automated  security  inspections,  infrastructure  integrity  monitoring 
systems,  emergency  bridge  repair  and  replacement,  communication-based  train 
control systems, and tank car vulnerability reductions. S. 1052 and S. 1379 au-
thorize funds for these purposes.

• Railroad police officers should be authorized to exercise law enforcement powers 

on any railroad. This provision is in S. 1052 and S. 1379.

Railroads respectfully suggest that additional provisions would enhance rail secu-

rity legislation:

• To date, railroads have been underwriting the cost of security measures for the 
benefit  of  the  general  public  and  for  national  defense.  However,  protective 
measures  required  at  the  highest  alert  levels  cannot  be  sustained  by  the  rail 
industry  alone.  This  is  reflected  in  the  railroads’  Terrorism  Risk  Analysis  and 
Security  Management  Plan,  which,  at  the  highest  alert  levels,  calls  for  the  use 
of National Guard and local law enforcement support to augment industry pro-
tection  of  critical  infrastructure.  States  should  be  reimbursed  by  the  Federal 
Government for expenses associated with helping to guard critical rail assets at 
high levels of alert.

• The  TSA  and  the  FRA  should  clarify  which  agency  has  ultimate  responsibility 
for  which  aspects  of  rail  safety  and  security.  Today,  the  allocation  of  responsi-
bility is not always clear.

• A  Federal  grant  program  should  be  established  to  reimburse  railroads  for  ex-
penses  mandated  by  the  TSA  or  by  other  government  entities,  including  man-
dates that result from high-risk corridor assessments.

• As  noted  previously,  Congress  should  extend  TRIA  before  it  expires  at  the  end 
of  2005.  The  need  for  a  Federal  backstop  that  provides  stability  and  certainty 
remains.

• Congress  should  endorse  the  rail  and  chemical  industries’  request  for  a  nar-
rowly-tailored  relaxation  of  antitrust  prohibitions  that  would  allow  chemical 
companies and railroads to work together to reduce the public’s exposure to IH 
shipments.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

58

Finally, railroads believe that certain provisions of rail security legislation, includ-

ing the following, are not necessary or appropriate.

• Banning  hazmat  transport  by  rail  through  certain  jurisdictions  or  requiring 
prenotification (as called for, for example, by S. 1256, the ‘‘Hazardous Materials 
Vulnerability  Reduction  Act  of  2005’’ )  should  be  opposed.  Earlier  in  this  testi-
mony I explained why railroads oppose this legislation.
On  a  somewhat  related  note,  S.  1052  calls  for  DHS  to  approve  railroads’  ‘‘high 
hazard  security  threat  mitigation’’  plans,  ‘‘including  alternative  routing  and 
temporary  shipment  suspension  options.’’  Routing  of  hazmat  by  railroad  dis-
patchers  is  based  on  dynamic  factors  such  as  the  condition  of  track,  weather, 
and  traffic  congestion  so  as  to  ensure  the  selection  of  the  safest  possible  route 
at any given moment. As the rail industry’s response to Hurricane Katrina and 
Hurricane Rita makes clear, the industry is capable of quickly detouring traffic 
as  conditions  warrant.  The  Federal  Government  is  ill-suited  to  perform  this 
task,  so  the  requirement  for  DHS  approval  of  these  plans  should  be  dropped.
• Mandating  that  freight  railroads  submit  employee  security  plans  to  DHS  or 

DOT for approval, as called for in S. 1052 and S. 1379, is unnecessary.
Since  the  terrorist  attacks  on  September  11,  2001,  freight  railroads  have  pro-
vided  ongoing  general  security  awareness  training  to  all  employees,  and  some 
railroads  have  gone  so  far  as  to  include  security  training  as  part  of  the  annual 
FRA-mandated  employee  certification  process.  In  an  effort  to  further  increase 
the  level  of  security  awareness  for  their  employees,  AAR  member  railroads  are 
working  with  the  National  Transit  Institute  (NTI)  at  Rutgers  University  to  de-
velop  a  uniform  security  awareness  curriculum  that  will  significantly  enhance 
the level of employee security training. The curriculum is modeled after the pro-
gram  NTI  and  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  developed  for  public  transit 
agency employees.
The  goal  of  the  training  is  to  provide  rail  employees  with  an  understanding  of 
their  role  and  responsibility  in  system  security,  and  how  to  implement  their 
companies’  procedures  upon  detection  of  suspicious  objects  or  activities.  Course 
modules include instructions on reacting to threats, identifying suspicious activ-
ity, identifying suspicious objects, and responding to incidents.
• Mandates  regarding  the  use  of  wireless  terrestrial  or  satellite  communication 
technology  to  track  and  locate  rail  cars  carrying  hazmat  or  to  identify  actual 
or  imminent  hazardous  material  release  are  premature.  While  railroads  agree 
that there is benefit to the ability to detect hazmat breaches from rail cars and 
to  communicate  breach  events  to  train  crews  and  dispatchers,  this  technology 
must be carefully developed to ensure full functionality, appropriate design, reli-
ability, and security. AAR is working with DHS and FRA to that end. 

Passenger Railroads 

As Members of this Committee are aware, more than 90 percent of the route mile-
age  over  which  Amtrak  operates,  as  well  as  a  significant  portion  of  the  trackage 
over which many commuter railroads operate, is actually owned and maintained by 
freight  railroads.  Therefore,  actions  taken  by  freight  railroads  to  enhance  security 
also benefit passenger rail. Freight railroad police coordinate with and support Am-
trak  police  to,  among  other  things,  increase  uniformed  police  presence  in  rail  pas-
senger stations. Amtrak, commuter rail and transit authorities, and the freight rail-
roads  receive  and  share  threat  and  incident  information  through  the  RAN  and  the 
ST-ISAC. 

That  said,  freight  railroad  security-related  plans  and  procedures  are  not  specifi-
cally  designed  to  protect  passengers  or  to  be  a  substitute  for  actions  that  Amtrak 
or other passenger railroad operators might choose or be requested to take. 
Port and Border Security 

The issue of port and border security extends far beyond the issue of rail security, 
although  railroads,  by  virtue  of  the  fact  that  they  carry  millions  of  containers  un-
loaded from or loaded on to steamships each year and move hundreds of thousands 
of railcars and intermodal units across the Canadian or Mexican borders each year, 
are certainly impacted. 

Ports  have  spent  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  enhancing  their  security,  much 
of  it  funded  by  Federal  grants.  Railroads  work  closely  with  the  Captains  of  Ports 
to  ensure  compliance  with  Coast  Guard  regulations  regarding  port  facility  security. 
U.S.  freight  railroads  also  work  diligently  with  the  U.S.  Bureau  of  Customs  and 
Border Protection (CBP) and others to enhance border security. For example, a cou-
ple  of  years  ago  the  U.S.  and  Canadian  customs  agencies  and  Canada’s  two  major 
railways  signed  a  declaration  of  principles  to  enhance  security  at  the  Canada-U.S. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

59

border  and  to  ensure  secure  rail  access  to  the  United  States.  The  declaration—
signed  by  the  CBP,  the  Canada  Customs  and  Revenue  Agency  (CCRA),  Canadian 
National  Railway  (CN),  and  Canadian  Pacific  Railway  (CP)—outlines  principles  for 
targeting,  screening,  and  examining  rail  shipments  transported  by  the  Canadian 
carriers into the United States. The declaration includes guidelines for the electronic 
transmission  of  cargo  information  by  the  railroads  to  customs  officials  in  advance 
of each train’s arrival at the border and installation of Vehicle and Cargo Inspection 
System (VACIS) and radiation detection equipment at CN and CP border crossings. 
Rail  VACIS  systems,  which  are  also  in  use  at  rail  border  crossings  with  Mexico, 
use  gamma  ray  technology  to  scan  entire  trains  one  railcar  at  a  time.  The  gamma 
ray  source  and  detectors  are  stationary  as  the  train  moves  through  the  system.  In-
spectors examine scanned images of rail cars for contraband, potential terrorists, or 
terrorist  weapons  without  opening  them  and  potentially  endangering  lives.  Sus-
picious  rail  cars  are  segregated  for  inspection,  with  minimal  disruption  to  the  flow 
of legitimate commerce. Today, where CBP has installed this equipment on the bor-
ders with both Canada and Mexico, 100 percent of rail cars are screened. 

U.S.  freight  railroads  are  also  active  participants  in  the  Customs-Trade  Partner-
ship Against Terrorism (C–TPAT), a joint government-business initiative within the 
CBP to build cooperative relationships that strengthen overall supply chain and bor-
der  security.  Through  this  initiative,  CBP  is  asking  businesses—including  rail-
roads—to ensure the integrity of their security practices and communicate their se-
curity guidelines to their business partners within the supply chain. I am happy to 
report  that  all  U.S.  Class  I  railroads  are  currently  C–TPAT  certified.  The  certifi-
cation  process  involves  a  comprehensive  review  of  a  railroad’s  procedural  security, 
physical  security,  personnel  security,  education  and  training,  access  controls,  mani-
fest procedures, and conveyance security. 

Railroads  have  also  been  active  participants  in  the  significant  expansion  of  Inte-
grated Border Enforcement Teams (IBET) across the U.S./Canada border. The man-
date  of  these  teams  is  to  enhance  border  integrity  and  security  by  ‘‘identifying,  in-
vestigating and interdicting persons and organizations that pose a threat to national 
security or engage in other organized crime activity.’’

Finally,  on  January  5,  2004,  CBP  regulations  requiring  all  transportation  modes 
to  submit  cargo  information  electronically  before  arriving  at  the  U.S.  border  came 
into  effect.  The  rail  industry  was  an  active  participant  in  developing  these  regula-
tions, and railroads are complying with this requirement. 
Conclusion 

U.S.  freight  railroads  are  proud  of  the  success  they  achieved  in  keeping  our  Na-
tion’s  vital  rail  transport  link  open  following  the  September  11,  2001  terrorist  at-
tacks.  Since  then,  railroads  have  taken  many  steps  to  increase  the  security  of  our 
Nation’s  rail  network,  including  the  development  of  a  comprehensive  security  man-
agement  plan  that  incorporates  four  progressively  severe  alert  levels.  We  will  con-
tinue  to  work  with  this  Committee,  others  in  Congress,  Federal  agencies,  and  all 
other  relevant  parties  to  further  enhance  the  safety  and  security  of  our  Nation’s 
railroads and the communities they serve.

STATEMENT OF WILLIAM L. CROSBIE, SENIOR VICE 

PRESIDENT, OPERATIONS, AMTRAK 

Mr.  CROSBIE.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members.  I  would 
like  to  thank  this  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  pas-
senger rail security and the steps Amtrak has taken to enhance se-
curity and safety for our passengers. 

You are to be commended for organizing this hearing and for ad-
vancing  legislation  to  increase  funding  for  rail  security.  I  applaud 
your  efforts  and  leadership  on  this  matter  and  the  attention  given 
to rail security in S. 1052. I say this because time is of the essence. 
None  of  us  can  afford  to  wait  until  another  catastrophe  occurs. 
Those  who  use  our  trains  should  have  the  confidence  that  every 
reasonable  action  to  protect  and  secure  their  well-being  and  safety 
has been taken. 

Despite  the  openness  of  our  Nation’s  rail  system  and  the  chal-
lenges it brings, I believe we have taken long strides in making our 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

60

facilities  and  trains  more  secure.  For  us,  security  has  become  one 
of  the  costs  of  doing  business  because  we  know  the  nature  of  the 
threats our Nation faces will be with us for a long time. 

Today,  let  me  briefly  outline  for  you  what  we  have  learned  from 
previous  terrorist  events  both  here  and  abroad,  the  steps  we  have 
taken  to  address  the  knowledge  learned  from  these  events,  and 
what we have planned to do in the near future. As part of the testi-
mony I have submitted for the record, I have explained what steps 
Amtrak  has  already  taken  in  the  wake  of  the  terrorist  attacks  in 
Madrid and London. 

What  I  would  like  to  do  today  in  the  short  time  I  have  allotted 
is  explain  what  additional  measures  we  have  identified  in  our  Se-
curity  Investment  Plan  and  what  we  at  Amtrak  could  do  to  en-
hance  the  safety  of  our  passengers  and  employees  if  we  had  addi-
tional resources. 

For  us,  one  of  the  more  significant  recent  occurrences  has  been 
our  ability  to  receive  Federal  funding  for  rail  security  improve-
ments  through  the  Fiscal  2005  Homeland  Security  Appropriations 
bill  under  the  Intercity  Passenger  Rail  Security  Grant  Program. 
Prior to Fiscal 2005, the Corporation did not qualify for such grant 
programs  because  it  did  not  meet  the  eligibility  requirements  of 
being  a  state  or  local  transit  agency.  In  addition  to  having  a  risk 
assessment  of  Amtrak’s  Northeast  Corridor  and  Chicago  hub  area 
performed by Homeland Security through their contracted corpora-
tion, Amtrak will use $6.1 million in funds for a number of security 
priorities, including but not limited to: increasing the number of ex-
plosive  detection  canine  teams.  Purchasing  new  explosive-resistant 
trash  cans,  adding  radiological  detection  and  verification  pagers, 
and implementing a new passenger awareness program. 

The  funding  provided  as  part  of  the  Homeland  Security  grant 
will go a long way and will be put to good use. In addition to hard-
ening  our  assets  and  improving  our  technology,  we  are  relying 
more  and  more  on  the  improved  intelligence-sharing  initiatives 
among key domestic agencies that are geared toward improving se-
curity within the rail industry. 

Coordination  with  Federal  agencies  and  national  law  enforce-
ment  organizations  is  essential  to  thwarting  future  potential  ter-
rorist attacks. We also worked with international partners, particu-
larly  those  in  Spain  and  England  who  have  direct  experience  in 
dealing  with  rail-related  terrorism.  From  a  planning  perspective, 
Amtrak has recently modified its security investment plan and has 
identified  $156  million  in  critical  funding  needs.  This  is  a  detailed 
plan that prioritizes and itemizes our most urgent projects. 

Amtrak  maintains  several  control  centers  that  need  to  have  re-
dundancy and to have a secure location for these vital communica-
tion and control operations. This project would consolidate these ac-
tivities  into  one  building.  I  cannot  emphasize  enough  how  crucial 
this  element  of  our  plan  is  to  the  entire  package  of  security  pro-
posals.  Amtrak  needs  to  upgrade  security  at  our  largest  stations 
which typically handle hundreds of thousands of people per day. In 
addition  to  closed  circuit  television  and  physical  security  improve-
ments,  explosive  detection  devices  and  additional  radiological 
pagers  would  be  disseminated  to  our  sworn  personnel  for  use  in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

61

major  stations  and  other  strategic  stations  along  the  Northeast 
Corridor. 

Amtrak  effectively  tracks  train  movement  over  the  tracks  that 
the  Corporation  owns,  mainly  over  the  electrified  Northeast  Cor-
ridor. Throughout the rest of the country, however, the chief means 
of communications with trains is through radio and cell phone tele-
communication  systems.  Such  systems  do  not  adequately  address 
reliable  train  tracking,  emergency  response  efforts  and  have  failed 
during critical incidents. 

Amtrak has identified the need to significantly upgrade its exist-
ing,  antiquated  GPS  system  and  would  like  to  have  it  integrated 
with  Amtrak’s  central  computer  system  to  provide  the  exact  loca-
tion for each train. Thus, additional funding in this area is critical 
and badly needed. 

Last,  with  regard  to  our  ongoing  fire/life  safety  program,  there 
are  numerous  infrastructure  projects  funded  by  the  existing  $100 
million tunnel life safety grant provided in the Fiscal 2002 Depart-
ment  of  Defense  and  Emergency  Supplemental  Appropriations  for 
Recovery  and  Response  to  the  terrorist  attacks  on  the  United 
States of which $71 million has been expended. This work is ongo-
ing and significant progress has been made. 

Funding  is  being  used  to  improve  radio  coverage,  wayside  com-
munication  and  tunnel  portal  security  to  secure  all  tunnel  access 
points  and  improve  security  for  trains  traveling  through  the  major 
tunnels  on  the  Northeast  Corridor.  The  nature  of  improvements 
consists  of  physical  and  technology-based  security  improvements, 
such  as  closed  circuit  television,  event  activated  alarm  systems, 
high-security  fencing  and  lighting,  the  strategic  placement  of  vehi-
cle  barriers.  In  addition,  this  tunnel  security  portion  of  the  plan 
would  also  include  similar  upgrades  at  the  Washington,  D.C.  First 
Street Tunnel and the Baltimore tunnels. Fencing improvements in 
the  area  of  the  Baltimore  tunnels  has  already  begun  and  fencing 
improvements  are  scheduled  throughout  Amtrak’s  5-year  capital 
plan. 

The  bottom  line  is  this,  we  have  learned  much  through  the  re-
cent  tragedies  and  terrorist  attacks  against  public  transportation. 
We have done our best to identify and prioritize our needs and use 
of  the  scarce  funds  where  they  will  have  the  most  impact.  As  you 
and  this  Committee  are  all  too  aware,  as  much  as  we  would  like 
to, Amtrak is not in a position financially to allocate huge amounts 
of additional resources to security. We are engaged in a very costly 
but  long  over  due  capital  reinvestment  program  to  rebuild  our 
plant and equipment and to bring infrastructure to a state of good 
repair. 

At  the  same  time,  we  have  also  allocated  additional  resources 

where feasible for security as well as the operational——

The CHAIRMAN. We limit people to 5 minutes. I would appreciate 

it if you could find a way to end your testimony. 

Mr.  CROSBIE.  I’m  just  about  finished,  sir.  These  dollars  only  go 
so  far  and  we  need  additional  resources  to  enhance  the  security  of 
our national system. I’d be happy to answer a few questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Crosbie follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

62

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM L. CROSBIE, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

OPERATIONS, AMTRAK 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Senate Commerce, Science and Transportation 
Committee,  I  would  like  to  thank  this  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on 
passenger  rail  security  and  the  steps  Amtrak  has  taken  to  enhance  security  and 
safety for our passengers. 

You  are  to  be  commended  for  organizing  this  hearing  and  for  advancing  legisla-
tion  to  increase  funding  for  rail  security.  I  applaud  your  efforts  and  leadership  on 
this  matter  and  the  attention  given  to  rail  security  in  S.  1052.  I  say  this  because 
time  is  of  the  essence.  None  of  us  can  afford  to  wait  until  another  catastrophe  oc-
curs.  Those  who  use  our  trains  should  have  the  confidence  that  every  reasonable 
action to protect and secure their well-being and safety has been taken. 

Despite  the  openness  of  our  Nation’s  rail  system  and  the  challenges  it  brings,  I 
believe  we  have  taken  long  strides  in  making  our  facilities  and  trains  more  secure. 
For us, security has become one of the costs of doing business because we know the 
nature of the threats our Nation faces will be with us for a long time. 

Today, let me briefly outline for you what we have learned from previous terrorist 
events  both  here  and  abroad,  the  steps  we  have  taken  to  address  the  knowledge 
learned from these events, and what we have planned to do in the near future. 
Amtrak Reactions to Events at Home and Abroad 

After  the  terrorist  attacks  of  September  11,  2001,  followed  by  the  Moscow,  Ma-
drid, and London tragedies, the landscape of Amtrak’s law enforcement responsibil-
ities and duties changed markedly. Amtrak Police now have to ensure that thorough 
terrorism-based vulnerability and threat assessments are conducted, that emergency 
response  and  evacuation  plans  have  been  formulated,  implemented  and  tested,  and 
that Amtrak develops security measures that address not only vandalism and other 
forms of street crime, but the potential for Madrid and London type attacks on our 
passengers and on our property. 

Since September 11, the Amtrak Police and Security Department has established 

and reinforced the following security improvements:

• Instituted Passenger ID procedure for purchase of most tickets.
• Improved baggage weight restriction policies for carry-on and checked baggage.
• Created a baggage tagging requirement.
• Developed and instituted a Security Threat Level Response Plan that is tied to 
the Homeland Security Advisory System and requires a series of security meas-
ures be undertaken at each alert level.

messages are disseminated to employees.

• Added 12 explosive detection canine teams.
• Created a Security Information Center in which bulletins, updates and security 
• Purchased  and  deployed  radiological  gamma/neutron  pagers  at  Amtrak’s  major 
stations  to  address  radiological  threats  and  coordinated  alerts  with  local  police 
agencies.
• Coordinated  security  counter-measure  issues  with  transit  and  freight  railroad 
• Commissioned  blast  vulnerability  studies  of  the  New  York  tunnels  and  major 
• Revised  the  five-year  Capital  Plan  to  include  numerous  security  upgrades,  in-
cluding  high  security  fencing,  yard  security  improvements,  and  access  control 
upgrades.

counterparts.

stations.

After  the  Madrid  bombings,  Amtrak  again  increased  uniform  patrols  at  stations 
and on platforms and checked baggage rooms in greater frequency as well as critical 
infrastructure. It also:

could be dialed and individuals directly connected to a 911 Operator.

• Issued Security Handbooks to all employees.
• Made technological improvements to the Railphone system on trains so that 911 
• Created  security  focus  groups  made  up  of  employees  and  passengers  to  ascer-
• Obtained  assistance  from  freight  law  enforcement  agencies  who  patrolled  some 
• Held  system-wide  security  conference  calls  for  managers  and  directed  them  to 

tain if security measures and objectives were being properly performed.

Amtrak stations.

engage employees on their role in security matters.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

63

As  Amtrak  continued  to  review  its  security  needs  and  vulnerabilities,  it  recog-
nized the need to create a security consciousness for all employees at all levels and 
to  have  a  clear  chain  of  command.  Last  year  the  corporation  created  an  executive-
level  position,  the  Vice  President  of  Security.  Alfred  J.  Broadbent,  a  former  Metro-
politan Police Department Assistant Chief, was appointed to this position on August 
2, 2004. All police and security functions now report to Mr. Broadbent, who reports 
to  me.  An  Executive  Security  Committee  was  also  established  and  meets  weekly 
with  him  to  discuss  security  policy,  procedures,  operational  and  capital  security 
planning as well as terrorist threat and intelligence information. 

One  of  the  first  efforts  undertaken  by  the  Vice  President  of  Security  was  the  re-
engineering  of  Amtrak’s  primary  terrorist  security  plan,  the  Security  Threat  Level 
Response  Plan.  This  plan  now  contains  more  meaningful  and  measurable  counter-
measures  and  it  is  closely  coordinated  with  recently  created  Security  Coordinating 
Committees that consist of management level officials across Amtrak’s operating de-
partments. Each Amtrak operating division has a Security Coordinating Committee 
that  meets  regularly  with  Police  and  Security  Managers  to  ensure  that  basic  secu-
rity  practices  and  steps  are  undertaken  and  completed.  The  countermeasures  con-
tained  in  the  Threat  Level  Response  Plan  provide  a  coordination  of  efforts  directed 
to  specific  threats  and  attempt  to  create  some  basis  for  a  layered  security  system 
that  would  improve  deterrence  capabilities.  Some  of  the  countermeasures  that 
would  be  drilled  down  and  enforced  by  Amtrak  Police  personnel  and  the  Security 
Coordinating Committees would be assurance that only necessary access points are 
kept  open,  that  gates,  doors  and  other  barriers  are  locked  and  secured,  and  that 
rolling  stock  and  locomotives  are  locked  and  secured  while  this  equipment  is  in  a 
yard and/or standing at a station. Since August of 2004, the Amtrak Police and Se-
curity Department has also developed and implemented the following programs:

greater degree of frequency, mostly on the busy NEC.

• Tactical  Intensive  Patrols  (TIPS)—Sworn  Amtrak  personnel  patrol  specific  sta-
tion  areas  and  conduct  checks  of  baggage  with  passengers,  provide  security  tip 
information and establish uniform presence.
• Train  Riding  Patrols—Sworn  Amtrak  personnel  have  been  riding  trains  in  a 
• Counter-terrorism training conducted by the Federal Law Enforcement Training 
Center (FLETC) has been scheduled for all sworn personnel and was completed 
in FY05.
• Amtrak  Management,  DHS  and  the  National  Transit  Institute  developed  a  Se-
curity  Awareness  Training  Program  for  all  employees.  This  training  is  under-
way and is scheduled for completion in December 2005.
• Amtrak Police and Security coordinate its security concerns and initiatives with 

its Federal partners: DHS, TSA, DOT, and FRA.

Access to Resources 

For  Amtrak,  one  of  the  more  significant  recent  occurrences  has  been  our  ability 
to  receive  Federal  funding  for  rail  security  improvements  through  the  FY05  DHS 
Appropriations  bill  under  the  Intercity  Passenger  Rail  Security  Grant  Program. 
Prior  to  FY05,  the  Corporation  did  not  qualify  for  such  grant  programs  because  it 
did not meet the eligibility requirements of being a state or local transit agency. In 
addition  to  having  a  Risk  Assessment  of  Amtrak’s  NEC  and  Chicago  hub  area  per-
formed  by  a  DHS  contracted  corporation,  Amtrak  will  use  $6.3  million  in  funds  to 
increase security at Amtrak by:

and DHS on next generation CCTV systems.

• Adding explosive detection canine teams.
• Purchasing new explosive resistant trash cans.
• Deploying PROTECT (chemical detection equipment) systems at major stations.
• Conducting  a  Pilot  Program  with  the  Transportation  Security  Working  Group 
• Adding radiological detection and verification pagers and portals.
• Increasing tunnel protection.
• Implementing a new passenger awareness program.
• Conducting a major exercise in Washington, D.C.
We  have  also  been  involved  in  numerous  initiatives  with  the  agencies  that  are 
geared  toward  improving  security  within  the  rail  industry.  Highlighted  below  are 
some of these interactions:

• Improved  intelligence  gathering  capabilities  by  working  closely  with  Federal 
and  State  agencies  and  industry  partners.  Agencies  include:  DHS,  TSA  (Trans-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

64

portation  Security  Operations  Center—TSOC),  DOT  (Office  of  Intelligence  and 
Security—OIS), FRA (Surface Transportation-Information Sharing and Analysis 
Center—ST/ISAC), and the industry AAR (Railway Alert Network—RAN).
• Continued  assignment  of  an  Amtrak  investigator  to  work  with  the  FBI  in  the 
New  York  Joint  Terrorism  Task  Force.  Other  investigators  will  be  assigned  to 
the  National  Capital  Region,  Chicago,  and  Long  Beach,  CA  JTTFs  in  the  near 
future.
• DHS/TSA  sponsored  two  emergency  response  drills  in  which  multiple  Federal, 
State  and  local  agencies  participated.  Drills  were  based  on  terrorist  act  sce-
narios.
• DHS/TSA  has  worked  with  Amtrak  as  a  venue  location  for  the  Transportation 
• DHS/TSA and ICE has worked with Amtrak and upgraded the delivery of inter-
national  traveler  information  for  border  inspection  travel  improvements  and 
counter-terrorism purposes.
• FRA/TSA has partnered with Amtrak and used ‘‘airport type’’ screening at Am-
trak  stations  during  National  Security  Sensitive  Events  (RNC  and  Inaugural 
Event).
• TSA  is  also  doing  clearances  and  working  closely  with  Amtrak  in  improving 
passenger  manifest  information  and  in  coordinating  Amtrak’s  industrial  secu-
rity clearance program.

Workers Identification Card (TWIC) program.

In  addition  to  Amtrak’s  security  programs  with  the  above  agencies,  Amtrak  has 
also  received  the  expertise  and  help  of  the  State  of  New  York’s  National  Guard.  It 
has  provided  additional  resources  in  the  form  of  National  Guard  personnel  to  sup-
port uniform forces at Penn Station, New York. 
Next Steps 

Today,  Amtrak  Police  and  Security  continue  its  efforts  to  improve  the  safety  and 
security  of  Amtrak  passengers,  employees  and  patrons.  In  February  of  this  year,  it 
participated in a special meeting and debriefing with leaders of Spain’s law enforce-
ment and military agencies and Renfre, the Spanish Commuter line involved in the 
Madrid  bombings.  Police  and  Security  managers  attended  a  special  briefing  last 
week  in  relation  to  the  London  bombings  and  plan  to  have  a  meeting  with  British 
Transport  Police  later  this  year  to  receive  a  similar  briefing  and  ‘‘lessons  learned’’ 
update on these terrorist tragedies. The department is also in the midst of a reorga-
nization  that  will  channel  and  deploy  resources  in  a  more  effective  manner  to  ad-
dress the security realities of today’s rail systems. 

From  a  planning  perspective,  Amtrak  has  recently  modified  its  Security  Invest-

ment Plan and has identified $156 million in critical funding needs.

• Dispatch  and  Control  Centers—Amtrak  maintains  several  control  centers 
that need to have redundancy and to have a secure location for these vital com-
munication  and  control  operations.  This  project  would  consolidate  Amtrak’s 
CETC (Centralized Electrified Traffic Control Center), CNOC (Consolidated Na-
tional  Operations  Center)  and  the  NCC  (Police  Department  Radio  Center)  into 
one building. This location would be constructed so that access is restricted and 
basic  CPTED  (Crime  Prevention  Through  Environmental  Design)  concepts  em-
ployed.  I  cannot  emphasize  enough  how  crucial  this  element  of  our  plan  is  to 
the entire package of security proposals.
• Securing  Amtrak’s  Largest  Stations—Amtrak  needs  to  upgrade  security  at 
the largest stations which typically handle hundreds of thousands of people per 
day.  In  addition  to  CCTV  and  physical  security  improvements,  explosive  detec-
tion devices and additional radiological devices/pagers would be disseminated to 
sworn personnel for use in major stations and other strategic stations along the 
NEC.
• Amtrak  Train  Tracking,  Communications  and  Critical  Incident  Re-
sponse—Amtrak  effectively  tracks  train  movement  over  the  tracks  that  the 
Corporation  owns,  mainly  over  the  electrified  NEC.  Throughout  the  rest  of  the 
country,  however,  the  chief  means  of  communications  with  trains  is  through 
radio  and  cell  phone  telecommunication  systems.  Such  systems  do  not  ade-
quately  address  reliable  train  tracking,  emergency  response  efforts  and  have 
failed  during  critical  incidents.  For  example,  Amtrak’s  radio  system  cannot  be 
used  where  it  does  not  own  track  and,  therefore,  Amtrak  radio  train  commu-
nications  is  dependent  upon  the  host  railroad  network.  Cell  phone  technology 
can be limiting and is often dependent upon the footprint of the cell phone pro-
vider.  Amtrak  has  also  identified  the  need  to  significantly  upgrade  its  existing, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

65

antiquated  GPS  system  (over  8  years  old).  The  GPS  system  needs  to  be  inte-
grated  with  Amtrak’s  central  computer  system  and  CNOC  to  provide  the  exact 
location  for  each  train  on  a  minute-by-minute  basis.  Thus,  additional  funding 
in  this  area  is  critical  and  badly  needed.  Such  upgrades  and  the  introduction 
of satellite telephone communication systems would provide uninterrupted com-
munications. 
Fire/Life Safety 

Last,  with  regard  to  our  ongoing  fire/life  safety  program,  there  are  numerous  in-
frastructure  projects  funded  by  the  existing  $100  million  tunnel  life  safety  grant 
provided  in  the  FY02  Department  of  Defense  and  Emergency  Supplemental  Appro-
priations for Recovery and Response to terrorists attacks on the United States (Pub. 
L. 107–117) of which $71 million has been expended. This work is ongoing and sig-
nificant progress has been made. 

Funding  is  being  used  to  improve  radio  coverage,  wayside  communication  and 
tunnel  portal  security.  Other  components  of  this  element  are  to  secure  all  tunnel 
access  points  and  improve  security  for  trains  traveling  through  this  area  of  the 
NEC.  The  nature  of  improvements  consists  of  physical  and  technology  based  secu-
rity  improvements,  such  as  CCTV,  event  activated  alarm  systems,  high  security 
fencing  and  lighting,  and  the  strategic  placement  of  vehicle  barriers.  In  addition, 
this  tunnel  security  portion  of  the  plan  would  also  include  similar  upgrades  at  the 
Washington, D.C. First Street Tunnel and the Baltimore tunnels. Fencing improve-
ments in the area of the Baltimore tunnels have already begun through the capital 
plan and fencing improvements are scheduled throughout Amtrak’s five-year capital 
plan. 

I  hope  that  this  overview  has  provided  you  with  a  better  understanding  of  what 
Amtrak has done, and continues to do, to enhance safety for our employees and pas-
sengers. I will gladly respond to any follow up questions that you may have on rail 
security.

STATEMENT OF EDWARD WYTKIND, PRESIDENT, 

TRANSPORTATION TRADES DEPARTMENT, AFL–CIO 

Mr. WYTKIND. Thank you Mr. Chairman for having this hearing. 
At  the  outset,  I  just  want  to  say  that  we  believe,  on  behalf  of  the 
employees  in  the  rail  industry,  that  rail  security  in  this  country 
and the actions of the Department of Homeland Security or I guess, 
inaction, have been sorely lacking. We’ve heard a lot from the rail-
roads  over  the  years  and  including  this  morning  about  action 
teams, task forces, countermeasures and a lot of good sounding ini-
tiatives.  But,  I  must  report  that  the  workers  in  this  industry  and 
their unions haven’t been enlisted as partners in these efforts. 

Access  control  at  key  facilities  and  infrastructure  is  lacking  and 
security  training  is  basically  non-existent.  Workers  are  still  being 
discouraged,  if  not  intimidated,  from  reporting  safety  and  security 
risks  and  Federal  funding  in  our  judgment  hasn’t  kept  pace  with 
the needs of rail security in this country. 

The  workers  that  I  have  spoken  to,  inform  me  that  they  feel  no 
safer  or  more  prepared  then  they  were  before  9/11.  They  feel  as  if 
too many railroads are getting away with showing videos as a sub-
stitute  for  real  training  and  they  feel  as  if  the  rail  network  hasn’t 
been  adequately  secured.  These  are  the  workers  that  work  on  the 
front  lines.  They  don’t  just  talk  about  working,  they  actually  go  to 
work  every  day  and  make  the  system  as  safe  and  secure  as  pos-
sible. 

I  want  to  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  the  Members  of  this 
Committee  for  your  introduction  of  S.  1052.  The  rail  title  is  espe-
cially comprehensive and will address a number of serious security 
issues  in  the  rail  system.  We’ve  heard  from  Mr.  Hamberger  about 
our workers being the eyes and the ears of the system but the rail-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

66

road  companies  are  failing  to  give  these  workers  the  tools  they 
need  to  be  those  eyes  and  ears.  Let  me  be  clear,  the  workers  are 
not  receiving  the  training  that  you  are  hearing  about  today.  I’m 
still puzzled by the TSA’s testimony about all these front line work-
ers being trained because they, themselves have been slow in mov-
ing security training initiatives. Our members at one of the freight 
carriers told us just a few days ago that they get a 14-minute video 
at  best,  maybe  once  a  year.  I’ve  seen  one  of  the  videos  and  it  does 
little  to  prepare  workers.  It  offers  vague  and  often  very  conflicting 
guidance  and  one  video  actually  told  the  workers  not  to  overreact 
but  not  to  under-react.  I’m  just  kind  of  wondering  what  that 
means. They don’t know what a security risk is, they are being told 
to be vigilant but they have no idea what these so called ‘‘counter-
measures’’ the railroads are putting into place mean and how they 
apply to their lives as workers. 

Perhaps  worst  of  all,  the  initiatives  that  the  industry  has  insti-
tuted  since  9/11  have  had  no  involvement  by  the  unions  and  their 
members  in  the  rail  industry.  Front  line  workers  are  in  a  position 
to  spot  security  risks.  Every  witness  will  tell  you  that,  including 
those in the government. They are the first on the scene along with 
firefighters  and  police.  We  have  come  to  the  conclusion  that  the 
only way that the workers will be trained is for the government to 
be  told  that  they  will  institute  regulations  and  for  the  carriers  to 
have to abide by those regulations. It’s not enough for the railroads 
to  pay  experts  to  provide  very  nice  Power  Point  presentations.  If 
the  workers  are  not  getting  the  training  done  at  the  rank  and  file 
level  then  it  doesn’t  make  a  difference.  I’m  here  to  tell  you  that 
four  years  after  9/11  it’s  not  happening  and  we  believe  it’s  a  dis-
grace. 

I  want  to  commend  you  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye  and 
others  for  including  Section  310  in  the  legislation  which  will  bring 
real training to the workers. But, I must caution that oversight will 
be badly needed because the Department of Homeland Security has 
been  badly  delinquent  in  fulfilling  Congressional  mandates  that 
this Committee instituted to force flight attendants training on the 
air  carriers.  The  railroads  have  told  you  this  morning  that  the 
training is unnecessary, they claim that they are working with the 
National  Transit  Institute  to  develop  a  program.  They  are  missing 
the point. It doesn’t matter how good the program is, we know NTI 
does  a  lot  of  good  work  in  public  transportation  but  the  training 
curriculum  is  useless  if  it  doesn’t  get  down  to  the  local  level.  My 
rail union leadership told me that they didn’t even know about the 
NTI  program  that’s  being  peddled  this  morning,  until  it  arrived  in 
the mail coincidentally this week, right before today’s hearing. 

I  know  that  my  comments  conflict  with  Mr.  Hamberger’s,  but 
they are based on personal assessments by workers and their union 
reps that know what the vulnerabilities are in the rail system. And 
we  hope  that  the  Committee  will  reject  the  industry’s  pleas  to 
water  down  or  eliminate  these  worker  training  requirements  be-
cause the provisions in your bill will really make a huge down pay-
ment in that effort. 

I’ll  summarize  by  saying  that  we  think  the  system  itself  needs 
to  be  better  secured  as  well.  I’ve  heard  too  many  stories  from  too 
many  local  workers  and  union  reps  about  locomotives  being  left 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

67

with  no  one  around,  about  the  ability  to  waltz  in  and  out  of  rail 
facilities and about the ability to trespass with really very little re-
sistance  from  the  railroads.  And  in  regards  to  Amtrak,  that’s  also 
a  problem  but  I  believe  that  Amtrak  has  a  resource  problem,  I  be-
lieve  that  Amtrak  wants  to  try  to  deal  with  the  security  concerns 
but the workers are being left untrained. A lot of them aren’t even 
credentialed  and  the  resources  that  Amtrak  is  dedicating  to  secu-
rity  is  just  this  tiny  down  payment  for  what  the  railroad  actually 
needs. 

So, I’m happy to work with this Committee to try to get a strong 
rail  security  bill  passed  but  I  think  something  needs  to  be  under-
stood.  The  railroads  are  not  providing  the  training  that  is  so  ur-
gently  needed.  The  resources  Amtrak  is  getting  are  not  enough  to 
deal with security and it’s very important in my judgment that the 
Department  of  Homeland  Security  has  to  be  held  accountable  for 
the  lack  of  action  and  attention  rail  security  has  recorded.  Thank 
you and I’m happy to answer any questions you have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Wytkind follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD WYTKIND, PRESIDENT, TRANSPORTATION TRADES 

DEPARTMENT, AFL–CIO 

Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  on  be-
half of the 29 affiliated unions of the Transportation Trades Department, AFL–CIO 
(TTD), I want to thank you for giving transportation labor an opportunity to testify 
today on our priorities and strategies for enhancing rail security. 1 

This  hearing  occurs  at  an  auspicious  time.  Having  just  observed  the  fourth  anni-
versary  of  the  September  11,  2001,  terrorist  attacks  on  America,  we  are  reminded 
again that rail security measures—both in the transport of passengers and freight—
have  been  sorely  lacking.  The  brutal  attacks  in  the  passenger  rail  systems  of  Lon-
don and Madrid served as the most recent wake-up call, but in reality we have long 
known that rail transportation is a tempting target for those that wish this Nation 
harm.  Unfortunately,  beyond  vague  warnings  by  the  Administration,  and  promises 
of  action  by  the  rail  industry,  little  has  actually  been  done.  Vulnerable  rail  targets 
have not been hardened, access control at key facilities is lacking, security training 
is  basically  non-existent,  workers  are  still  being  discouraged  from  reporting  safety 
and security concerns, and Federal funding has not kept up with the immediate se-
curity needs of this vital sector of our transportation system. 

Last  month,  the  new  head  of  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  told  a 
Senate committee that the state of transit security was, and I quote, ‘‘outstanding.’’ 
Echoing  this  assessment,  I  am  sure  that  freight  rail  industry  representatives  will 
trot  out  fancy  reports  and  charts  supporting  their  claims  that  much  has  been  done 
to  secure  our  rail  transportation  system.  We  will  hear  about  ‘‘action  teams,’’  task 
forces, ‘‘countermeasures,’’ daily security briefings, worker training and a whole host 
of wonderful initiatives. And we will hear about the industry’s partnering activities 
with  others  in  the  private  sector  and  government.  Unfortunately,  I  must  sadly  re-
port that workers and their unions have been left in the dark about these activities 
and  the  railroads  have  not  enlisted  their  employees  as  partners  in  this  endeavor. 
In fact, the workers I have spoken to inform me that they feel no safer or more pre-
pared  than  they  were  before  the  September  11  attacks.  This  situation  has  gone  on 
for  too  long  and  is  simply  unacceptable.  We  need  to  get  serious  about  rail  security 
and  we  need  leadership  from  Congress  to  address  the  critical  areas  of  concern  that 
workers and other stakeholders have so readily identified. 

On  this  point,  I  want  to  thank  you  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye,  the  Co-
Chairman  of  the  Committee,  and  the  other  Senators  who  have  joined  with  you  in 
introducing the Transportation Security Improvements Act of 2005 (S. 1052). While 
there  are  some  changes  we  would  like  to  see  to  this  bill,  the  product  you  have  of-
fered  is  comprehensive  and  would  address  a  number  of  security  vulnerabilities 
across the various modes of transportation, including of course the rail sector. 

1 Attached at 1 is a complete list of TTD’s affiliated unions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

68

When you remember the size and scope of our rail system and infrastructure, the 
lack of attention and focus on security is hard to understand or accept. 2 In addition, 
we  must  recognize  that  given  the  open  nature  of  our  rail  transportation  network, 
we  are  never  going  to  be  able  to  secure  it  entirely,  since,  unlike  aviation,  it  simply 
is  not  housed  in  a  relatively  closed  or  contained  infrastructure.  Indeed,  inter-city 
and commuter rail is designed to be accessible and at least part of its appeal is this 
relative ease of use. 

Given  these  facts,  it  is  absolutely  imperative  that  we  take  the  steps  that  can  be 
implemented  and  that  are  compatible  with  a  system  that  is  so  critical  to  our  na-
tional  economy.  I  will  concede  that  we  can’t  build  a  fence  around  every  train  track 
in America. But we can train workers and leverage technology to better monitor and 
control  this  vast  infrastructure.  We  may  not  be  able  to  screen  every  passenger  at 
every  station,  but  there  is  simply  no  reason,  not  one,  that  workers  should  be  dis-
couraged, or discriminated against, for speaking out on security. 
Treating Employees as Partners 

We  need  to  start  treating  front-line  employees  as  true  partners  in  the  effort  to 
protect  our  rail  system.  These  workers  greet  passengers,  sell  tickets,  operate  and 
staff  the  trains,  maintain  and  inspect  track  and  equipment,  dispatch  trains  and  fix 
cars.  In  short,  they  are  in  an  excellent  position  to  spot  security  risks  and  terrorist 
threats.  And  in  the  event  that  an  attack  does  occur,  our  members  will  be  on  the 
scene and the first to respond along with firefighters and police. 
Security Training 

Let  me  be  extremely  clear  about  this  point—despite  the  claims  of  some  in  indus-
try,  workers  are  not  receiving  meaningful  security  training.  Our  members  at  one 
freight  carrier  have  told  us  that  at  best  they  get  a  14  minute  video—maybe  once 
a  year,  but  maybe  not.  And  one  local  leader  reported  that  new  hires  don’t  even  get 
to see the movie. Mr. Chairman, I have seen this so-called training video and there’s 
only  one  problem—it  does  virtually  nothing  to  prepare  a  worker  on  how  to  address 
security problems. It offers vague and often conflicting guidance. My personal favor-
ite  is  when  it  instructs  workers,  in  dealing  with  a  person  on  the  property  who  is 
not  supposed  to  be  there,  to  not  overreact,  but  also  not  to  underreact.  What  does 
that mean? Workers still do not know what constitutes a security risk, though they 
are told to be ‘‘vigilant.’’ They do not know how to respond when they do see some-
one  or  something  suspicious  and  they  certainly  don’t  know  what  to  do  if  something 
actually happens. I realize that my comments conflict with those of Mr. Hamberger. 
But  I  am  offering  my  observation  to  this  Committee  based  upon  personal  assess-
ments  by  rank-and-file  workers  and  local  leaders  who  understand  their  railroad 
property and its vulnerabilities and know first-hand how little is being done to deal 
with security risks. 

It is well known that real training is effective. We know this from positive experi-
ences  in  the  safety  arena  and  experts  confirm  that  it  is  even  more  crucial  in  secu-
rity. Rafi Ron, former Director of Security at Tel-Aviv Ben-Gurion International Air-
port  told  a  Senate  committee  last  month  that  behavior  pattern  ‘‘techniques  imple-
mented by trained security and non-security personnel have proven to be a valuable 
measure in the detection and prevention of terrorist attacks in public faculties.’’ Ron 
went  on  to  observe  ‘‘training  provides  the  skills  and  confidence  not  only  to  law  en-
forcement officers . . . but also to employees who are present at every point in the 
system. No one is in a better position to recognize irregularities on the ground than 
the people who regularly work there.’’

The Volpe Center recently concluded that ‘‘probably the most significant factor in 
determining whether a transportation employee makes a helpful or harmful decision 
during an emergency is training. Trained and alert transportation professionals can 
make the difference between success and disaster. Characteristics such as acting re-
sponsibly  to  protect  the  lives  of  the  public;  keeping  one’s  cool  and  keeping  pas-
sengers calm; contacting emergency assistance authorities quickly and reporting the 
essential  details  accurately;  working  cooperatively  as  a  member  (and  sometimes  a 
leader)  of  a  team  with  a  common  goal—can  all  be  enhanced  through  proper  train-
ing.’’

These observations and conclusions are not surprising—it is quite frankly common 
sense that a robust and consistent training regime is a cost effective way to enhance 

2 There  are  over  100,000  miles  of  rail  in  the  U.S.—22,000  of  miles  of  it  used  by  Amtrak  in 
46  states  and  the  District  of  Columbia.  In  2004,  Amtrak  served  25  million  passengers,  or  ap-
proximately 68,000 a day. Commuter rail operations add approximately 978,000 passenger trips 
each  weekday.  The  freight  rail  carriers  carry  42  percent  of  our  Nation’s  domestic  intercity 
freight and in 2002 alone over 109 million tons of hazardous material. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

69

rail  security.  Unfortunately,  employers,  under  profit  and  operational  pressures,  too 
often short-change this critical security component. We have come to the conclusion 
that  the  only  way  workers  are  going  to  get  the  security  training  they  need  is  for 
the  Federal  Government  to  come  in  and  tell  the  carriers  that  they  must  offer  this 
training  because  it  is  too  important  to  ignore.  It  is  not  enough  for  the  railroads  to 
pay  experts  to  develop  nice  reports  unless  the  materials  developed  are  delivered  to 
the  employees  in  the  form  of  a  comprehensive,  mandatory  training  program.  That 
is not happening today and we believe this is a disgrace. 

On  this  point,  I  want  to  commend  Chairman  Stevens  and  Senator  Inouye  for  in-
cluding  a  provision  (Section  310)  in  S.  1052  that  would  accomplish  this  objective. 
Specifically,  Section  310  would  require  DHS,  within  60  days  of  enactment,  to  de-
velop  and  issue  detailed  guidance  for  a  rail  worker  security  training  program.  The 
guidance  issued  by  DHS  will  require  a  training  program  that  would  encompass  a 
number  of  appropriate  elements  including  crew  communications  and  coordination 
activities;  evacuation  procedures;  use  of  protective  devices;  live  situational  training 
exercises  and  ways  to  determine  the  seriousness  of  any  situation.  Sixty  days  after 
DHS issues these guidelines, each rail carrier is required to develop a training pro-
gram and submit it to DHS for review and approval. DHS may also require the rail 
carrier  to  make  revisions  to  the  training  program  that  the  Secretary  considers  nec-
essary  to  ensure  that  the  program  meets  the  guidance  requirements.  The  carrier 
will then have 180 days to complete the training of all front-line workers in accord-
ance with the DHS approved program. 

I  have  little  doubt  that  some  in  industry  will  complain  that  this  program  is  too 
burdensome and that they should be allowed to institute training on their schedule. 
I am also sure that some rail carriers will claim that since training is already being 
done, that this Committee should simply stand down and allow industry to proceed 
on its own. We hope you will reject those pleas for more inaction. As I have stated, 
we have talked to too many front-line workers who dispute the industry’s claims to 
allow  this  fiction  to  perpetuate  any  longer.  Comprehensive  security  training  must 
be  mandated,  and  it  must  be  instituted  as  soon  as  possible.  I  applaud  you  Mr. 
Chairman  and  Senator  Inouye  for  recognizing  this  fact  and  I  urge  the  Committee 
to retain this provision as your bill moves through the legislative process. 
Providing Whistleblower Protections 

We  must  also  ensure  that  workers  who  report  or  identify  a  security  risk  will  not 
face retribution or retaliation from their employers. Simply put, a rail worker should 
not have to choose between doing the right thing on security and his or her job. Un-
fortunately, too often this is exactly what occurs. 

Rail  workers  and  their  unions  have  long  argued  that  despite  the  whistle-blower 
protections  included  in  current  law  (49  U.S.C.  § 20109),  employees  still  experience 
employer harassment and intimidation when reporting accidents, injuries and other 
safety  concerns.  Indeed,  in  a  Federal  Railroad  Administration  (FRA)  report  issued 
in  July  2002  entitled  An  Examination  of  Railroad  Yard  Workers  Safety  (RR02–01), 
the  FRA  conducted  focus  group  interviews  with  certain  groups  of  rail  workers.  The 
FRA stated, ‘‘Perhaps of most significance, rail labor painted a generally adversarial 
picture of the safety climate in the rail industry. They felt that harassment and in-
timidation  were  commonplace,  and  were  used  to  pressure  employees  to  not  report 
an injury, to cut corners and to work faster.’’

Section  311  of  S.  1052  does  attempt  to  address  this  problem  by  providing  certain 
whistleblower  protections  for  workers  who  report  security  concerns.  While  this  pro-
vision  is  a  step  in  the  right  direction,  and  I  want  to  thank  Senator  Lautenberg  for 
working  with  us  on  this  issue,  it  needs  to  be  strengthened  to  provide  workers  with 
a fair and expedited process to seek redress in whistleblower situations. In addition, 
if we are ever going to stop discrimination against workers who report security prob-
lems,  penalties  and  fines  must  be  increased  to  create  a  real  deterrent  and  not  just 
make violations a cost of doing business. 

I  should  note  that  as  part  of  the  Sarbanes-Oxley  Act,  Congress,  on  a  bi-partisan 
basis,  included  whistle-blower  protections  for  those  who  report  shareholder  fraud 
violations  or  violations  of  Securities  and  Exchange  Commission  rules.  (See,  17 
U.S.C. 1514A). Surely, if we can protect whistleblowers who report financial security 
problems, we can also protect those who report rail security concerns. 

Everyday, rail carriers and the government ask front-line workers to be more vigi-
lant  about  security  risks  and  to  report  possible  breaches.  With  the  right  training, 
rail  workers  are  more  than  happy  to  play  this  role.  But  it  is  disingenuous  to  ask 
workers to report problems and at the same time refuse to provide the basic protec-
tions  needed  to  ensure  that  such  reporting  will  not  result  in  employer  retribution. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Securing Rail Facilities 

70

Our  members  are  also  increasingly  concerned  that  rail  yards  and  facilities  are 
largely open areas where people can come and go virtually unchallenged. In general, 
we need to ensure some type of security perimeter around yards and other sensitive 
facilities  and  better  access  control.  Indeed,  I  would  note  that  shortly  after  the  Ma-
drid  attacks  Amtrak  issued  a  security  notice  reminding  employees  to  wear  their 
identification  badges  despite  the  fact  that,  according  to  reports  from  workers  we 
have  received,  many  employees  have  still  not  actually  received  their  credentials. 
This  of  course  raises  the  question  of  how  access  control  is  being  achieved  in  those 
situations. 

On a related issue, we need procedures and technology in place to better monitor 
and  protect  tracks,  signals  and  switches.  Given  the  amount  of  hazardous  material 
that  is  moved  by  our  rail  system,  it  does  not  take  a  lot  of  imagination  to  see  how 
a  terrorist  could  sabotage  key  points  in  our  infrastructure  to  create  a  deadly  acci-
dent.  Signal  systems  and  track  switches  are  too  easy  to  manipulate  and  access  to 
these systems must be better controlled. 

When problems are spotted, our members are told to contact appropriate security 
personnel. The problem (besides the fact that there is no training or set procedures 
on  who  to  contact)  is  that  in  many  instances,  especially  in  rural  areas,  security 
guards are often not on the property and many miles away. In fact, one rail worker 
stationed out West recently told me that the carrier had one security person to con-
tact  during  emergencies  covering  a  1,000  mile  territory.  And  yet  we  can’t  seem  to 
convince  our  employers  that  front-line  workers  need  training  on  what  to  do  when 
there  is  a  security  threat  and  security  personnel  are  not  available  to  immediately 
respond. 

In  general,  we  are  increasingly  concerned  with  the  lack  of  security  with  respect 
to  the  transport  of  hazardous  materials.  Tank  car  integrity  standards  are  critical 
and out-of-date equipment must either be brought into compliance or retired. While 
not the work of terrorists, the tragic accident in Graniteville, South Carolina, where 
nine people died, 310 required medical attention and 5,400 residents were forced to 
evacuate, was a stark reminder of the consequences of a hazardous material release. 
And  just  last  Saturday,  two  Union  Pacific  trains  collided  in  Texarkana,  Arkansas, 
releasing  propylene  and  leading  to  a  massive  fire  and  explosion.  Simply  put,  rail 
transportation  is  a  dangerous  business  on  a  normal  day.  In  the  post-9/11  environ-
ment  the  challenge  of  protecting  the  Nation  from  terrorist  threats  directed  at  rail 
transportation multiplies. 
Amtrak Security 

Let  me  say  a  word  about  rail  security  as  it  relates  specifically  to  Amtrak.  It  is 
no  secret  that  every  year  Congress  provides  Amtrak  just  enough  funding  to  limp 
through  another  fiscal  crisis.  In  this  environment,  it  is  impossible  for  our  Nation’s 
national passenger carrier to invest the capitol resources needed to make major im-
provements  to  rail  security.  This  starvation  diet  that  we  have  put  Amtrak  on  must 
end; not only because it represents bad transportation policy, but because it creates 
security issues and problems that are unacceptable. Again, on this point, let me note 
the leadership of Chairman Stevens, Chairman Lott, Senator Lautenberg and others 
who  have  pushed  this  Committee  to  approve  a  multi-year  reauthorization  bill  and 
have  led  the  fight  in  the  annual  appropriations  process  that  is  still  ongoing  as  we 
speak. 

Clearly,  Amtrak  needs  stable,  long-term  resources  to  shore  up  its  financial  chal-
lenges.  But  in  the  context  of  security,  we  cannot  expect  Amtrak  to  fend  for  itself 
while we spend billions addressing so many other aspects of homeland security and 
the  war  on  terrorism.  We  have  always  believed  that  transportation  security  is  an 
integral  element  of  our  homeland  security  efforts  and  publicly  supported  transpor-
tation systems like Amtrak deserve adequate Federal resources to protect their pas-
sengers, workers and the public from terrorist threats. 

There has also been a lot of talk, both from Amtrak and the Administration, about 
the need to contract-out as many Amtrak services as possible and to privatize parts 
or all of the system. Again, we have serious transportation policy reasons why these 
proposals should not be adopted and I will not expand on them at this hearing. But 
let  me  also  point  out  that  in-house  employees  are  known  quantities  that  in  many 
cases  have  security  responsibilities  they  must  perform.  If  these  functions  are  con-
tracted-out, as they already are in some areas, it calls into question how these func-
tions  will  be  handled  and  makes  it  that  much  more  difficult  to  reliably  control  ac-
cess to train operations. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

71

Final Thoughts 

Achieving  rail  security  is  of  course  not  a  simple  task.  But  we  cannot  allow  this 
challenge  to  go  unmet  any  longer.  Four  years  after  9/11  and  in  the  wake  of  deadly 
attacks  in  London  and  Madrid,  our  government  and  rail  employers  are  still  not 
doing  enough  to  make  rail  transportation  as  secure  as  possible.  Rail  security  needs 
and  deserves  attention  and  focus  from  policy  makers.  Carriers  must  be  required  to 
follow  security  procedures,  employees  must  be  trained  and  afforded  whistle-blower 
protections,  and  rail  yards,  facilities,  tracks,  equipment  and  signal  system  must  be 
secured.  All  of  transportation  labor  has  a  vested  interest  in  improving  rail  security 
and  Mr.  Chairman  and  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  TTD  stands  ready  to  work  with  you 
to achieve this common agenda. 

Thank you again for giving TTD an opportunity to share our views today. 

TTD AFFILIATES 

The  following  labor  organizations  are  members  of  and  represented  by  the  TTD: 

Air Line Pilots Association (ALPA) 
Amalgamated Transit Union (ATU) 
American Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees (AFSCME) 
American Federation of Teachers (AFT) 
Association of Flight Attendants-CWA (AFA–CWA) 
American Train Dispatchers Association (ATDA) 
Brotherhood of Railroad Signalmen (BRS) 
Communications Workers of America (CWA) 
International Association of Fire Fighters (IAFF) 
International Association of Machinists and Aerospace Workers (IAM) 
International  Brotherhood  of  Boilermakers,  Blacksmiths,  Forgers  and  Helpers 
(IBB) 
International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) 
International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers (IFPTE) 
International Longshoremen’s Association (ILA) 
International Longshore and Warehouse Union (ILWU) 
International Organization of Masters, Mates & Pilots, ILA (MM&P) 
International Union of Operating Engineers (IUOE) 
Laborers’ International Union of North America (LIUNA) 
Marine Engineers’ Beneficial Association (MEBA) 
National Air Traffic Controllers Association (NATCA) 
National Association of Letter Carriers (NALC) 
National Federation of Public and Private Employees (NFOPAPE) 
Office and Professional Employees International Union (OPEIU) 
Professional Airways Systems Specialists (PASS) 
Sheet Metal Workers International Association (SMWIA) 
Transportation Communications International Union (TCU) 
Transport Workers Union of America (TWU) 
United Mine Workers of America (UMWA) 
United Steel, Paper and Forestry, Rubber, Manufacturing, Energy, 
Allied Industrial and Service Workers International Union (USW)

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  I  would  urge  the  gentle-
men to be precise in your answers because we are limited on time. 
Matter  of  fact,  there’s  two  amendments  on  the  floor  right  now 
that  affect  my  state  and  I’m  anxious  to  get  this  hearing  over.  But, 
Mr.  Hamberger,  you’ve  alluded  to  some  confusion  as  to  whose  in 
charge, TSA or FRA, who do you think is in charge and who should 
be in charge? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. I believe that TSA should be in charge of secu-
rity,  and  FRA  in  charge  of  safety.  The  two,  however,  overlap.  As 
you heard in the first panel, a tank car could involve a safety issue, 
it  could  also  raise  a  security  issue.  So,  I  think  there  needs  to  be 
better  coordination.  I  think  Secretary  Hawley  and  Mr.  Boardman 
have  undertaken  that  and  have  had  a  series  of  meetings.  Within 
the Department of Homeland Security itself, however, there is still, 
and  I  think  Mr.  Hawley  alluded  to  it  this  morning,  there  needs  to 
be  a  single  point  of  contact  for  the  industry.  We  hear  from  the  In-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

72

formation  Analysis  and  Infrastructure  Protection  Group,  from  the 
Coast  Guard,  from  TSA,  from  different  organizations  within  DHS 
coming  to  our  members  and  asking  for  oftentimes  overlapping  re-
quests  for  data.  There  just  needs  to  be  a  single  point  of  contact. 
We’ve met with Secretary Hawley on that and I think he is moving 
in that direction. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Crosbie,  I’m  sure  we’re  going  to  hear  more 
about  the  needs  of  Amtrak,  but  has  the  Board  explored  increasing 
the  cost  to  the  passengers  instead  of  totally  requesting  additional 
Federal money to meet the improvements you’ve mentioned? 

Mr.  CROSBIE.  As  I  understand  it,  it  was  before  my  time  at  Am-
trak,  it  was  considered  post  9/11  and  there  was  a  significant  push 
back from some of the state governments on adding a security fee. 
The CHAIRMAN. Well, I remember right after 9/11 going to Nome 
and  finding  TSA  in  the  terminal  there  at  the  small  airport.  They 
had taken over a third of the terminal, which has been paid for by 
the state and the city. They were charging passengers more money 
to provide security. Why is it that rail transportation has not been 
willing  to  step  up  to  the  plate  and  ask  the  passengers  to  pay  part 
of the security and safety costs? 

Mr.  CROSBIE.  We,  within  Amtrak,  we’ve  certainly  considered 
doing that and in the past when we had proposed, like I had said, 
there was a significant resistance to implementing that. We haven’t 
ruled  it  out  entirely,  but  based  on  the  past  response,  we  haven’t 
considered it further. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Am  I  right  that  your  number  of  passengers  has 

increased since 9/11? 
Mr. CROSBIE. Yes. 
The CHAIRMAN. Substantially? 
Mr. CROSBIE. Sorry, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. There’s been a substantial increase? 
Mr. CROSBIE. Substantial, yes, it has been. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Wytkind,  I  appreciate  your  comments  about 
Senator Inouye’s and my involvement in this bill and I understand 
what  you’re  saying  about  training.  One  of  the  problems  is,  when  I 
think  of  some  of  the  airline  unions,  they’ve  been  very  much  in-
volved in training themselves. Why haven’t you? 

Mr.  WYTKIND.  Well,  actually  they  have  been  and  that’s  actually 
a  good  example  of  the  problem.  In  the  hazardous  materials  area, 
the  rail  unions  have  had  a  very  robust  hazmat  training  program 
that actually receives some Federal support. But, when we’ve tried 
to  approach  the  railroads  to  participate  in  that  program  and  per-
haps  even  help  us  finance  it  so  that  it  has  the  support  it  needs, 
we’ve  met  a  lot  of  resistance.  And  any  attempts  we’ve  ever  made 
to strengthen training for workers or to have them covered by cer-
tain  safety  regulations,  we’ve  always  met  with  resistance  from  the 
railroads.  Anytime  safety  re-authorization  legislation  has  been 
pending  in  this  Committee,  we’ve  met  resistance  from  the  rail-
roads. 

So,  my  message  to  you  is,  I  think  the  rail  unions  have  a  strong 
track  record  of  delivering  training  to  their  members  under  very 
limited  resources.  I  would  submit  to  you,  that  given  the  sheer  size 
of  the  workforce  in  the  country  and  the  amount  of  responsibility 
that  they  bring  every  day  to  work,  to  the  job,  that  they  need  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

73

support  to  make  sure  they’re  prepared.  When  I  hear  local  union 
reps tell me things like our members don’t feel any more prepared 
today  than  they  did  4  years  ago,  before  9/11,  that  brings  chills 
down my spine and I’m sure to a lot of other people. 

The CHAIRMAN. I don’t know if you know, but I probably carried 
a  union  card  longer  than  anyone  in  the  room.  But,  as  a  practical 
matter, I understand that when your people are laid off they auto-
matically continue to receive full pay. There’s a real question about 
the retirement and layoff costs of labor in terms of these railroads, 
particularly Amtrak. What do you say about that? 

Mr.  WYTKIND.  I  don’t  think  those  issues  are  applicable  to  secu-

rity in the sense that——

The CHAIRMAN. It takes money away from the system. 
Mr. WYTKIND. Well, the Congress has affirmed and reaffirmed its 
very strong support for the railroad retirement system that the rail 
employees  are  covered  by,  including  the  railroads  themselves  that 
have  always  supported  it.  So,  the  costs  on  the  system  for  retire-
ment, to me, are unrelated to whether we should be training work-
ers at the rank and file level. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. We’ll go by the early bird 
rules  so,  we  have  Senator  Lautenberg’s,  Senator  Lautenberg,  I 
have  a  call  from  the  Co–Chairman,  I’ll  be  right  back.  Would  you 
proceed? 

Senator LAUTENBERG. [presiding] Thank you very much. The con-
cerns  that  we  have  about  rail  security  loom  largely  in  front  of  us, 
and yet we hear—well, in one instance—that the private sector will 
provide  it.  And  in  response  to  a  question  I  asked  about  oversight 
and  providing  the  appropriate  budget  for  rail  security  review  by 
the Federal Government, we were told that—well, we have standby 
personnel,  we  have  Air  Marshals,  we  have  people—they  are  going 
to be called upon long after the fire has begun. They can’t suddenly 
switch  from  the  Air  Marshal  population  over  to  the  railroads.  The 
problem, Mr. Wytkind, is that we know that Amtrak is under fund-
ed  to  begin  with.  It  is  difficult  to  compare  with  the  airline  situa-
tion,  with  its  repeated  bankruptcies  that  we’re  called  upon  to  bail 
them  out  of.  Also,  the  infrastructure  and  operations  that  provide 
our  great  aviation  service  that  we  have  in  our  country  are  largely 
supplied  by  the  Federal  Government,  looking  at  much  of  the  FAA 
and  the  other  government  services  that  are  connected  with  avia-
tion.  Amtrak  has  never  been  able  to  get  its  head  above  water,  be-
cause  from  the  day  that  Amtrak  became  a  corporation  on  its  own 
being,  we  work  with  the  same  old  equipment,  we  work  with  the 
same old systems, we work with a constantly reduced level of fund-
ing and once and for all, we’re going to have to take a plunge. And 
that  plunge  is  going  to  say  that  we  are  going  to  upgrade  things, 
that  we  are  going  to  buy  cars  that  are  better  than  40-  or  50-year 
old  ones  and  locomotives  as  well  and  make  the  investment  that  so 
many other countries make. 

And we see it, for instance, in Germany with maybe $7–10 billion 
dollars  a  year  going  into  their  system  and  if  you  take  a  ride  on  it, 
you’ll know where it’s going. The TGV in France will take you from 
Brussels  to  Paris  at  an  hour  and  20  minutes  for  a  200-mile  ride. 
If  we  supply  that  kind  of  service  here,  we  could  reduce  congestion 
in  our  aviation  system  that  now  has  us  late  for  appointments,  et 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

74

cetera. So, I think that we have some opportunities to take a real-
istic  look  at  where  we  go  here  and  I’m  appreciative  of  the  com-
mentary  that  we’ve  heard  from  our  witness  and  I’m  sorry  that  I 
wasn’t here at an earlier point. 

Mr. Wytkind, one of the things that we noticed is the substantial 
increase  in  violations  of  the  Federal  hazmat  worker  training  laws 
and  you  talked  extensively  about  that  and  I  commend  you  for  it. 
Now, I worked with the Committee to almost double the minimum 
civil  penalty  in  law  for  these  types  of  violations.  You  talked  about 
how  important  hazmat  training  is  to  running  a  safe  and  secure 
railroad.  What  do  you  think  we  ought  to  do?  Should  the  govern-
ment  take  the  responsibility  directly,  for  training  these  people? 
Should that be a part of the TSA responsibility to do that? How do 
we  get  an  assurance  that  these  people  are  receiving  sufficient 
training? 

Mr.  WYTKIND.  Thank  you  for  that  question.  I  think  we  separate 
freight  from  Amtrak  in  a  couple  of  ways  but,  overall  I  think  you 
need  strong  training  mandates  the  way  this  Committee  has  pro-
vided  mandates  in  the  airline  side  and  then  you  need  strong  over-
sight  to  make  sure  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  actually 
carries  out  its  mandates.  Because  that’s  part  of  the  problem.  This 
Committee  mandated  flight  attendant  security  training  after  9/11 
and to this day TSA has not provided the kind of guidance that you 
asked  for  in  this  Committee  or  actually  directed  the  TSA  to  do  so. 
But  I  think  the  issue  for  Amtrak  is  one  of  resources  and  the  man-
date on Amtrak, if it doesn’t also correspond to some financing and 
support  for  security  upgrades  across  the  board,  including  training, 
we’re  afraid  that  it’s  not  going  to  get  down  to  the  rank  and  file 
level. 

On  the  freight  side,  these  are  very  cash  rich  companies  that 
spend  enormous  sums  of  money  on  operations,  efficiencies,  infra-
structure and as we’ve heard this morning, obviously on some secu-
rity or maybe a lot of security. What we would argue is that if you 
put the mandate in the law, like you have in the current bill pend-
ing  for  this  Committee,  then  the  railroads  will  be  required  to  fi-
nally  make  sure  that  their  rank  and  file  workers  are  getting 
trained.  I  think  it’s  that  simple  but  it  requires  a  strong  mandate 
out  of  this  Committee  and  then  it  requires  strong  oversight  of  the 
DHS to make sure they actually carry out their regulatory respon-
sibilities. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Senator. Senator Rockefeller? 
STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I’m giving my-
self  double  coverage  in  hopes  that  I  might  be  heard.  Let  me  ask 
Mr.  Hamberger,  it  hasn’t  been  gone  into  deeply  here  but,  I  think 
you  made  in  your  statement  something  which  maybe  harbingers 
what you may be going for later on and that is to have the Federal 
Government  deciding  what  chemicals  are  safe  to  carry  and  which 
ones  aren’t.  Now,  a  number  of  years  ago,  I  guess  it  was  after  the 
Exxon  Valdez  thing,  all  ships  had  to  double  hull.  You  have  some 
presumably in stock that are double-hulled. Explain to me why all 
of your stock is not double-hulled, even under the circumstances in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

75

which the chemical companies, which I am very, very sorry, are not 
represented  here  today  because  that  precludes  us  from  having  a 
good discussion. I don’t know why they weren’t invited but, I regret 
that.  Why  is  it  that  you  just  can’t  double  hull  or  whatever  is  the 
corresponding  guarantee  of  safety  that  the  shipping  industry  went 
through. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. I appreciate that question Senator because it is 
a  very  important  issue.  In  fact,  I  was  a  little  late  for  the  hearing 
this morning because we had a conference call with members of the 
American  Chemistry  Council  (ACC)  to  discuss  the  fact  that  in  my 
testimony,  there  is  a  sentence  that  says  long-term,  it  should  be  a 
policy  to  look  for  safer  chemicals.  It  is  a  little  bit  of  a  different 
issue from the double hull because this is really more of a security 
issue than a safety issue. We can require tank cars to double hull, 
we can do everything possible but, there is no way long term to en-
sure against a terrorist attack. The only way to ensure that a com-
munity  through  which  hazardous  material  is  moving  is  safer, 
would be to have that hazardous material be less toxic. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Do  you  routinely  use  GPS  and  other  sys-

tems to always——

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  About  45  percent  of  the  locomotives  do  have 

GPS. We’re moving to 100 percent. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  On  all  of  those  that  carry  chemicals  that 

are potentially in danger, are they covered by the GPS? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. I don’t have the answer to that. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Isn’t that fairly important? 
Mr. HAMBERGER. I just don’t know the answer. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes. 
Mr. HAMBERGER. But we do have the immediate capability of lo-

cating all locomotives. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  You  all  make  a  lot  of  money  and  I  know 
that  you  always  declare  yourselves  revenue  inadequate,  we  won’t 
get into that today. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. But, I look forward to having your annual 
reports.  But,  the  chemical  companies  are  merging  and  having  all 
kinds  of  problems.  Now,  not  to  the  extent  that  the  airlines  are. 
Railroads are an absolute necessity for this country. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  This  country  could  not  exist  without 
them.  So,  two  questions.  One,  why  doesn’t  industry  just  go  ahead 
and  double  hull  or  whatever  the  proper  word  is,  as  a  matter  of 
course?  Because  nothing  has  changed  since  9/11  fundamentally. 
Part of that is the Federal Government’s report, I mean, the report 
we  were  meant  to  have  gotten  and  still  hasn’t  arrived,  which 
doesn’t  speak  very  well  for  us  but,  why  can’t  you  go  ahead  and  do 
something  which  doesn’t,  you  know,  somebody  puts  a  bomb  under-
neath  the  track,  double-hull  isn’t  going  to  do  it  or  whatever  the 
comparable thing is. But, there are ways of racheting up. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes, sir. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Safety which can help——
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  And  in  fact  we  are  working  very  closely  with 
the  tank  car  manufacturers  and  ACC  in  determining  whether  or 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

76

not  there  is  a  safer  design.  We  are  taking  a  close  look  at  that  and 
we’re not going to mandate that but——

Senator ROCKEFELLER. What does that mean? I mean, you know 
that  if  you  have  two  layers  of  hard  metal  around  something  it’s 
going to be safe, so what does it——

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Well,  frankly  Senator,  that  has  cost  implica-
tions  for  our  customers,  the  chemical  companies.  The  fact  that  we 
have moved 99.998 percent of the hazardous materials without ac-
cidental  release  calls  into  question  whether  or  not  that  meets  the 
cost-benefit  test.  There  are  about  12,000  tank  cars  out  there.  It 
would cost $1.2 billion to replace the fleet and so you want to make 
sure that the cost-benefit analysis is observed. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Is  the  cost-benefit  analysis  which  ulti-
mately  resolves  what  the  railroad  car  safety  matter  will  look  like? 
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Obviously,  if  we  were  to  make  the  skin  of  the 
car  2–3–4  inches  thick,  it  would  be  much  safer.  But  then  the  pay-
load  would  be  much  less.  So,  there  is  that  balance.  And  it  is  the 
chemical  companies,  as  you  know,  who  own  the  cars.  We  have  to 
work  with  them  in  determining  what  is  the  appropriate  standard. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well again, $1.2 billion is a lot of money. 
On  the  other  hand,  if  you  have  an  explosion  because  you  have 
99.998  percent—in  the  Intelligence  business,  that  doesn’t  impress 
anybody because it’s always the .2 percent. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Which  is  going  to  happen.  So,  you’re  bet-
ting  the  farm  on  something  not  happening  because  it  hasn’t.  Well, 
I  mean,  we’ve  got  reams  of  studies  about  9/11  which  proved  that 
was not a very forward-looking aspect in terms of national security 
and  what  could  we  have  done  and  people  have  come  up  with  all 
kinds  of  answers.  But,  I  really  think  that  it’s  going  to  cost  us 
money and therefore we shouldn’t do it, even though you agree that 
it would make it safer is a little difficult for me. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. I appreciate that input Senator. I will take that 
back  to  the  tank  car  committee  and  when  we  get  push-back  from 
the  chemical  companies  and  tank  car  manufacturers,  I’ll  invoke 
this conversation. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Can  I  go  to  that  tank  car  committee 

meeting too? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. We’d love to have you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. OK, now Mr. Wytkind? 
Mr. WYTKIND. Yes? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Do you think——
The CHAIRMAN. Could we move along a little bit? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I’ll stop. 
The CHAIRMAN. We have each taken 5 minutes. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well then, I’ll stop. 
The CHAIRMAN. Do you want to ask your question? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. No, not if it breaks the 5-minute rule. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Mr.  Ham-
berger,  I  understand  that  before  I  arrived  this  morning  that  you 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

77

made  reference  to  the  importance  of  getting  TRIA,  Terrorism  Risk 
Insurance Act reenacted this year, re-authorized or put in place for 
the future. I share that view and I hope that we will be able to get 
the support that we need to get that in place. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  In  the  Committee’s  bill,  it  focuses  on 
threats about high hazard materials and a lot of the discussion this 
morning  has  already  been  about  that  and  there  have  been  a  num-
ber  of  recent  accidents,  as  we  know,  South  Carolina  and  Tex-
arkana.  It  all  reminds  us  of  the  dangers  that  an  accident  that  in-
volves toxic chemicals can really present to the public at large. Par-
ticularly  those  that  are  somewhere  in  the  proximity  of  rail  traffic. 
If  you  were  required  as  S.  1052  contemplates  to  develop  threat 
mitigation  plans  for  high  hazard  hazardous  materials  traveling  in 
specific  rail  quarters  in  a  high  threat  area  such  as  Washington, 
D.C., can you tell me why the DHS shouldn’t have some authority, 
some  relationship  with  the  question  of  the  security  aspects  of  it,  if 
not the safety, but at least with respect to the security aspects? 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Before  Senator  Rockefeller  leaves,  I  would  like 
to  say  that  it  is  indeed  a  bet-the-farm  issue  for  us  when  we  move 
this  material.  As  I  pointed  out  in  my  testimony,  given  the  limita-
tions  on  insurance  and  given  that  our  common  carrier  obligation, 
requires  us  to  move  hazmat,  it  clearly  is  a  bet-the-farm  situation 
for  our  railroads.  In  fact,  Senator,  we  are  working  with  TSA  and 
the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  in  developing  risk-assess-
ments for high hazardous materials corridors. Four, I believe, have 
been  completed  for  Washington,  New  Orleans,  Cleveland  and  New 
Jersey.  We  will  continue  to  work  with  them  to  identify  the  risks 
and  then  put  in  place  countermeasures  for  those  corridors  where 
high hazardous material does move. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  I  have  talked  to  some  of  your  mem-
bers  and  I  know  that  there  is  a  significant  interest  on  their  part 
to make the rail traffic safer and more secure. 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Yes,  sir.  And  I  think  one  of  the  questions  is, 
once,  if  a  plan  is  adopted  and  reduced  to  a  regulation  or  has  to  go 
through  a  governmental  approval  process  to  change,  then  we  be-
lieve we will not be as nimble as we need to be. For example, using 
Rita  and  Katrina  as  examples,  our  members  acted  immediately  to 
detour  materials  out  of  the  hurricane  area  up  through  Memphis 
and Kansas City. We want to work with the agency to develop the 
plan, but not have it as a mandate or regulation that would require 
an  approval  process  before  we  can  implement  change  based  on  in-
telligence  we  might  get  from  the  National  Joint  Terrorism  Task 
Force, for example. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Now, the rail industry hauls various pieces 
of  equipment  on  the  track,  some  of  which  may  belong  to  the  rail 
industry  but,  some  of  which  may  not  belong  to  the  rail  industry. 
Who owns the tank cars that Senator Rockefeller was asking about, 
for example? 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  The  tank  cars  are  owned  by  the  chemical  com-
panies  or  by  a  leasing  company  that  leases  them  to  the  chemical 
companies. We do not own them. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  So  they  are,  as  opposed  to  let’s  say  box 

cars? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

78

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  That  is  correct.  We  own  a  substantial  amount 
of  the  box  car  traffic  or  the  gondola  traffic  cars  but,  none  of  the 
tank cars. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Mr.  Crosbie,  in  conjunction  with  the  cost 
of  security  and  who  pays  for  the  cost  of  security,  obviously,  with 
respect  to  air  traffic,  there’s  an  addition  to  the  ticket,  $2.50  per 
segment for air travel. What kind of a push back could you possibly 
get  by  adding  that  kind  of  a  surcharge,  if  you  will,  or  security 
charge as more properly described, what kind of a push back could 
you  possibly  get  for  adding  some  of  the  cost  of  security  for  trav-
elers? 

Mr.  CROSBIE.  We  have  one  that  occurred,  I’d  say  that  it  hap-
pened before my time with Amtrak, I joined Amtrak in 2003, Janu-
ary  of  2003  and  at  the  time,  as  I  understand  it,  there  was  a  push 
back  from  the  states  on  basically,  increasing  the  fares  and  you’ve 
seen,  I  think,  some  of  that  recently  as  well  on  the  Northeast  Cor-
ridor  related  to  fares  or  reductions  on  discounts  are  sensitive——
Senator  BEN NELSON.  Nobody  likes  the  security  charge  on  the 
airline tickets, we’ve had discussions here about the fact that if you 
travel  non-stop  from  Washington  to  L.A.  you  paid  one  surcharge 
and one security charge, if you go where it said to stop in between, 
you  have  to  pay  for  both  segments  which  could  be  the  $5  dollars 
versus  the  $2.50  that  you  pay  if  you  fly  non-stop  on  a  longer  jour-
ney.  I  mean  there  are  all  kinds  of  questions  about  it  but,  it  does 
seem reasonable to expect that the travelers would pay part of that 
security charge. 

Mr. CROSBIE. We’ve certainly considered it. 
Senator BEN NELSON. You certainly didn’t have a lot of competi-

tion to worry about in terms of passenger rail travel. 

Mr.  CROSBIE.  And  we  can  go  back  and  revisit  it  again.  We  cer-
tainly  haven’t  ruled  it  out,  we  never  have  ruled  it  out.  But,  like  I 
said  when  we  proposed  it  in  the  past,  it  was  not  received  well 
throughout the Northeast Corridor. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  I  would  imagine.  I  didn’t  receive  it  very 
well  when  they  added  it  to  airline  travel.  But,  it’s  always  a  ques-
tion of not only how much, but who pays? So, I appreciate the fact 
that you will take another look at that. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
My time is up. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, I appreciate that line of questioning, 
I’ve sort of been playing the bad guy here, before you got here, Ben. 
But  I  do  think  there  has  to  be  some  examination  of  this,  because 
there  is  a  limit  to  how  much  more  we  can  allocate  for  Federal 
funds and I think Amtrak is vulnerable now, because of the failure 
to find some way to increase revenues, I really do. Mr. Hamberger, 
I  hate  to  tell  you,  but  after  the  big  Valdez  disaster,  I  was  the  one 
that went to London. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And  came  back  and  said  that  the  only  answer 
was  to  double-hull  those  tankers  and  people  didn’t  like  me  at  all. 
You  better  listen  to  these  guys.  Someone  ought  to  test  whether 
double-hulls on these tank cars will provide additional security be-
cause I think right now the attitude in Congress would be to man-
date that all of those cars carrying chemicals be double-sided. And 
the  only  thing  that  is  going  to  deter  that  would  be  sufficient  proof 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

79

that  it  wouldn’t  make  any  difference.  If  that  won’t  make  a  dif-
ference  then  I  would  urge  you  to  go  and  look  and  see  what  we’re 
doing in Iraq by some of the changes that are classified as a matter 
of  fact  to  the  tank  cars  that  are  carrying  fuel  or  the  trucks  that 
are  carrying  ammunition.  They  have  new  facilities,  new  ways  to 
improve  the  safety  for  those  people  driving  those  by  virtue  of 
changes  that  have  been  made  in  country  to  those  tanks  and  those 
trucks. 

And,  I  think  Congress  right  now  would  be  in  the  mood  to  say 
that  is  a  risk  that  should  not  be,  that  the  cities  of  the  country 
should not be exposed to that risk if it really exists. 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  In  fact  Senator,  we  are  working  on  a  polymer 
additive  at  our  Pueblo  rail  research  facility,  the  Transportation 
Technology  Center.  It  was  developed  for  the  Iraq  environment  to 
see  whether  it  can  make  the  tank  cars  more  impervious.  It  is  also 
a self-sealant so that if there is a breach, it would self-seal. So, you 
are absolutely right and I appreciate that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  thank  you  all  very  much 
for coming. I appreciate it and we will continue to consider this bill 
that Senator Inouye and I and others have introduced. 

[Whereupon, at 11:37 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

I would like to thank Chairman Stevens and Co-Chairman Inouye for holding this 
hearing on rail security this morning. It is a very timely hearing Mr. Chairman, es-
pecially for Arkansas. As many of you have read, just last Saturday we had a tragic 
accident in Texarkana, Arkansas. A Union Pacific train coming into station collided 
with another Union Pacific train that was stationary on the tracks in the Texarkana 
rail  yard.  The  resulting  explosion  killed  one  Arkansan,  hospitalized  20  others,  de-
stroyed two homes and a rail bridge, and temporarily evacuated close to 700 people 
from their homes. 

The  gas  that  caused  the  explosion,  propylene,  is  a  respiratory  toxicant  that  is 
abundantly produced in this country, typically used in the production of plastics and 
rubber.  I  am  sorry  that  this  accident  happened,  and  I  don’t  know  the  cause.  I  do 
know  that  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  and  the  National  Transportation 
Safety Board are already investigating, and I hope they have a report that will tell 
us  the  cause  of  this  terrible  accident  soon.  I  also  hope  that  they  will  keep  me  in-
formed of the progress of the investigation as it moves forward. 

I  have  a  couple  of  observations  I  would  like  to  make  in  regards  to  this  accident. 
First, my thoughts and prayers are with the family of the individual who was killed 
as  well  as  the  families  whose  homes  were  destroyed  or  damaged  as  a  result  of  the 
accident.  Second,  I  would  like  to  publicly  recognize  the  first  responders  of  Tex-
arkana  who  responded  so  quickly  to  the  explosions  and  kept  fires  from  spreading 
to  many,  many  other  homes  in  the  area.  This  could  have  been  a  much  larger  dis-
aster but for their efforts. 

Mr.  Chairman,  it  is  time  that  we  ensure  governments—local,  State,  and  Federal 
have  the  plans  in  place  and  the  resources  in  place  to  be  able  to  quickly  respond  to 
accidents  or  terrorist  attacks  throughout  our  rail  system.  It  is  too  important.  Too 
many  people  and  too  many  essential  commodities  move  through  the  system  each 
day to ignore the risks inherent in the system. The first thing we must do in order 
to  put  these  plans  in  place  is  to  conduct  a  risk  assessment.  You  can’t  decide  where 
to spend precious resources unless you know where the threats are. I encourage the 
Transportation  Security  Administration  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security 
to  work  in  coordination  with  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  and  Department 
of  Transportation  in  conducting  this  risk  assessment  as  quickly  as  possible.  After 
performing the assessment, we must move forward to ensure that workers are prop-
erly  trained  to  recognize  safety  risks  and  threats,  and  we  must  ensure  that  appro-
priate technologies are developed and utilized to protect our vital rail infrastructure. 
I look forward to discussing rail security with all the interested parties, including 
industry and labor as well as the Administration and my colleagues in the Congress. 
I  am  happy  to  be  a  cosponsor  of  S.  1052.  the  Transportation  Security  improvement 
Act  of  2005,  and  look  forward  to  the  thoughts  of  the  witnesses  on  the  rail  aspects 
of this important legislation. I thank the Chairman and Co-Chairman. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

CATHLEEN A. BERRICK 

Question 1. The rail provisions of S. 1052 include security upgrades, threat assess-
ments,  security  training,  research  and  development,  and  several  other  important 
initiatives,  many  of  which  were  unanimously  approved  by  the  Senate  last  year. 
What is your position on the rail provisions of S. 1052? How can we improve them? 
Answer. Our comments on the rail provisions of S. 1052 pertain to those affecting 
passenger  rail  operations.  In  general,  we  concur  with  the  provisions  recommending 
that grants be awarded to upgrade rail security. Some of the upgrades identified in 
the  proposed  legislation,  such  as  implementing  public  secure  awareness  campaigns 
for  passenger  train  operations,  employee  security  awareness  programs,  and  emer-
gency  response  training,  reflect  practices  we  have  observed  in  our  recent  work  on 

(81)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

82

rail  security.  It  will  be  particularly  important,  as  noted  in  the  legislation,  for  im-
provements in these areas and others to reflect the results of vulnerability and risk 
assessments  conducted  by  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA),  the 
Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  and  other  appropriate  agencies  that  identify 
critical rail assets. 

On  the  issue  of  rail  risk  assessments,  we  support  the  creation  of  a  task  force  to 
ensure  that  these  assessments  are  completed  and  critical  assets  and  infrastructure 
and related vulnerabilities are identified. It is unclear, however, if the task force is 
meant to include non-federal stakeholders such as rail industry associations and re-
gional  passenger  rail  agencies.  We  encourage  the  inclusion  of  these  non-federal 
stakeholders  in  the  risk  assessment  process  to  leverage  their  expertise.  Consistent 
with  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  7,  we  believe  that  it  is  important 
that these assessments incorporate an overall methodology that will enable different 
rail assets to be evaluated on a consistent basis. We also recommend that funds dis-
bursed  to  Amtrak  for  system  wide  security  upgrades  be  based  on  a  comprehensive 
terrorism risk assessment and response plan that provides a baseline for investment 
prioritization and decision making. During our review of passenger rail security, we 
observed that Amtrak had not yet completed such a system wide assessment. 

With regard to the provision (Sec. 314(b)) instructing TSA to review existing DOT 
regulations  to  identify  areas  where  regulations  need  to  be  revised  to  improve  secu-
rity, we believe that other actions may also be taken to strengthen security. Specifi-
cally,  we  believe  that  TSA  should  review  existing  rail  security  regulations,  direc-
tives, and standards and report to the Committee the results of its review of (a) an 
assessment  of  whether  established  security  regulations,  directives,  and  standards 
are  consistent  with  industry  best  practices,  and  (b)  a  plan  and  schedule  for  rail  in-
spections  to  be  conducted  by  rail  security  inspectors.  We  further  recommend,  based 
on  unique  security  practices  observed  in  foreign  countries  during  our  review,  that 
the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  evaluate  the  feasibility  of  establishing  and 
maintaining an information clearinghouse on existing and emergency security tech-
nologies  and  security  best  practices  used  in  the  passenger  rail  industry  both  in  the 
U.S. and abroad. We further recommend that the Department be required to evalu-
ate  the  potential  benefits  and  applicability  of  implementing  covert  testing  proce-
dures  to  evaluate  the  effectiveness  of  rail  system  security  personnel,  practices  used 
by foreign rail operators that integrate security into infrastructure design, and ran-
dom  searches  and  screening  of  passengers  and  their  baggage,  pending  the  results 
of and ongoing joint Federal and industry review of the impact of random screening 
on passenger rail operators.

Question  2.  During  GAO’s  investigation  on  passenger  rail  security,  did  you  have 
an  opportunity  to  review  a  preliminary  version  of  the  National  Strategy  for  Trans-
portation  Security?  Now  that  it  has  been  released,  do  you  think  it  addresses  some 
of the concerns that you identified in your report, particularly your concerns regard-
ing the lack of a coordinated plan for rail security? 

Answer.  We  did  not  have  an  opportunity  to  review  a  draft  of  the  NSTS  during 
our recent audit work on rail security because, according to TSA, the document was 
not available before we completed our work. We believe that the NSTS since issued 
by DHS provides a broad framework for conducting transportation risk assessments, 
and is a first step for determining how critical transportation assets are to be evalu-
ated  for  protection.  However,  we  believe  that  the  strategy  as  written  is  too  general 
to  address  our  concerns  about  how  risk  assessments  are  actually  to  be  conducted 
and how stakeholders are to be involved in the process. It is also not clear from the 
strategy  how  assets  within  different  transportation  sectors,  such  as  passenger  rail 
and  aviation,  are  to  be  compared  in  order  to  prioritize  risks  and  allocate  resources. 
Nor  does  the  strategy  include  transportation  modal  security  plans,  as  required  by 
the  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004,  although  broad  ele-
ments  of  modal  strategic  plans  are  discussed.  Other  strategic  planning  documents 
that  TSA  is  expected  to  issue  in  2006,  such  as  the  Transportation  Sector  Specific 
Plan,  may  include  these  specific  details  not  contained  in  the  NSTS.  We  believe  it 
is important that more specific information related to the Department’s strategy for 
securing all modes of transportation be developed, coordinated, and shared with ap-
propriate stakeholders, beyond what is published in the NSTS. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

EDWARD R. HAMBERGER 

Question  1.  As  the  representatives  of  the  major  sectors  of  the  railroad  industry, 
you  live  with  the  challenges  of  securing  your  railroads  everyday.  We  have  tried  to 
craft  a  bill  that  will  help  make  this  job  easier.  Yet,  I’m  sure  we  can  do  more.  Can 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

83

you tell us which of our provisions you feel are most needed and why? If there were 
one  thing  more  we  could  do  in  this  bill  to  help  you  reach  your  goal  of  a  safe  and 
secure railroad and workplace, what would it be? 

Answer.  The  AAR  supports  provisions  in  the  bill  that  call  on  the  Administration 
to develop a comprehensive security plan that includes the identification of the most 
important  rail  assets  and  the  identification  of  the  biggest  threats  to  those  assets. 
In  developing  this  plan,  the  government  should  use  the  AAR’s  Security  Plan  as  its 
basis. Additionally, freight railroads should be able to apply directly for rail security 
grants rather than have to go through the states. The AAR also fully support fund-
ing  for  research  and  the  deployment  of  rail  security  technologies,  including  auto-
mated  security  inspections,  infrastructure  integrity  monitoring  systems,  emergency 
bridge  repair  and  replacement,  communications-based  train  control  systems  and 
tank car vulnerability reductions. 

One  additional  measure  that  the  bill  could  address  concerns  the  use  of  the  Na-
tional  Guard  and  local  law  enforcement  support  to  augment  industry  protection  of 
critical infrastructure. To date, railroads have been underwriting the cost of security 
measures  for  the  general  public  and  national  defense.  Protective  measures  that 
would  be  required  at  the  highest  alert  levels  could  not  be  sustained  by  the  rail  in-
dustry  alone.  Rail  security  legislation  could  make  clear  that  states  would  be  reim-
bursed  by  the  Federal  Government  for  costs  associated  with  increased  protection  of 
critical rail infrastructure assets under heightened alert conditions.

Question 2. The Committee’s bill, S. 1052, focuses on the threats posed by the rail 
shipment of ‘‘high-hazard materials’’ and requires railroads to develop threat mitiga-
tion  plans.  While  the  safety  statistics  you  quote  are  impressive,  recent  accidents  in 
Graniteville, SC and Texarkana, AK, remind us of the dangers that an accident in-
volving  toxic  inhalants  and  explosives  presents.  If  you  were  required,  as  S.  1052 
contemplates,  to  develop  threat  mitigation  plans  for  high-hazard  hazardous  mate-
rials  traveling  in  specific  rail  corridors  in  high  threat  areas,  such  as  Washington 
D.C.,  why  should  the  DHS  not  have  the  power  to  approve  those  plans?  If  there  is 
no  approval  or  enforcement  authority,  how  can  anyone  be  sure  that  the  plans  are 
adequate? 

Answer.  The  AAR  and  member  railroads  are  working  with  TSA  and  the  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security  in  developing  risk  assessments  for  high  hazardous  ma-
terials corridors. Four have been completed to date including Washington, New Or-
leans,  Cleveland  and  New  Jersey.  We  are  continuing  to  work  with  these  agencies 
to  identify  risks  and  put  in  place  countermeasures  for  those  corridors  where  high 
hazardous  material  moves.  We  have  consulted  and  conferred  and  they  have  not 
taken exceptions to our plans. Further, on request, railroads have altered their oper-
ations and cooperated with DHS for special situations and events. 

The USDOT, both under the Federal Rail Safety Act and the Hazardous Materials 
Transportation  Act,  already  extensively  regulates  the  safe  transportation  of  haz-
ardous  materials.  The  Research  and  Special  Programs  Administration  (now  the 
Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration, PHMSA) regulation HM–
232,  published  in  2003,  requires  railroads  to  develop  and  implement  security  plans 
when  transporting  hazmat.  This  agency  also  has  oversight  authority  for  the  imple-
mentation of these plans. 

If  legislation  requires  a  governmental  approval  process  for  threat  mitigation 
plans,  we  believe  that  it  could  actually  jeopardize  security  by  limiting  the  ability 
of  the  railroads  to  respond  to  quickly  changing  circumstances.  The  response  of  the 
railroads after Katrina and Rita is illustrative. The railroads were able to act imme-
diately  to  detour  hazmat  materials  out  of  the  hurricane  area  using  a  routing  plan 
specific to that particular situation and without having to wait for an approval from 
Washington. 

To implement this provision as written, DHS would have to develop criteria to de-
fine  a  satisfactory  threat  mitigation  plan.  Such  criteria  would  no  doubt  be  promul-
gated  by  regulations.  Regulations,  then  create  a  certainty  as  to  what  the  railroads 
are or are not doing, when for true security, uncertainty is best. Equally, situations 
could occur where railroads would need to alter their plans on short notice but could 
be  hamstrung  by  conflicting  regulatory  requirements.  DHS  already  has  the  author-
ity  to  review  our  transportation  security  plans.  We  believe  that  the  most  effective 
approach is to work in consultation with DHS rather than a Federally-directed com-
mand and control effort.

Question  3.  In  your  written  statement  you  also  oppose  the  provision  in  our  bill, 
Section  310,  which  requires  that  DHS  and  DOT  in  consultation  develop  and  issue 
guidance  on  rail  worker  security-training  programs  and  to  review  and  approve 
training programs submitted by railroad carriers. Do you believe the existing freight 
railroads security-training program is sufficient? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

84

Answer. The AAR does not oppose the provision that would require DHS and DOT 
to develop and issue guidance on rail worker security training or to review the secu-
rity  training  programs  advanced  by  railroad  carriers.  The  AAR  opposes  the  institu-
tion  of  a  Federal  approval  process  for  the  railroads’  security  training  programs  for 
the  following  reasons.  First,  a  Federal  approval  process  tends  to  make  it  difficult 
for the industry to adapt quickly to new circumstances and adjust security training 
requirements  on  a  real  time  basis.  We  are  concerned  that  railroad  workers  would 
then  refuse  to  undertake  any  security  training  unless  it  was  specifically  approved 
by  the  Federal  Government.  Second,  the  provision  unfairly  singles  out  the  railroad 
industry—as opposed to all manufacturing and service industries—as requiring Fed-
eral approval for corporate training practices. 

Since  the  days  of  railroad  bandits  and  terrorist  outlaws,  the  Class  1  freight  rail-
roads have employed and maintained their own railroad police forces to help protect 
the security of its employees, passengers and freight. Some 2000 railroad police are 
employed  today  as  duly  appointed  sworn  law  enforcement  officers  certified  or  com-
missioned  under  State  and  Federal  statues.  Reacting  swiftly  to  the  events  of  Sep-
tember  11th,  the  major  railroads  put  into  place  more  than  50  countermeasures  to 
ensure  the  security  of  the  industry.  Access  to  important  rail  facilities  and  informa-
tion  was  restricted.  The  industry  significantly  increased  cyber-security  procedures 
and  techniques.  Employee  records  were  compared  with  FBI  terrorist  lists.  Security 
briefings,  like  safety  briefings,  became  a  daily  part  of  an  employee’s  job.  Some  rail-
roads  have  gone  so  far  as  to  include  security  training  as  part  of  the  annual  FRA-
mandated  employee  certification  process.  In  an  effort  to  further  increase  the  level 
of security awareness for their employees, AAR member railroads are working with 
the National Transit Institute (NTI) at Rutgers University to develop a uniform se-
curity awareness curriculum that will significantly enhance the level of employee se-
curity  training.  The  curriculum  is  modeled  after  the  program  NTI  and  the  Federal 
Transit Administration developed for public transit agency employees. 

The  goal  of  the  training  is  to  provide  rail  employees  with  an  understanding  of 
their role and responsibility in system security and how to implement their compa-
nies’  procedures  upon  detection  of  suspicious  objects  or  activities.  Course  modules 
include  instructions  on  reacting  to  threats,  identifying  suspicious  activity,  identi-
fying  suspicious  objects,  and  responding  to  incidents.  These  course  modules  will  be 
rolled out by the AAR member railroads within the next 90 days.

Question 4. How do you explain the disparity between AAR’s perception of the rail 
workers’  confidence  in  the  security  training  they  have  received  and  the  results  of 
a  recent  Teamsters  Union  Rail  Division  survey  in  which  85  percent  of  those  re-
sponding claim to not have received security training in the last twelve months? 

Answer.  Despite  an  enviable  record  of  safety  over  more  than  two  decades,  some 
rail labor union leaders are attempting to attack the industry by tallying responses 
to  a  loaded  union  questionnaire  and  touting  it  as  a  nationwide  ‘‘study’’  of  security 
gaps on U.S. railroads. Union leaders more than a year ago gave the short question-
naire  to  members  of  the  Brotherhood  of  Locomotive  Engineers  and  Trainmen 
(BLET)  and  the  Brotherhood  of  Maintenance  of  Way  Employes  Division  (BMWED), 
both part of the International Brotherhood of Teamsters Rail Labor Bargaining Coa-
lition. It carried a Teamsters logo and instructed members to ‘‘please give this form 
to your local chairman.’’

Teamsters  admit  their  report  is  not  a  scientific  analysis.  In  reality,  it  is  a  tactic 
aimed  at  the  bargaining  table  that  ignores  the  facts  and  misrepresents  the  indus-
try’s strong safety record. 

The fact is that after 9/11, America’s railroads worked quickly with Federal secu-
rity agencies to develop and implement a multi-layered, risk-based security plan for 
the  Nation’s  freight  rail  network  that  included  security  awareness  training  for  rail 
employees. Since 9/11, freight railroads have implemented more than 100 new secu-
rity actions and 50-plus changes in their operations. That’s in addition to the inten-
sive  safety  training  required  of  all  railroad  operating  employees  and  the  special  se-
curity  training  that  all  rail  employees  who  handle  hazardous  materials  movements 
receive. 

The  industry  is  currently  working  with  the  National  Transit  Institute  (NTI)  at 
Rutgers  University  to  create  an  enhanced  security  awareness  training  program  for 
railroad employees throughout the country. 

America’s  freight  railroads  have  developed  train  control  technology  that  will  im-
prove  significantly  the  safety  of  freight  operations.  This  21st  Century  technology 
will  help  to  prevent  train  collisions,  improve  productivity  and  reduce  accidents 
caused  by  fatigue  and  human  error,  the  most  common  causes  of  train  accidents. 
Taking the Nation’s freight rail network to this next level of safety and success will 
require 21st Century labor agreements and changes to antiquated work rules nego-
tiated years prior to these technological advances. U.S. freight railroads are now in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

negotiations with unions representing engineers and train crews—hence the interest 
of the Teamsters in discrediting the safety and security record.

85

Question  5.  I  would  like  to  compliment  the  railroad  industry  for  its  commitment 
to Operation Respond. According to our information the Operation Respond software 
is  now  available  to  over  56,000  response  agencies.  Have  the  railroads  given  any 
thought  to  how  this  valuable  connection  with  emergency  responders  can  help  them 
deal  with  communities  concerns  over  railroad  security?  I  am  referring  specifically 
to advanced information and rerouting of hazardous materials. 

Answer. The Class 1 railroads have joined the Department of Homeland Security 
and  the  Department  of  Transportation  in  sponsoring  Operation  Respond,  a  public-
private  partnership  that  develops  software,  mapping  systems,  alert  networks  and 
training programs for community responders. The AAR supports Operation Respond 
financially and is a member of its Steering Committee. The AAR and Operation Re-
spond signed an agreement in November 2003 to assist emergency responders, pro-
mote  safety  and  increase  security  along  our  Nation’s  railroad  system.  This  agree-
ment includes the development of an ‘‘information sharing system’’ to benefit emer-
gency responders and railroad carriers, and the integration of the Emergency Serv-
ices  Information  Network  Corporation  (ESINC)  network  and  the  AAR  Rail  Alert 
Network. 

The  freight  railroads  work  aggressively  to  make  sure  that  railroad  employees, 
first  responders,  emergency  personnel  and  other  necessary  officials  are  prepared  to 
respond  quickly  and  efficiently.  Railroads  provide  local  emergency  officials  with  in-
formation on the types of hazardous materials being transported through their com-
munities.  The  railroads  also  work  closely  with  Local  Emergency  Planning  Commit-
tees  to  make  sure  they  have  comprehensive  and  up-to-date  emergency  planning  in-
formation. 

The  Nation’s  freight  railroads,  both  individually  and  in  partnership  with  the 
American  Chemistry  Council  (ACC),  train  more  than  20,000  emergency  responders 
each  year  in  communities  across  the  Nation.  Railroad  companies  are  active  partici-
pants in the ACC’s TRANSCAER (Transportation and Community Awareness and 
Emergency Response), a nationwide effort to assist communities with emergency re-
sponse  plans  as  well  as  CHEMTREC (Chemical  Transportation  Emergency  Cen-
ter), the ACC’s 24-hour emergency response operation. TRANSCAER requires its in-
dustry  partners  to  adhere  to  a  rigorous  code  of  management  practices  and  strict 
standards  for  self-evaluation,  systems  management  and  performance  measurement 
and  mutual  assistance.  Under  TRANSCAER,  railroads  bring  hands-on  and  class-
room training to thousands of emergency first responders. They also help emergency 
planning  groups  identify  the  general  types  of  hazardous  materials  moving  through 
the  community;  provide  guidance  for  local  officials  to  develop  and  evaluate  their 
emergency response plans; assist with testing and training. 

Railroads  also  participate  in  CHEMTREC,  a  24/7  operation  that  provides  imme-
diate  emergency  response  information  and  assistance  during  emergencies  involving 
chemicals.  Each  CHEMTREC  member  puts  CHEMTREC’s  number  on  its  packages 
and  tank  cars.  CHEMTREC  maintains  an  extensive  database  of  information  on 
chemicals,  shippers  and  emergency  response,  used  by  first  responders  during 
hazmat accidents. The railroads provide needed information to CHEMTREC during 
railroad  accidents  so  that  the  information  can  be  communicated  to  local  emergency 
responders to help mitigate accidents. 

Individually,  railroads  sponsor  annual  training  for  first  responders  across  the 
country at the Emergency Response Training Center in Pueblo, Co. The training in-
cludes  hazardous  materials  technician;  tank  car  specialist;  advanced  tank  car  spe-
cialist;  intermodal  specialist;  incident  commander;  advanced  hazmat  technician; 
highway emergency response; weapons of mass destruction; hazmat monitoring; and 
transportation specialist. The railroad industry sponsors an Annual Hazardous Ma-
terials  Seminar  attended  by  hundreds  of  emergency  responders,  shippers,  contrac-
tors as well as railroad emergency response personnel to provide up-to-date training 
on  the  latest  emergency  response  techniques  and  regulations.  It  also  provides 
hands-on  training  to  familiarize  responders  with  equipment  used  in  hazmat  acci-
dents. 

In  big  cities,  small  towns,  and  rural  areas,  railroads  work  with  communities  to 
conduct full-scale emergency response drills that can take up to six months to plan 
and  involve  responders  from  local,  county,  state,  regional  and  Federal  levels.  The 
railroads  help  planners  include  every  public  agency  that  needs  to  be  notified  and 
involves them in the drill. Drills are sometimes conducted across multiple towns and 
regions to test how well communities work together in an emergency situation. 

Since  9/11,  emergency  training  has  also  included  a  terrorism  component.  AAR 
member railroads own four tank cars that are used for both the emergency response 
drills  as  well  as  training  purposes.  Other  safety  initiatives  conducted  by  various 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

86

railroads  include  mock  safety  drills  and  table  top  simulations  in  communities;  on-
going  assessments  of  potential  risks  to  employees  and  local  communities  resulting 
from  accidents  or  other  emergencies;  on-going  training  programs  for  those  employ-
ees  who  have  response  or  communications  responsibilities  in  the  event  of  an  emer-
gency;  emergency  exercises,  at  least  annually,  to  test  operability  of  written  emer-
gency response plans; facility tours for emergency responders to promote emergency 
preparedness  and  provide  up-to-date  knowledge  of  facility  operations;  special  envi-
ronmental monitoring teams, located along the railroad system, which can be imme-
diately  mobilized  to  relay  information  to  health  experts.  These  teams  are  equipped 
with advanced detection and monitoring equipment; audits of hazmat contractors to 
ensure that equipment, training and response capabilities meet standards; audits of 
internal  operations  and  chemical  shippers  for  correct  shipping  documentation;  re-
views  of  non-accident  releases  from  tank  cars  and,  if  necessary,  offers  to  retrain 
chemical shippers regarding safe loading and sealing procedures. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

EDWARD R. HAMBERGER 

Question 1. Are all AAR member railroads offering security training for their em-

ployees? 

Answer.  All  railroad  employees  have  received  security  awareness  training.  Secu-
rity is also a part of employees’ daily job safety briefing. As a general rule we want 
our  non-security  employees  to  report  suspicious  activity  to  the  railroad  police  so 
they  can  take  appropriate  action.  We  do  not  want  non-security  employees  to  put 
themselves  at  risk  in  addressing  a  security  concern.  Railroad  employees  will  be 
briefed at daily job briefings when they need to take additional action and what that 
action entails.

Question 2. Do you believe that the Federal Government has a role in the develop-

ment of uniform standards for employee security training programs? 

Answer.  The  most  effective  role  that  the  Federal  Government  can  play  with  re-
spect  to  employee  security  training  programs  is  to  share  best  practices  information 
with  the  industry.  The  AAR  is  currently  developing  a  uniform  security  awareness 
curriculum with the National Transit Institute that will be deployed throughout the 
industry in 2006 that significantly enhances the level of employee security training. 
The goal of the training is to provide rail employees with an understanding of their 
role and responsibilities in system security, and how to implement their companies’ 
procedures upon detection of suspicious objects or activities. Course modules include 
instructions  on  reacting  to  threats,  identifying  suspicious  activity,  identifying  sus-
picious objects and responding to incidents. 

The Department of Transportation implemented security training requirements in 
49  CFR  § 172.704.  Since  the  railroads  already  comply  with  the  current  regulations, 
and  we  have  a  system  in  place  to  instruct  employees  on  what  they  will  need  to  do 
at  increased  alert  levels,  we  see  no  reason  for  additional  regulations  or  standards. 
The  AAR  does  not  believe  it  to  be  an  appropriate  Federal  Government  role  to 
mandate uniform standards to the private sector for employee security training. Pri-
vate  industry  inherently  has  an  interest  in  the  protection  of  its  employees  and  as-
sets  and  is  in  the  best  position  to  appropriately  discern  how  best  to  train  its  work-
force.  Worker  security  training  practices  across  manufacturing  and  service  indus-
tries will vary greatly depending on many circumstances. What may be appropriate 
security  training  for  a  locomotive  engineer  will  not  be  the  same  as  for  a  hospital 
nurse, a cafeteria worker or a nuclear plant operator. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

WILLIAM L. CROSBIE 

Question  1.  As  the  representatives  of  the  major  sectors  of  the  railroad  industry, 
you  live  with  the  challenges  of  securing  your  railroads  everyday.  We  have  tried  to 
craft  a  bill  that  will  help  make  this  job  easier.  Yet,  I’m  sure  we  can  do  more.  Can 
you tell us which of our provisions you feel are most needed and why? If there were 
one  thing  more  we  could  do  in  this  bill  to  help  you  reach  your  goal  of  a  safe  and 
secure railroad and workplace, what would it be? 

Answer. The Rail Security Act of 2005 provides the most comprehensive approach 
to  improving  rail  surface  transportation  systems  to  date.  Because  of  Amtrak’s  con-
tinuing  fiscal  uncertainty  on  future  funding  levels  for  the  Corporation  as  a  whole, 
the most needed provisions of S. 1052 for Amtrak are the rail security and life safe-
ty sections (Sections 303, 304 and 305). While Amtrak is currently committing cap-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

87

ital  resources  to  security  improvements.  it  is  critical  that  the  Federal  Government 
provide an equitable share of funding for the rail transportation mode. 

Since 9/11, rail security issues and funding have been given short shrift. The most 
important  thing  that  this  Committee  could  do  to  help  Amtrak  reach  its  goal  of  a 
safe  and  secure  railroad  and  workplace  is,  simply,  to  have  this  legislation  passed 
and enacted.

Question 2. Amtrak has been very proactive in working with DHS/TSA and DOT/
FRA  to  engage  in  pilot  programs  and  other  security  activities.  What  additional  as-
sistance do you need, in addition to more funding, from the Federal Government to 
ensure adequate security for your passengers? 

Answer. Amtrak believes that some of the initiatives it has coordinated with DHS/
TSA provide a guide for government/industry relations that can reasonably improve 
rail security. An example is the use of TSA baggage screening personnel and equip-
ment based upon certain events (RNC, Inaugural events). This ought to be extended 
to  intelligence  driven  threats  at  specific  locations  or  areas.  In  addition,  systematic 
security schemes ought to be deployed and developed by government to keep terror-
ists off balance or to eliminate security predictability. Such efforts performed in co-
ordination with rail agencies would improve rail security. 

Intelligence information and sharing is one of the key elements for helping to se-
cure  Amtrak.  Like  all  rail  agencies,  Amtrak  needs  to  receive  timely  information  to 
address  threats.  DHS/TSA  must  ensure  that  dissemination  of  threat  information  is 
performed in a quick and effective manner. 

Because  of  the  expanse  of  the  Amtrak  route  system,  Federal  agencies  ought  to 
provide  assistance  to  Amtrak  upon  request  to  support  security  initiatives  (such  as 
the  TSA  canine  program).  Consideration  ought  to  be  given  to  state  and  local  agen-
cies receiving grant funding for initiatives designed to improve rail and transit secu-
rity. 

DHS passenger rail and transit security grant programs should be expanded and 

used as models for development of integrated rail security plans and policies. 

As stated in GAO report, 05–851, there needs to be a security technology clearing-
house  established  by  the  government  that  rail  agencies  can  use  to  develop,  coordi-
nate  or  seek  assistance  in  purchasing,  implementing  and  improving  equipment  to 
protect rail security assets.

Question  3.  Amtrak  has  shown  leadership  in  its  support  of  Operation  Respond 
hazardous  materials  tracking  technology,  particularly  as  it  relates  to  providing  po-
lice  and  fire  departments  with  valuable  response  guidance.  If  and  when  something 
does  happen,  the  Operation  Respond  software  is  a  valuable  response  tool  for  Am-
trak. What do you think can be done to encourage a more widespread incorporation 
of the Operation Respond software by the communities Amtrak serves and the com-
muter rail industry? 

Answer.  First  responder  training  grants  have  been  available  to  state  and  local 
agencies  for  years.  The  grants  are  usually  conditioned  upon  a  Federal  agency  ap-
proving the course or actually providing the course. A possible method of expanding 
the use of the Operation Respond program would be to allow first responders to re-
ceive funding for Operation Respond training, to have Federal agencies conduct and/
or approve training and funding for Operation Respond training, and/or to condition 
grant funding for first responders to take also Operation Respond training. An eval-
uation  of  the  ability  of  Operation  Respond  to  handle  increased  training  demands 
should also be explored and/or funded. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

EDMUND ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question 1. I have worked hard, together with Chairman Stevens, to craft a solid 
blueprint for future Federal actions to secure our Nations’ railroads. The rail provi-
sions of S. 1052 include security upgrades, threat assessments, security training, re-
search  and  development,  and  several  other  important  initiatives,  many  of  which 
were  unanimously  approved  by  the  Senate  last  year.  Yet,  if  we  can  strengthen  our 
efforts,  we  must.  I  hope  each  of  you  will  help  us  do  that.  What  is  your  position  on 
the rail provisions of S. 1052? How can we improve them? 

Answer.  The  Department’s  views  on  S.  1052  were  sent  to  the  Committee  on  No-
vember  10,  2005.  We  stand  ready  to  render  any  technical  assistance  that  the  Com-
mittee may request.

Question 2. In less than a year and a half, terrorists have killed almost 300 people 
in  bombings  of  mass  transit  systems,  most  recently  in  London  and  in  Madrid.  Yet, 
this  summer,  Secretary  Chertoff  indicated  in  an  interview  that  the  protection  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

88

transit and rail should largely be the responsibility of cities and states and not the 
Federal  Government.  Do  you  believe  that  funding  for  rail  and  transit  security  is  a 
lower priority for the Federal Government than for other transportation modes? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  and  the  Congress 
have focused the majority of transportation security funding towards what has been 
considered the largest and most consistent potential threat—attacks on our aviation 
system.  At  the  same  time,  TSA  has  been  working  to  improve  security  in  other 
modes  of  transportation.  The  Nation’s  transportation  system  is  vast  and  complex, 
but historically only in aviation security is the Federal role direct and pre-eminent. 
For that reason, TSA and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) have known 
that  the  aviation  model  of  security  would  not  work  for  securing  other  modes  of 
transportation.  Thus,  the  Department,  in  coordination  with  TSA  continues  to  work 
with  State,  tribal,  local,  regional  and  private  partners  to  help  secure  our  transpor-
tation system. These efforts span the spectrum of security, from intelligence and in-
formation  sharing  to  awareness  through  prevention,  response,  and  recovery  from  a 
potential terrorist attack in the United States. 

The responsibility for securing our Nation’s transportation system is a shared one 
between  Federal,  State,  and  local  governments,  and  private  industry  stakeholders, 
and system users. Public and private stakeholder investment in security is both ap-
propriate and expected. Currently, the Federal Government is providing funding, in 
the  form  of  security  grants,  to  help  ameliorate  the  cost  borne  by  the  private  stake-
holders.  TSA  and  ODP  will  continue  to  assist  system  operators  identify  their  secu-
rity  risks  through:  (1)  security  assessments,  both  government-facilitated  and 
through use of self-assessment tools, (2) compliance efforts, and (3) through coopera-
tive  partnerships  with  industry  associations  and  operators  to  develop  effective  and 
cost-efficient mitigation strategies. 

An  example  of  a  cooperative  partnership  is  the  work  that  DHS,  including  TSA 
have done and continues to do with Amtrak. TSA has provided explosives detection 
canine teams to Amtrak upon its request on several occasions, including during the 
Republican  National  Convention,  Inauguration  and  in  New  York  during  the  fall 
2005 security alert. TSA is engaged in a continuous dialogue with Amtrak regarding 
use of canine resources and is exploring the possibility of instituting a more formal 
framework for providing such support to Amtrak in the future. TSA fully integrates 
Amtrak  into  its  security  planning  and  is  working  to  further  enhance  information 
and intelligence sharing capabilities.

Question  3.  I  am  sure  you  are  aware  of  the  recent  survey  of  the  DHS  staff  that 
showed  a  low  morale.  You  are  new  to  the  Agency,  or  rather,  returning  to  it.  How 
do you plan on addressing the morale issue? 

Answer.  Workforce  morale  is  very  important  to  me  and  I  am  pleased  to  say  that 
the Transportation Security Administration (TSA) has taken a number of actions to 
improve morale since we initially surveyed our entire workforce in February/March 
2004,  which  was  followed  by  a  resurvey  of  a  sample  of  our  workforce  by  the  Office 
of Personnel Management (OPM) and the Department later in 2004. Our Corporate 
Organizational  Action  Plan  outlines  the  broad  interventions  that  fall  under  four 
general areas that were highlighted as important for change: fairness and treatment 
of  others,  rewards  and  recognition,  communication,  and  work  environment/quality 
of worklife. Additionally, our recently published TSA Compendium of Positive Prac-
tices  identifies  interventions  that  can  and  have  been  taken  by  local  leaders  to  ad-
dress workplace and workforce issues in a variety of areas. 

Underlying the first two areas was a general sense that outstanding performance 
does  not  result  in  any  tangible  rewards,  such  as  increased  pay  or  bonuses,  pro-
motional  opportunities  or  other  career  advancement.  I  am  pleased  that  both  na-
tional  and  local  rewards  and  recognition  programs  have  been  established  since  the 
survey  was  administered.  These  programs  allow  for  both  monetary  and  non-mone-
tary  recognition  for  a  job  well  done.  A  screener  performance  management  system 
is being designed that will better identify top performers and link their outstanding 
performance  to  pay  increases.  This  system  will  consider  objective  measures  of  per-
formance,  assessment  of  competencies  and  will  incorporate  continual  feedback  and 
coaching  as  critical  components.  We  will  continue  to  seek  suggestions  for  ways  to 
publicly recognize and reward those who do an outstanding job for TSA, both at the 
national as well as the local, airport level. 

Expanding  career  opportunities  for  our  screener  workforce  is  very  important  to 
me. I recently announced a change in the job series and title for TSA screeners that 
better  signifies  the  important  professional  role  that  they  serve.  We  will  also  be  es-
tablishing  intern  programs  that  will  assist  members  of  our  workforce  to  transition 
into  Federal  Air  Marshal  and  Inspector  positions.  I  have  decided  to  reserve  some 
Federal  Air  Marshal  openings  to  be  filled  exclusively  by  TSA  employees.  We  cur-
rently have a variety of career planning services available to TSA employees, includ-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

89

ing a career coaching service to help guide employees in identifying career interests, 
conducting  job  searches,  and  developing  effective  application  materials.  We  also 
have a web-based Career Toolbox to support employees’ career planning. 

Communication  is  also  critical  to  employee  morale.  An  important  aspect  of  that 
is  to  give  employees  at  all  levels  a  voice  in  matters  that  directly  affect  them.  To 
that end, there are initiatives at many airports across the country to do this, many 
of  them  folded  under  broader  Model  Workplace  Programs—town  hall  meetings, 
screener  advisory  groups  and  small  on-site  meetings  through  which  action  plan  re-
sults  for  an  individual  work  location  are  fed  back  directly  to  the  employees  who 
work  at  that  site.  At  the  national  level,  we  have  the  Employee  Issues  Coordination 
Council,  bringing  together  organizations  that  deal  with  employee  issues,  to  provide 
a  corporate  focus  and  clearinghouse  for  information  on  employee  issues  as  well  as 
to collect and analyze information on employee issues, recommending corporate pri-
orities for action. 

I  have  personally  conducted  numerous  town  hall  meetings,  both  in  Headquarters 
and  in  airports  across  the  country,  since  rejoining  TSA.  Visible  and  empowering 
leadership  is  important.  Role  clarity  is  essential  to  achieving  optimal  action  plan-
ning and results. We must highlight the leaders who are accountable and celebrate 
those  who  achieve  results.  At  a  national  level,  I’ve  announced  the  establishment  of 
a  Screener  Advisory  Group  and  an  Assistant  Federal  Security  Director  Advisory 
Group. As their first charge, I have asked both groups to propose a set of incentives 
that  they  believe  are  key  to  retaining  our  most  talented  employees,  and  I  eagerly 
await their suggestions. 

We  are  also  taking  steps  to  address  concerns  related  to  the  quality  of  the  work 
environment. Of utmost concern to me is the safety and well-being of our workforce, 
particularly  the  screener  workforce.  I  will  be  focusing  additional  attention  first  on 
preventing  injuries  and  second,  getting  employees  back  on  the  job  as  soon  as  pos-
sible. The physical work environment of many of our screeners continues to require 
the attention of both local and national leadership. I am pleased that many improve-
ments  have  been  put  in  place  already  and  others  are  underway  in  airports  across 
the country. 

Finally,  it  is  important  to  continually  assess  employee  morale  and  whether  the 
programs  put  in  place  make  a  difference.  To  that  end,  we  expect  to  again  survey 
the  entire  TSA  workforce  in  early  2006  to  see  whether  morale  has  improved,  and 
in  what  areas.  With  those  results,  we  will  be  able  to  determine  where  additional 
effort and/or resources must be focused to achieve further gains. Additionally, in No-
vember  2005,  TSA  launched  a  National  Exit  Survey  for  departing  employees,  with 
the same end in mind. 

While  I  am  pleased  that  some  progress  has  been  made,  I  recognize  that  we  have 
much more work to do. It is a challenge that is worth the effort—to create the model 
workplace and become an employer of choice.

Question  4.  How  many  staff  does  TSA  have  dedicated  to  rail  security—people 
whose  primary  job  functions  is  to  work  on  rail  security  issues?  How  many  people 
whose primary function is working on non-aviation security issues? How many staff 
working on aviation security issues? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  is  basing  its  answers 
to these inquiries on an analysis of the funding source for the salaries and benefits 
of TSA employees. 

As  of  October  15,  TSA  staff  includes  a  total  of  116  individuals  dedicated  to  rail 
security,  including  96  Rail  Inspectors.  The  total  number  of  individuals  whose  pri-
mary function is on non-aviation security issues is 220. This figure includes the 116 
dedicated  to  rail  security.  Employees  paid  from  the  Aviation  Security  budget  cat-
egory, which include primarily security screeners, total about 51,440. 

TSA  notes  that  these  totals  do  not  include  individuals  serving  in  cross-cutting 

areas such as credentialing, intelligence, and administrative support.

Question  5.  What  percentage  of  TSA  funding,  apart  from  grants  are  directed  ex-
clusively to rail security? How much is that in comparison of funding directed exclu-
sively to aviation? 

Answer. Under the Homeland Security Appropriations Act, 2006 (Pub. L. 109–90), 
Congress appropriated funding to the Transportation Security Administration (TSA) 
as follows:

• $4,607,386,000  for  necessary  expenses  relating  to  providing  civil  aviation  secu-

• $36,000,000  for  necessary  expenses  related  to  providing  surface  transportation 

rity services;

security activities;

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

90

rity support and intelligence; and

• $74,996,000  for  necessary  expenses  for  the  development  and  implementation  of 
screening  programs  of  the  Office  of  Transportation  Vetting  and  Credentialing;
• $510,483,000  for  necessary  expenses  relating  to  providing  transportation  secu-
• $686,200,000 for necessary expenses of the Federal Air Marshals Service.
Of the $36 million for surface transportation security activities, Congress directed 
that  $8  million  be  set  aside  for  the  rail  inspector  program  and  canine  teams.  TSA 
also  intends  to  spend  approximately  $8  million  for  rail  security  efforts  in  FY  2006, 
for a total of about $16 million. 

However, this number is not reflective of all efforts directed towards rail security 
either  within  TSA,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS),  or  the  Federal 
Government. First, it should be noted that other efforts and funding streams within 
TSA,  particularly  under  the  transportation  security  support  and  intelligence  cat-
egory,  contribute  to  rail  security  efforts.  For  example,  cross-cutting  offices,  such  as 
the  Chief  Technology  Office,  Office  of  the  Chief  Counsel,  Transportation  Security 
Operations  Center,  Human  Resources,  Chief  Information  Officer,  and  Transpor-
tation Security Intelligence Service, provide support to all programs within TSA, in-
cluding  the  rail  security  programs.  Specifically,  TSA  and  the  Department  have  fo-
cused significant resources on intelligence with the goal of identifying and stopping 
a  terrorist  before  he  reaches  the  intended  target.  Because  of  these  cross-cutting  of-
fices and other Departmental efforts, it is impossible to parse a percentage of funds 
spent exclusively on rail or aviation. 

Additionally,  Congress  has  funded  programs  for  infrastructure  protection  and  re-
search and development through other DHS entities. TSA works closely and its pro-
grams align with the Information Analysis and Infrastructure Protection (IAIP) and 
Science  and  Technology  (S&T)  Directorates  efforts  on  rail  and  infrastructure  secu-
rity along with the Department of Transportation’s modal administrations efforts in 
rail. In summary, TSA’s spending on rail security is obviously significantly less than 
the  amount  spent  on  aviation  security.  That  is  the  result  of  the  congressionally 
mandated  security  role  TSA  provides  in  aviation  by  screening  passengers  and  bag-
gage  versus  a  more  standard-setting  and  compliance  role  that  it  plays  in  rail  secu-
rity.

Question  6.  TSA  may  use  ‘‘risk/value  analysis,’’  but  will  the  funding  &  staff  be 

there to address the risks? 

Answer.  As  indicated  above,  Congress  recently  appropriated  funding  for  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  for  FY  2006,  and  TSA  will  manage 
the  level  of  resources  that  have  been  made  available  by  utilizing  a  threat-based, 
risk-management  approach  to  transportation  security.  TSA  constantly  reassesses 
these resources and budget priorities as part of the Department of Homeland Secu-
rity’s (DHS) risk-based management approach to securing the Nation’s critical infra-
structure. In addition, since the creation of TSA, Congress has provided very specific 
direction  as  to  how  funds  are  to  be  spent.  TSA  is  responsible  for  evaluating  risk  to 
the  transportation  system  across  a  changing  array  of  threats,  sharing  threat  and 
risk  information  with  transportation  stakeholders  (public  and  private),  establishing 
consistent  national  transportation  security  standards  across  all  modes,  monitoring 
compliance with those standards by transportation stakeholders and in the event of 
a  transportation  security  incident,  ensuring  rapid  restoration  of  service  and  public 
confidence. TSA and our partners within DHS, in coordination with the Department 
of  Transportation  (DOT),  have  conducted  vulnerability  assessments  on  transpor-
tation assets, such as rail and transit, to determine their susceptibility to attack or 
compromise. 

Ensuring  that  our  Nation’s  transportation  systems  are  secure  must  be  accom-
plished  through  effective  partnering  between  appropriate  Federal,  State,  local  and 
private industry entities. Of course, DHS is charged with the responsibility for pro-
tecting  all  modes  of  transportation,  but  it  has  consistently  held  that  this  responsi-
bility must be shared with Federal, State, local and private industry partners, many 
of whom were already in the business of providing security for their particular piece 
of the transportation puzzle. The Administration and Congress have recognized the 
importance  of  supporting  these  efforts  through  grants  to  our  governmental  and  in-
dustry  partners.  In  the  Homeland  Security  Appropriations  Act,  2006  (Pub.  L.  109–
90),  the  Office  for  Domestic  Preparedness  will  mange  the  following  transportation 
security programs as directed by Congress to include the following:

• Rail and Transit Security—$150,000,000
• Port Security—$175,000,000
• Intercity Bus Security—$10,000,000
• Trucking Security—$5,000,000

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

91

Additionally, DHS has allocated $8.6 billion since its creation for counterterrorism 
preparedness.  These  funds  can  be  allocated  by  State  and  local  governments  for  rail 
security efforts.

Question  7.  How  much  of  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  funding  has  been 

actually obligated? What percentage of this has gone to freight rail security? 

Answer.  In  FY  2005,  Congress  directed  that  $150  million  be  made  available  for 
rail and transit security grants. Of these funds, the Department of Homeland Secu-
rity’s  Office  for  Domestic  Preparedness  (ODP)  made  available  nearly  $134  million 
under  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  (TSGP).  To  date,  ODP  has  obligated  all 
funds under the TSGP. While none of these funds were awarded to promote freight 
rail security efforts, the Department did make available $5 million from the remain-
ing  rail  and  transit  security  grant  funding  provided  by  Congress  for  a  Freight  Rail 
Security  Program.  This  $5  million  was  awarded  to  the  Railroad  Research  Founda-
tion  to  undertake  three  projects:  (1)  development  of  a  Rail  Corridor  Risk  Manage-
ment Tool; (2) development of a Rail Corridor Hazmat Response and Recovery Tool; 
and  (3)  development  and  demonstration  of  ‘‘Safe  Haven’’  concepts  for  in-route  toxic 
inhalation  hazard  shipments.  These  projects  were  made  available  and  are  being 
managed  by  the  Office  for  Domestic  Preparedness  as  identified  through  partner-
ships with other DHS entities, including TSA, the Border and Transportation Secu-
rity  Directorate,  and  the  Information  Analysis  and  Infrastructure  Protection  Direc-
torate,  as  well  as  with  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  and  the  Pipeline  and 
Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  within  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation.  These  projects  offer  the  potential  for  long-term  enhancement  of  freight  rail 
security.

Question  8.  In  June  2005,  Mr.  Ed  Wytkind,  President  of  the  Transportation 
Trades  Department,  AFL–CIO,  sent  a  letter  to  Secretary  Chertoff  outlining  several 
concerns  over  the  status  of  transportation  security  in  this  country.  Specifically,  the 
letter  points  out  that  no  Federal  agency  has  issued  security  training  mandates  for 
rail workers and urges DHS to ‘‘address this problem by immediately issuing train-
ing standards and requirements.’’ To my knowledge, the Department has not yet re-
sponded to this letter and DHS and TSA still has not mandated that passenger rail 
agencies  provide  security  training  to  employees  as  a  condition  of  receiving  security 
grants. What is TSA doing to ensure front line rail employees are receiving security 
training? 

Answer. TSA has issued two rail security directives (SD RAILPAX–04–01 and SD 
RAILPAX–04–02), which require rail operators to implement various security meas-
ures.  While  ‘‘security  training’’  in  a  specified  manner  or  amount  of  time  is  not  ex-
pressly  mandated,  each  of  these  measures  requires  passenger  rail  systems  to  edu-
cate  their  personnel  on  security  requirements  and  ensure  their  implementation 
through  repeated  advisories  and  guidance.  Training  programs  and  materials  deliv-
ered to employees meet this responsibility. 

In addition, DHS is partnering with the American Public Transportation Associa-
tion  (APTA)  to  assist  its  employee  member  organizations  in  developing  training 
standards  for  public  transportation  employees.  These  training  standards  are  devel-
oped in collaboration with transit industry professionals, industry experts, and pro-
fessional  training  institutes.  In  addition,  both  the  Federal  Transit  Administration 
and  TSA  fund  and  support  a  variety  of  safety  and  security  training  initiatives  for 
transit  agencies  and  their  employees.  Much  of  the  training  is  available  at  no  cost. 
Transit-specific  training  programs  include  recognizing  terrorist  activity  and  re-
sponse,  explosives  incidents,  weapons  of  mass  destruction,  and  responding  to  a  hi-
jacking.  For  example,  through  the  Federal  Law  Enforcement  Training  Center,  TSA 
sponsored  the  Land  Transportation  Anti-Terrorism  Training  Program  which  has 
trained over 400 Law Enforcement and Transit personnel as of the end of FY05.

Question  9.  During  a  hearing  on  the  London  bombings,  you  described  security  on 
the  Nation’s  mass  transit  systems  as  ‘‘outstanding’’  despite  the  fact  that  TSA  had 
not  completed  its  security  risk  assessments  and  transit  workers,  like  rail  workers, 
are not being trained. How would you characterize the state of security on our rail-
roads? What steps need to be taken to improve rail security and what is TSA doing 
about it? 

Answer. The mass transit and rail industry, and State and local governments, are 
to  be  commended  for  their  proactive  response  and  significant  commitments  in  ad-
dressing  homeland  security  issues,  both  pre-  and  post-9/11,  and  following  the  Mos-
cow,  Madrid  and  London  bombing  incidents.  The  responsible  government  approach 
has  been  to  continue  to  leverage  these  efforts  as  we  developed  baseline  standards 
and refined our rail security strategy. 

To  this  end,  the  United  States  Government  has  made  significant  enhancements 
to  transportation  security,  specifically  in  rail  and  mass  transit,  and  put  specific 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

92

measures in place after the Madrid attacks. Security standards for rail are in place; 
criticality  and  vulnerability  assessments  have  been  completed  and  are  continuing; 
inspectors  are  being  deployed  across  the  country;  and  new  technologies  have  been 
tested.  For  example,  TSA  took  major  strides  in  developing  and  field-testing  a  new 
technology, in the Transit and Rail Inspection Pilot (TRIP) for screening passengers 
and baggage in a rail environment for deployment during high threat scenarios. (De-
ployed  to  the  Republican  National  Convention  in  August  2004  and  Presidential  In-
auguration in January 2005 at the request of Amtrak). 

Nevertheless,  I  recognize  that  improving  the  state  of  security  in  our  Nation’s 
transportation  network  and  facilities  is  a  continuing  endeavor.  Specific  efforts  that 
TSA is taking in the rail area include:

Inhalation (TIH) materials are transported;

• continuing rail corridor assessments in high threat urban areas where Toxic by 
• expanding inspections of passenger rail operations and their associated facilities 
for  compliance  with  the  TSA  issued  security  directives  and  identification  of  po-
tential security gaps, utilizing TSA’s 100 rail inspectors; and
• Continuing  to  partner  with  the  DHS’  Science  &  Technology  Directorate  to  pur-
sue  and  test  detection  and  other  technologies  applicable  in  the  rail  and  mass 
transit environment.

TSA  will  also  continue  to  assist  system  operators  identify  their  security  risks 
through:  (1)  security  assessments,  both  government-facilitated  and  through  use  of 
self-assessment  tools,  (2)  compliance  efforts,  and  (3)  through  cooperative  partner-
ships with industry associations and operators to develop effective and cost-efficient 
mitigation strategies.

Question 10. Does TSA have plans for more non-aviation related security require-

ments for the industry? If so, in what areas? 

Answer. The Department of Homeland Security publishes a semiannual summary 
of  all  current  and  projected  rulemakings,  reviews  of  existing  regulations,  and  com-
pleted  actions  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  and  its  component 
agencies  and  divisions.  This  agenda  provides  the  public  with  information  about 
DHS’ regulatory activity, thereby enabling the public to be more aware of and effec-
tively participate in the Department’s regulatory activity. DHS made its most recent 
semiannual  publication  on  October  31,  2005  (70  FR  64629).  The  following,  relating 
specifically to TSA’s regulatory agenda, is excerpted from the October 31, 2005 entry 
in the Federal Register:

Transportation Security Administration—Proposed Rule Stage 

Sequence
Number 

Title 

Aircraft Repair Station Security 
Foreign Air Carriers 
Transportation Worker Identification Credential (TWIC) Mari-

Modification  of  the  Aviation  Security  Infrastructure  Fee 

Due Process for FAA Certificate Holders and for Other Threat 

time 

(ASIF) 

Assessments 

Registered Traveler (RT) 

Regulation

Identifier Number 

1652–AA38
1652–AA40
1652–AA41

1652–AA43

1652–AA44

1652–AA47

Regulation

Identifier Number 

1652–AA00

1652–AA01
1652–AA23
1652–AA34

1652–AA35

1652–AA45

1441
1442
1443

1444

1445

1446

1447

1448
1449
1450

1451

1452

Transportation Security Administration—Final Rule Stage 

Sequence
Number 

Title 

Imposition and Collection of Passenger Civil Aviation Security 

Service Fees 

Aviation Security Infrastructure Fees (ASIF) 
Air Cargo Security Requirements 
Privacy  Act  of  1974:  Implementation  of  Exemptions;  Intel-
ligence,  Enforcement,  Internal  Investigation,  and  Back-
ground Investigation Records 

Flight  Training  for  Aliens  and  Other  Designated  Individuals; 

Security Awareness Training for Flight School Employees 

Secure Flight Program 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Transportation Security Administration—Final Rule Stage—Continued

93

Sequence
Number 

1453

1454 

Sequence
Number 

1455
1456

1457
1458
1459
1460
1461
1462
1463

1464

1465
1466

1467

Title 

Technical  Amendment:  Administrative  Organizational 

Privacy  Act  of  1974:  Implementation  of  Exemptions;  Secure 

Changes 

Flight Records 

Regulation

Identifier Number 

1652–AA46

1652–AA48

Transportation Security Administration—Long-Term Actions 

Title 

Regulation

Identifier Number 

Civil Aviation Security Rules 
Security  Programs  for  Aircraft  Weighing  12,500  Pounds  or 

More 

Private Charter Security Rules 
Background Checks for Airport Workers 
Protection of Sensitive Security Information 
Security Compliance Program for Aircraft Operators 
Security Compliance Program for Airports 
Criminal History Records Checks 
Transportation  of  Explosives  From  Canada  to  the  United 

States Via Commercial Motor Vehicle and Railroad Carrier 

Security  Threat  Assessment  for  Individuals  Applying  for  a 
Hazardous  Materials  Endorsement  for  a  Commercial  Driv-
ers License 

Surface Transportation Security Directives 
Enhanced  Security  Procedures  for  Operations  at  Certain  Air-
ports in the Washington, D.C., Metropolitan Area Flight Re-
stricted Zone 

Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport: Enhanced Secu-

rity Procedures for Certain Operations 

1652–AA02
1652–AA03

1652–AA04
1652–AA06
1652–AA08
1652–AA09
1652–AA10
1652–AA11
152–AA16

1652–AA17

1652–AA26
1652–AA39

1652–AA49

Question  11.  The  recent  GAO  report  on  passenger  rail  security  (GAO–05–851) 
questions  the  feasibility  of  enforcing  the  TSA  security  directive  issued  to  passenger 
rail  operators  following  the  Madrid  bombings  in  May  2004.  Are  the  May  20,  2004 
passenger  rail  security  directives  enforceable?  Does  TSA  have  penalty  authority 
with  regards  to  non-aviation  security  directives?  Has  TSA  issued  fines  against  any 
passenger rail operator or owner for noncompliance? 

Answer.  The  TSA  Security  Directives  issued  on  May  20,  2004,  are  fully  enforce-
able.  TSA  has  available  a  number  of  enforcement  mechanisms  to  ensure  that  regu-
lated  entities  comply  with  applicable  requirements.  TSA  may  employ  a  variety  of 
tools to encourage action that secures compliance, including:

can be immediately corrected in the presence of the inspector.

• On-the-spot  counseling:  Minor  instances  of  noncompliance  are  identified  and 
• Corrective action: Measures taken by the passenger rail system to correct a de-
ficiency in a manner that protects against recurrences. These measures may be 
developed  by  the  passenger  rail  system  and  approved  by  TSA,  expressly  pre-
scribed  by  TSA,  or  mutually  prepared  by  the  system  and  TSA.  Written  docu-
mentation of the corrective action is made through a simple written description 
of measures taken to address the discrepancy or preparation of the formal writ-
ten plan compliance plan.
• Compliance  notice:  TSA  may  issue  a  compliance  notice  to  a  passenger  rail  sys-
tem  following  an  inspection  that  reveals  noncompliance  with  mandatory  secu-
rity  requirements,  such  as  the  security  directives.  The  notice  requests  the  pas-
senger rail system owner or operator to submit a compliance plan, describe cor-
rective actions already taken, or dispute the allegation of noncompliance within 
10 days of receipt.

TSA  also  possesses  general  authority  to  seek  civil  penalties  through  proceedings 
in Federal District Court, against any party for any violation of a TSA issued stand-
ard, regulation, or requirement. Under 49 U.S.C. 46305, a civil penalty ‘‘may be col-
lected  by  bringing  a  civil  action  against  the  person  subject  to  the  penalty,  a  civil 
action  in  rem  against  an  aircraft  subject  to  a  lien  for  a  penalty,  or  both.’’  Pursuant 
to  49  U.S.C.  46301(a)(4),  the  maximum  penalty  available  for  non-aviation  security 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

94

related violations is $10,000. Initiating any proceeding in Federal District Court re-
quires  the  concurrence  and  assistance  of  the  Department  of  Justice.  To  date,  TSA 
has  not  initiated  any  enforcement  action  through  Federal  District  Court  pro-
ceedings. TSA may seek and impose civil penalties for alleged violations of aviation 
security  standards  through  an  administrative  proceeding  (unless  certain  statutory 
exclusions  under  49  U.S.C.  46301(d)  apply).  However,  TSA  requires  additional  au-
thority from Congress to seek and impose civil penalties for alleged violations of sur-
face security standards through an administrative proceeding.

Question  12.  The  results  of  the  Teamsters  Rail  Security  Report  released  on  Sep-
tember  29,  2005,  are  very  distressing.  Sixty-eight  percent  of  the  respondents  of  the 
survey  saw  trespassers  in  the  rail  yard  on  the  date  the  survey  was  taken,  and  96 
percent  responded  that  there  was  no  security  presence  in  the  yard  that  day.  Addi-
tionally, 84 percent of the respondents stated they had received no additional train-
ing  relating  to  terrorism  prevention  in  the  last  twelve  months,  and  62  percent  re-
sponded  they  had  not  been  trained  in  the  railroads’  emergency  action  or  response 
plan. Has TSA issued any security directives that address these security problems? 
If  so,  does  TSA  intend  to  enforce  them?  If  not,  are  such  security  directives  being 
put under consideration? 

Answer.  TSA  issued  rail  security  directives  in  May  2004  (SD  RAILPAX–04–01 
and  SD  RAILPAX–04–02).  In  crafting  the  security  directives,  TSA  required  rail  op-
erators  to  take  steps  to  provide  for  the  physical  security  of  rail  facilities,  such  as 
rail yards. Among other things, rail operators are required to ensure that their per-
sonnel are notified through various media of changes in threat conditions, reinforce 
employee watch programs, and ensure that employees maintain vigilance and imme-
diately  report  through  the  appropriate  chain  of  command  any  situation  that  con-
stitutes  a  potential  threat  or  suspicious  activity.  Additionally,  the  systems  are  re-
quired  to  inform  passengers  of  heightened  security  measures  and  the  need  to  be 
vigilant and report suspicious activity. While ‘‘security training’’ in a specified man-
ner  or  amount  of  time  is  not  expressly  mandated,  each  of  these  measures  requires 
passenger rail systems to educate their personnel on security requirements and en-
sure  their  implementation  through  repeated  advisories  and  guidance.  Training  pro-
grams and materials delivered to employees meet this responsibility. 

In addition, DHS is partnering with the American Public Transportation Associa-
tion  (APTA)  to  assist  its  employee  member  organizations  in  developing  training 
standards  for  public  transportation  employees.  These  training  standards  are  devel-
oped in collaboration with transit industry professionals, industry experts, and pro-
fessional  training  institutes.  In  addition,  both  the  Federal  Transit  Administration 
and  TSA  fund  and  support  a  variety  of  safety  and  security  training  initiatives  for 
transit  agencies  and  their  employees.  Much  of  the  training  is  available  at  no  cost. 
Transit-specific  training  programs  include  recognizing  terrorist  activity  and  re-
sponse,  explosives  incidents,  weapons  of  mass  destruction,  and  responding  to  a  hi-
jacking.  For  example,  through  the  Federal  Law  Enforcement  Training  Center,  TSA 
sponsored  the  Land  Transportation  Anti-Terrorism  Training  Program  which  has 
trained over 400 Law Enforcement and Transit personnel as of the end of FY05. 

As  indicated  in  the  response  to  question  #11,  TSA  possesses  a  variety  of  enforce-

ment tools to elicit compliance with the security directives. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

EDMUND ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question  1.  What  is  your  agency  doing  to  ensure  that  front  line  rail  employees—
the  eyes  and  ears  of  the  railroad  environment—are  receiving  appropriate  security 
training? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) has issued two rail se-
curity  directives  (SD)  (SD  RAILPAX–04–01  and  SD  RAILPAX–04–02),  which  re-
quire  rail  operators  to  implement  various  security  measures.  While  ‘‘security  train-
ing’’  in  a  specified  manner  or  amount  of  time  is  not  expressly  mandated,  each  of 
these measures requires passenger rail systems to educate their personnel on secu-
rity requirements and ensure their implementation through repeated advisories and 
guidance.  Training  programs  and  materials  delivered  to  employees  meet  this  re-
sponsibility. 

Through  the  Annex  to  the  Interdepartmental  DHS  and  DOT  MOU  the  Office  for 
Domestic  Preparedness  is  partnering  with  the  FTA  to  determine  and  deliver  where 
appropriate  cross  discipline  training  programs  designed  to  enhance  the  awareness, 
and  ability  to  prepare  for,  respond  to,  and  recover  from  an  incident.  In  addition, 
DHS  is  partnering  with  the  American  Public  Transportation  Association  (APTA)  to 
assist  its  member  organizations  in  developing  training  standards  for  public  trans-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

95

portation  employees.  These  training  standards  are  developed  in  collaboration  with 
transit industry professionals, industry experts, and professional training institutes. 
In  addition,  both  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  and  TSA  fund  and  support  a 
variety  of  safety  and  security  training  initiatives  for  transit  agencies  and  their  em-
ployees.  Much  of  the  training  is  available  at  no  cost.  Transit-specific  training  pro-
grams  include  recognizing  terrorist  activity  and  response,  explosives  incidents, 
weapons  of  mass  destruction,  and  responding  to  a  hijacking.  For  example,  through 
the  Federal  Law  Enforcement  Training  Center,  TSA  sponsored  the  Land  Transpor-
tation  Anti-Terrorism  Training  Program  which  has  trained  over  400  Law  Enforce-
ment and Transit personnel as of the end of FY05.

Question 2. By law, the Secretary of Transportation—or his designee—sits on the 
Amtrak  board  of  directors.  In  April,  the  board  approved  Amtrak’s  funding  request 
for  Amtrak’s  security  needs  of  up  to  $254  million  a  year  (figure  includes  ‘‘support’’ 
functions as well). If this funding was needed to help secure Amtrak and its 25 mil-
lion annual passengers, why didn’t President Bush ask for it in his budget? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  believes  that  this 
question would most appropriately be directed to the Department of Transportation, 
since Amtrak funding is within its purview. 

Additionally,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  Office  of  State  and  Local 
Government  Coordination  and  Preparedness  (SLGCP)  has  provided  $6,373,730  in 
grant  funding  to  Amtrak  in  FY  2005  for  security  enhancements  for  intercity  pas-
senger rail operations in the Northeast Corridor (service between Washington, D.C. 
and  Boston,  Massachusetts)  and  at  Amtrak’s  hub  in  Chicago,  Illinois.  In  addition, 
a  further  $726,270  in  technical  support  is  being  provided  to  Amtrak  in  FY  2005 
through  the  SLGCP  Mass  Transit  Technical  Assistance  Program.  This  support  will 
entail a facilitated risk assessment of Amtrak’s Northeast Corridor and Chicago op-
erations designed to provide Amtrak with a risk management strategy and roadmap 
for  making  funding  allocation  decisions  on  security  enhancements  to  the  most  crit-
ical portions of its system.

Question  3.  Will  the  Administration  specifically  request  funding  for  Amtrak’s  se-

curity needs in FY07? 

Answer.  Again,  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  believes  that 
this  question  would  most  appropriately  be  directed  to  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation, since Amtrak funding is within its purview. TSA fully integrates Amtrak into 
all of our security planning and is working to further enhance information and intel-
ligence sharing capabilities.

Question 4. How would you characterize the state of security on our railroads? 
Answer. The mass transit and rail industry, and State and local governments, are 
to  be  commended  for  their  proactive  response  and  significant  commitments  in  ad-
dressing  homeland  security  issues,  both  pre-  and  post-9/11,  and  following  the  Mos-
cow,  Madrid  and  London  bombing  incidents.  The  responsible  government  approach 
has  been  to  continue  to  leverage  these  efforts  as  we  developed  baseline  standards 
and refined our rail security strategy. 

To  this  end,  the  United  States  Government  has  made  significant  enhancements 
to  transportation  security,  specifically  in  rail  and  mass  transit,  and  put  specific 
measures in place after the Madrid attacks. Security standards for rail are in place; 
criticality  and  vulnerability  assessments  have  been  completed  and  are  continuing; 
inspectors  are  being  deployed  across  the  country;  and  new  technologies  have  been 
tested.  Federal  efforts  have  focused  on  greater  information  sharing  between  the  in-
dustry  and  all  levels  of  government,  addressing  vulnerabilities,  developing  new  se-
curity  measures  and  plans,  increasing  training  and  public  awareness  campaigns, 
and providing greater assistance and funding, mostly in the form of security grants, 
to help ameliorate the cost borne by the non-federal stakeholders. 

Following  both  July  incidents  in  London,  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA) surface transportation security inspectors were deployed to operations centers 
for  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  systems.  Those  inspectors  were  supplemented 
by  Federal  Railroad  Administration  inspectors.  Working  together,  they  found  the 
systems  had  initiated  actions  to  ensure  compliance  with  security  requirements  and 
swiftly  implemented  enhanced  security  measures,  even  before  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  (DHS)  had  raised  the  threat  level  for  mass  transit  to  Orange. 
Of  note,  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA)  reported  that  as  of  August 
2005 some 90 percent of the Nation’s top 50 transit systems were in full compliance 
with its Top 20 Security Program Action Items for Transit Agencies. FTA developed 
this list following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and has regularly monitored compliance 
with these guidelines. TSA will continue to build upon this frame work as it utilizes 
a threat-based, risk-management approach to continually focus resources, as needed, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

to  ensure  the  security  of  the  Nation’s  transportation  system  and  its  critical  infra-
structure.

96

Question 5. What is TSA doing to track high-hazmat rail cars?
Question  6.  Does  the  Administration  believe  that  active  monitoring  of  the  move-

ment of high-hazmat rail cars is necessary? 

Answer  to  Questions  5  and  6.  There  is  no  class  of  materials  classified  as  ‘‘high 
hazmat’’  in  Federal  law  or  regulation.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA) is currently studying the feasibility and value of actively monitoring rail cars 
that  carry  materials  that  are  Toxic  by  Inhalation  (TIH).  The  study  will  encompass 
both  testing  of  available  technology,  cost  and  the  development  of  systems  to  allow 
for third-party tracking of rail car movements. At present, the rail industry has the 
ability to track these TIH shipments using existing technology that has been estab-
lished  for  commercial  and  operational  purposes.  TSA  is  studying  enhanced  tech-
nologies to supplement the current method of tracking rail cars. It is envisioned that 
these  enhanced  technologies  may  provide  more  accurate  real-time  location  tracking 
and provide additional data such as product releases and container tampering. TSA 
is also considering what level of threat will require active monitoring and the value 
of the data generated by active monitoring. 

In  addition,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  and  the  Department  of 
Transportation (DOT) have been working on various initiatives that support the de-
velopment of a national risk-based plan to address the shipment of hazardous mate-
rials  by  rail  and  truck.  For  rail,  DHS  and  DOT  are  focusing  on  the  assessments  of 
vulnerabilities of high threat urban areas where TIH are transported, identification 
of practical alternatives to placards on rail tank cars, new rail car design standards, 
and the development of hazardous materials security plans to improve the adequacy 
and effectiveness of industry security plans. Through the FY 2005 TSGP, the Office 
for Domestic Preparedness provided $5,000,000.00 for three projects designed to en-
hance the security of TIH corridors. The three projects are:

1) Development of a Rail Corridor Risk Management Tool; 
2) Development of a Rail Corridor Hazmat Response and Recovery Tool; and 
3)  Development  and  demonstration  of  ‘‘Save  Haven’’  concepts  for  in-route  toxic 
inhalation hazard shipments.

These  projects  were  made  available  and  are  being  managed  by  the  Office  for  Do-
mestic Preparedness as identified through partnerships with other DHS entities, in-
cluding TSA, the Border and Transportation Security Directorate, and the Informa-
tion Analysis and Infrastructure Protection Directorate, as well as with the Federal 
Railroad Administration and the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Adminis-
tration  within  the  Department  of  Transportation.  These  projects  offer  the  potential 
for long-term enhancement of freight rail security.

Question 7. Assuming the Federal Government is able to collect vital information 
about hazmat releases, how will it distribute this data to first responders who may 
be putting their own lives at risk just by arriving on scene? 

Answer. Measures are in place to provide state and local governments, and by ex-
tension  first  responders,  sufficient  information  to  protect  their  communities  in  the 
event  of  an  accident  or  an  attack  involving  hazmat  releases.  The  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  (DHS)  and  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA) 
currently  provide  notification  to  municipalities  on  the  pending  movement  of  haz-
ardous  materials  through  local  jurisdictions  on  a  case-by-case  basis.  DHS/TSA  be-
lieves  that  case-by-case  notification  is  sufficient  and  that  in  otherwise  normal  cir-
cumstances  comprehensive  real-time  notification  is  not  warranted.  For  example, 
here  in  Washington,  D.C.,  for  special  events  such  as  the  Fourth  of  July  and  Presi-
dent  Reagan’s  funeral,  local  governments  were  provided  information  in  advance  of 
hazardous  materials  shipments  passing  through  the  local  jurisdictions  in  this  area. 
In  such  rare  cases,  information  provided  to  local  jurisdictions  can  be  analyzed  by 
the  governments  in  light  of  the  risk  and  threat  to  determine  whether  additional 
measures are necessary. In addition, rail carriers annually provide the governments 
with  a  picture  of  the  types  and  quantities  of  the  hazardous  materials  that  have 
come through the jurisdiction. This information enables the governments to prepare, 
plan,  and  train  for  any  incident  involving  a  hazardous  material  that  is  typically 
transported through their jurisdictions. 

As  noted  in  question  6  above,  the  vision  for  the  Development  of  a  Rail  Corridor 
Hazmat  Response  and  Recovery  Tool  would  be  to  improve  response  by  providing 
first  responders  with  the  appropriate  tools,  equipment,  and  training  for  responding 
to a major freight rail incident. 

Following  the  terrorist  attacks  on  September  11,  concerns  were  raised  that  plac-
ards  may  unduly  draw  attention  to  the  transport  of  hazardous  materials  on  rail 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

97

cars.  On  July  25,  2003,  TSA  coordinated  and  hosted  a  Placard  Workshop  to  enable 
industry  and  first  responder  representatives  to  discuss  with  TSA  the  issues  sur-
rounding  the  potential  removal  of  placards  on  rail  cars.  As  a  result  of  the  Placard 
Workshop,  TSA  was  requested  to  conduct  an  independent  study,  and  it  contracted 
with  the  Texas  Transportation  Institute  (TTI)  to  determine  whether  there  are  fea-
sible  alternatives  to  the  current  rail  placarding  system.  The  comprehensive  study 
examined  the  available  technology,  and  input  from  first  responders,  rail  operators 
and  other  key  stakeholders  was  included.  As  a  result  of  the  findings  of  the  study, 
Secretary  Chertoff  announced  on  April  7,  2005,  that  the  Department  was  recom-
mending continuation of the placard system for hazardous materials transported by 
rail, which is designed to ensure the safety of citizens and first responders. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

EDWARD WYTKIND 

Question  1.  As  the  representatives  of  the  major  sectors  of  the  railroad  industry, 
you  live  with  the  challenges  of  securing  your  railroads  everyday.  We  have  tried  to 
craft  a  bill  that  will  help  make  this  job  easier.  Yet,  I’m  sure  we  can  do  more.  Can 
you tell us which of our provisions you feel are most needed and why? If there were 
one  thing  more  we  could  do  in  this  bill  to  help  you  reach  your  goal  of  a  safe  and 
secure railroad and workplace, what would it be? 

Answer.  As  explained  in  my  submitted  written  statement,  Section  310,  the  Rail 
Worker  Security  Training  Program,  is  extremely  important  and  will  from  our  per-
spective  make  important  improvements  to  rail  security.  Training  is  relatively  inex-
pensive  and  experts  have  confirmed  that  a  well  prepared  and  informed  workforce 
can  help  prevent  a  terrorist  attack  and  mitigate  harm  if  one  does  occur.  As  far  as 
improvements  that  we  would  like  to  see,  we  continue  to  believe  the  whistleblower 
protections  need  to  be  enhanced  to  ensure  that  workers  are  not  discouraged  or  in-
timidated from reporting security concerns.

Question  2.  From  listening  to  your  testimony  and  the  statements  of  other  wit-
nesses  at  the  hearing,  there  seems  to  be  some  disconnect  between  what  we  have 
heard  and  the  perception  from  the  vantage  point  of  the  rail  worker.  Based  on  the 
Teamsters Rail Security Report released on September 29, 2005 and your testimony, 
we  learned  that  rail  workers  are  not  receiving  the  training  they  need  to  do  their 
jobs  effectively,  and  that  there  is  too  often  open  access  to  facilities  where  an  ill-in-
tentioned  person  could  do  significant  harm.  Can  you  provide  more  information  con-
cerning what your members are seeing everyday and what we can do about it? 

Answer.  We  agree  that  there  is  a  disconnect  between  what  industry  is  reporting 
and our perspective on what is actually happening on the ground. I should note that 
my  observations  are  based  on  conversations  we  have  had  with  local  leaders  and 
rank-and-file  workers.  These  are  the  employees  who  are  on  the  front  lines  and  un-
derstand  their  railroad  property  and  its  vulnerabilities  as  well  as  know  first-hand 
how little is being done to deal with security risks. Specifically, our members report 
that  rail  facilities,  tracks  and  other  infrastructure  are  not  being  adequately  pro-
tected or secured. Credentials are not being fully used and there is potential for un-
authorized  individuals  to  enter  facilities.  In  addition,  and  as  explained  in  more  de-
tail below, security training is sorely lacking.

Question 3. Are you familiar with the survey, discussed above, of rail workers re-
garding rail security efforts undertaken by the Brotherhood or Locomotive engineers 
and  Trainman  that  found  that  workers  do  not  feel  adequately  trained  to  address  a 
rail  security  incident?  Do  you  believe  that  these  findings  are  generally  consistent 
with the situation facing the employees that you represent? 

Answer. While we cannot speak to the specifics of the survey, we can report that 
the findings are generally consistent with the situation that is faced by the employ-
ees represented by TTD unions.

Question  4.  Can  you  explain  some  of  the  benefits  of  consistent  worker  training 
standards,  and  why  from  the  perspective  of  your  members  a  Federal  mandate  is 
needed? 

Answer.  Workers  need  to  know  how  to  identify  a  security  risk,  what  to  do  in  re-
sponse,  and  the  steps  that  must  be  taken  in  the  event  an  attack  does  occur.  While 
we understand that not all workers need the same training, without Federal stand-
ards  and  guidelines  that  carriers  must  follow,  our  experience  is  that  the  content  of 
training  will  be  highly  deficient.  Furthermore,  if  training  is  left  to  the  discretion  of 
individual  carriers,  we  know  that  too  often  carriers  will  opt  not  to  provide  training 
across  the  board.  Safety  and  security  should  not  vary  from  carrier  to  carrier  -  we 
must  have  one  level  of  security  throughout  the  system.  Simply  put,  a  mandate  is 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

needed  because  without  it  the  status-quo  will  remain  in  effect  and  that  is  simply 
not acceptable.

98

Question 5. Do you know what percentage of the front-line rail employees that you 

represent have received any security training? 

Answer.  We  do  not  currently  have  that  data  for  our  members.  It  should  also  be 
noted  that  even  if  training  has  occurred,  it  is  a  separate  question  if  that  training 
is comprehensive and if recurring training is being done.

Question  6.  You  mentioned  in  your  testimony,  the  need  for  more  robust  whistle-
blower protection for rail workers. What about the provision of this Committee’s bill, 
Sec. 311 of S. 1052? What changes do you recommend to what is already provided? 
Are you aware of specific cases where employees have been punished for raising se-
curity concerns? 

Answer. Section 311 is a good start and we supported its inclusion but we believe 
that  improvement  should  be  made.  Specifically,  the  provision  should  follow  the 
model of protections provided for financial whistleblowers as in the Sarbanes-Oxley 
Act. This law ensures that whistleblower complaints are considered in a more timely 
fashion  and  allows  workers  to  pursue  a  action  in  Federal  court  if  agency  response 
is unnecessarily delayed. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN 

Question 1. I have worked hard, together with Chairman Stevens, to craft a solid 
blueprint for future Federal actions to secure our Nations’ railroads. The rail provi-
sions of S. 1052 include security upgrades, threat assessments, security training, re-
search  and  development,  and  several  other  important  initiatives,  many  of  which 
were  unanimously  approved  by  the  Senate  last  year.  Yet,  if  we  can  strengthen  our 
efforts,  we  must.  I  hope  each  of  you  will  help  us  do  that.  What  is  your  position  on 
the rail provisions of S. 1052 ? How can we improve them? 

Answer. The U.S. Department of Transportation (DOT) has worked with the U.S. 
Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  to  provide  the  Administration’s  views  on 
S. 1052. Those views were conveyed to Chairman Stevens by letter dated November 
10, 2005. We would, however, like to point out some additional issues with S. 1052 
that should be considered. 
Sec. 304. Fire and Life-Safety Improvements 

This section would authorize a total of $670 million for FY 2006–2008 to be made 
available to the Secretary of Transportation, from funds appropriated under section 
102 of the bill to the Secretary, to make grants to Amtrak for design and construc-
tion of fire- and life-safety improvements to tunnels in New York, New York; Balti-
more, Maryland; and Washington, D.C. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section 
would remain available until expended. Amtrak would be required to submit for the 
Secretary’s  approval  an  engineering  and  financial  plan  for  projects  and  a  project 
management  plan  for  each  project.  The  Secretary  would  not  be  authorized  to  dis-
burse  funds  to  Amtrak  unless  the  Secretary  had  approved  such  plans.  The  section 
would  also  establish  a  complex  series  of  deadlines  for  the  Secretary’s  review  of  the 
plans. 

DOT  opposes  this  provision  as  an  unnecessary  infringement  on  the  Secretary’s 
discretion  to  carry  out  the  review  of  Amtrak’s  plans.  DOT  recognizes  the  benefits 
of  fire-  and  life-safety  improvements  to  these  critical  elements  of  the  Nation’s  rail 
infrastructure.  In  recognition  of  the  importance  of  these  tunnels,  not  just  for  inter-
city  but  also  for  commuter  rail  service,  we  believe  that  any  funds  made  available 
for  this  purpose  should  flow  through  a  Federal-State  partnership  such  as  that  pro-
posed  in  the  Administration’s  April  13,  2005  legislative  proposal  to  restructure 
intercity rail passenger service—the Passenger Rail Investment Reform Act. 
Sec. 315. Welded Rail and Tank Car Safety Improvements 

This  section  would  mandate  that  FRA  undertake  certain  actions  to  improve  the 

safety of railroad track and railroad tank cars. 

There does not appear to be a need for this legislation because a very similar pro-
vision  was  enacted  in  August  2005  as  section  9005  of  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexi-
ble,  and  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act  of  2005  (SAFETEA–LU,  Pub.  L.  109–
59). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Sec.  316.  Report  Regarding  Impact  on  Public  Safety  of  Train  Travel  Com-

munities Without Grade Separation 

99

This section would require that DOT, in consultation with the Transportation Se-
curity  Administration  (TSA)  and  State  and  local  governments,  study  and  report  to 
Congress  on  the  effect  of  blocked  highway-rail  grade  crossings  upon  the  ability  of 
emergency responders to perform public safety and security duties. 

There does not appear to be a need for this legislation as a similar provision was 

enacted in section 9004 of SAFETEA–LU.

Question  2.  The  FRA  issued  a  Safety  Advisory  earlier  this  month  calling  on  rail-
roads  that  transport  hazardous  materials  to  improve  procedures  for  tracking  the 
movement  of  time-sensitive  shipments.  The  advisory  also  emphasized  that  all  rail-
road  employees  who  handle  such  shipments  be  aware  of,  and  clearly  understand, 
the  procedures.  The  Advisory  was  issued  as  a  result  of  an  incident  that  occurred 
in  Cincinnati  this  summer,  when  a  tank  car  carrying  styrene  sat  idle  on  the  same 
railroad  for  seven  months  and  as  a  result  of  the  long  delay,  exploded.  Such  neg-
ligence  poses  obvious  security  risks.  What  is  the  FRA  doing  to  ensure  compliance 
with these new requirements, including employee awareness? What additional steps 
has the FRA taken to secure the movement of hazardous materials by rail? 

Answer. FRA issued Safety Advisory 2004–05 on September 29, 2005, to improve 
the  safety  and  reliability  of  hazardous  materials  shipments  by  railroad.  The  Safety 
Advisory informs shippers, consignees, and railroads of the dangers of allowing cars 
of  time-sensitive  chemicals  to  remain  undelivered  beyond  their  anticipated  date  of 
placement,  and  recommends  enhanced  procedures  to  avoid  such  occurrences.  While 
FRA cannot enforce compliance with the Safety Advisory, as it does not impose any 
requirements  in  itself,  FRA  is  closely  monitoring  the  industry’s  efforts  to  promote 
the  timely  shipment  of  time-sensitive  hazardous  materials  in  accordance  with  the 
recommendations in the Safety Advisory. FRA is also closely monitoring the compli-
ance of railroads, shippers, and consignees with existing DOT regulations, which re-
quire  notification  and  special  awareness  for  those  time-sensitive  materials  posing  a 
significant risk in transportation. FRA will pursue future regulatory or other action 
should  the  Safety  Advisory  and  existing  regulations  prove  insufficient  to  minimize 
the  safety  risks  associated  with  the  movement  of  time-sensitive  hazardous  mate-
rials. 

FRA  recognizes  that  employee  awareness  and  understanding  of  the  regulations 
and  procedures  governing  the  safe  transport  of  time-sensitive  hazardous  materials 
shipments  are  critical,  and  DOT  regulations  at  49  CFR  172.700  et  seq.,  provide  for 
initial and recurrent training of all employees engaged in the transportation of haz-
ardous materials. Railroads also impose additional training requirements, and FRA 
expects  that  this  Safety  Advisory  will  be  made  a  part  of  the  industry’s  hazardous 
materials transportation training curriculum. 

FRA  has  taken  additional  steps  to  promote  the  safety  and  security  of  the  move-
ment  of  hazardous  materials  by  rail.  On  October  24,  2005,  FRA  issued  Emergency 
Order  No.  24,  which  requires  railroads  to  modify  their  operating  rules  and  take 
other action necessary to ensure that railroad employees who dispatch non-signaled 
territory  or  who  operate  hand-operated  main  track  switches  in  non-signaled  terri-
tory  restore  the  switches  to  their  proper  (normal)  position  after  use.  The  failure  to 
restore  such  switches  to  their  proper  position  after  use  has  resulted  in  a  number 
of  accidents  and  fatalities.  This  Emergency  Order  is  part  of  a  broader  focus  on 
human  factor-caused  train  accidents  that  is  being  conducted  under  the  auspices  of 
FRA’s Railroad Safety Advisory Committee (RSAC). RSAC has tasked its Operating 
Rules  Working  Group  to  develop  recommendations  to  reduce  human  factor-caused 
train accidents generally, and the Working Group is scheduled to report its findings 
and recommendations to the full RSAC in February 2006. 

FRA  also  has  ongoing  a  number  of  additional  initiatives  to  promote  and  enhance 
the safety and security of hazardous materials shipments. Since January 2004 FRA 
has  inspected  more  than  3,600  security  plans  (including  the  plans  for  all  the  major 
rail  carriers)  and  reviewed  the  training  records  for  more  than  29,000  rail  hazmat 
employees. As a result, we are processing 120 recommended civil penalty actions for 
violations  of  the  DOT  security  regulations.  DOT  and  DHS  are  examining  the  feasi-
bility  of  specific  security  enhancements,  including  improvements  to  security  plans, 
modifications  of  methods  used  to  identify  shipments,  enhanced  requirements  for 
temporary storage, strengthened tank car integrity, and implementation of tracking 
and  communication  systems.  FRA  staff  have  also  provided  support  to  the  vulner-
ability assessments led by TSA on several rail corridors. 

FRA  and  DOT ’s  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration 
(PHMSA)  are  also  coordinating  with  DHS  in  formulating  proposed  regulations  that 
would enhance the current security plan requirements, as a follow-up to an August 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

100

16,  2004,  notice  (jointly  issued  by  PHMSA  and  TSA).  Possible  enhancements  under 
consideration include data collection on shipments of Toxic Inhalation Hazard (TIH) 
and  other  highly  hazardous  materials;  analysis  of  safety  and  security  risks  along 
rail transportation routes where these materials are transported; alternative routing 
options; and en route storage.

Question  3.  Are  there  plans  to  cross-train  FRA  and  TSA  rail  inspection  staff  so 
that  when  conducting  inspections,  both  sets  of  inspectors  can  be  looking  for  safety 
and security problems? What do you think of the concept of creating a unified Fed-
eral  rail  inspection  team  to  ensure  maximum  efficiency  and  coordination,  rather 
than  having  separate  TSA  and  FRA  inspectors  essentially  performing  the  same 
function separately? 

Answer. There are generally no plans to cross-train FRA and TSA rail inspection 
staff  so  that  both  sets  of  inspectors  look  for  both  safety  and  security  problems.  In-
stead,  FRA  has  been  working  closely  with  the  managers  of  TSA’s  new  inspection 
program  to  ensure  that  the  roles  of  the  two  agencies’  inspectors  are  clearly  distin-
guished and do not result in duplicative inspections of the rail industry. FRA’s safe-
ty mission is critical and requires the constant attention of its inspection force. FRA 
believes  that  public  safety  is  best  served  by  having  FRA  inspectors  direct  their  ex-
pertise  in  monitoring  compliance  with  the  extensive  body  of  laws  and  regulations 
governing  the  five  major  areas  of  railroad  safety:  track,  signal  systems,  equipment, 
operating practices, and hazardous materials shipments. 

FRA does not believe that uniting TSA and FRA inspectors into a single, Federal 
rail  inspection  team  would  ensure  maximum  efficiency  and  coordination,  as  the 
question  suggests,  as  TSA  and  FRA  rail  inspectors  generally  do  not  perform  the 
same  functions.  For  example,  TSA  rail  inspectors  are  focused  on  securing  the  rail 
transportation network from terrorist attack through the evaluation of potential ter-
rorist  targets,  identification  and  elimination/neutralization  of  security  gaps,  identi-
fication  of  suspicious  persons  and  objects,  and  more—functions  which  are  generally 
distinct from those performed by FRA safety inspectors. 

Of  course,  FRA’s  railroad  safety  mission  necessarily  includes  involvement  in  rail-
road security issues and, in those areas such as hazardous materials transportation 
where  safety  and  security  are  significantly  interrelated,  FRA  inspectors  will  con-
tinue  to  have  an  active  role.  FRA  has  been  and  will  continue  to  be  engaged  in  the 
railroad industry’s response to the threat of terrorism, as detailed in Administrator 
Boardman’s  written  testimony.  Yet,  FRA  believes  that  through  careful  delineation 
of  that  role,  and  close  coordination  with  TSA,  FRA’s  security  efforts  will  dovetail 
with those of TSA while continuing to allow FRA to keep its principal focus on rail-
road safety.

Question 4. I understand that the FRA and TSA have been working on a rail secu-
rity  annex  to  the  MOU  developed  between  the  Department  of  Transportation  and 
the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  S.  1052  requires  the  agencies  to  complete 
this  annex  within  one  year  following  enactment.  Can  you  tell  us  what  the  current 
status of this rail security annex is? 

Answer. FRA has prepared an annex addressing rail security issues, including re-
lations  between  FRA  inspectors  and  TSA’s  new  inspection  workforce.  FRA  has 
shared the draft annex with TSA, and we hope that it will be completed soon. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN 

Question  1.  What  additional  enforcement  action  is  the  Federal  Railroad  Adminis-
tration taking to ensure railroads and hazmat shippers are complying with your re-
cent safety advisory on rail hazmat transportation? 

Answer.  Please  see  the  answer  to  Question  2  from  Senator  Inouye.  The  answer 

addresses this question and provides additional information.

Question  2.  Is  rail  transportation  of  high  hazmat  and  handling  incident  thereto 

inherently dangerous? 

Answer.  Rail  transportation  and  handling  of  any  hazardous  material,  especially 
TIH  materials,  are  dangerous  when  not  properly  done.  Congress  recognized  this 
very  danger  long  ago  and  has  regulated  these  activities.  Over  the  years,  a  body  of 
statutory law and detailed administrative regulation has been developed to address 
the  risks  associated  with  the  transportation  and  handling  of  hazardous  materials. 
FRA  and  DOT  as  a  whole  continually  seek  ways  to  further  mitigate  these  risks, 
such as through efforts to enhance the security of TIH shipments. The effectiveness 
of  this  regulatory  regime  is  evidenced  by  the  remarkably  low  number  of  incidents 
in light of the high volume and length of haul of TIH materials transported by rail.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

101

Question 3. Does it present a safety or security risk? 
Answer.  By  definition,  hazardous  materials  pose  various  types  of  risks  to  safety, 
including  security.  Under  DOT ’s  hazardous  materials  transportation  regulations, 
there are nine designated classes of hazardous materials, most of which are further 
subdivided by specific hazard. See 49 CFR 173.2. As noted above, DOT ’s promulga-
tion  and  enforcement  of  these  regulations  help  to  manage  the  risks  posed,  and  we 
continually seek ways to further mitigate these risks.

Question 4. By law, the Secretary of Transportation—or his designee—sits on the 
Amtrak  board  of  directors.  In  April,  the  board  approved  Amtrak’s  funding  request 
for  Amtrak’s  security  needs  of  up  to  $254  million  a  year  (figure  includes  ‘‘support’’ 
functions as well). If this funding was needed to help secure Amtrak and its 25 mil-
lion annual passengers, why didn’t President Bush ask for it in his budget? 

Answer.  FRA  does  not  believe  it  correct  to  characterize  the  $254  million  figure 
as  a  funding  request,  per  se.  Rather,  this  amount  was  for  use  as  an  internal  budg-
eting  threshold.  Funding  for  Amtrak’s  police  and  security  needs  would  come  from 
Amtrak’s  operating  funds,  up  to  this  dollar  amount,  as  determined  by  Amtrak’s 
management. Further, the President’s budget for FY06 had already been submitted 
to Congress by April 2005.

Question  5.  Will  the  Administration  specifically  request  funding  for  Amtrak’s  se-

curity needs in FY07? 

Answer. The President’s FY07 budget request has not yet been finalized. As a re-
sult,  it  would  be  premature  to  discuss  what  specific  initiatives  will  be  in  that  re-
quest. We will be glad to share with the Committee the details of the FY07 budget 
request, once we are in a position to do so.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  09:23 Jul 24, 2006 Jkt 028172 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28172.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

